_	There was criticism of the decision, some noting that all of the justices themselves had each received expensive gifts or travel while serving on the Supreme Court at the time that the decision was handed down.
_	Dawn is the time that marks the beginning of the twilight before sunrise.
_	He made an agreement with them—that if they reached Xue's camp at night, they would make a surprise attack, but if it was already the day by the time that they arrived, they would surrender.
_	At the time that Gallegos held the sheriff's office, San Miguel County included the present Guadalupe County, which was created from the southern portion of San Miguel County February 26, 1891 by an act of the New Mexico Territorial Legislature.
_	At the time that funding was being sought for the construction of a new Customs House in Rockhampton the economic situation in Queensland was worsening with the depression of the 1890s.
_	The present Tahbilk wetlands area was created by the raising of the water level at the time that the Goulburn Weir was built.
_	Because of the military origins of Montevideo, it had been forbidden to build anything permanent in the area outside the walls of the city up to the time that Uruguay gained Independence.
_	Manager Mike Scioscia noted at the time that Prieto would likely be used as a defensive replacement, or possibly as a situational hitter due to his bunting abilities.
_	It was suspected at the time that the bomb had been placed outside the church by anarchists, particularly the "Galleanist" faction led by adherents of Luigi Galleani.
_	It was said at the time that no other infantry in the realm could rival Zelu's.
_	Peirce began writing on semiotics, which he also called semeiotics, meaning the philosophical study of signs, in the 1860s, around the time that he devised his system of three categories.
_	The PITC included the first Pacific and Indian Ocean region Inmarsat earth station in the southern hemisphere, and the OTC claimed at the time that PITC was the world's only communications complex to have cable, satellite and high frequency radio links operating from the same location.
_	The only function at the time that made the bank characteristic of a central one was that it was the banker to the Australian government, in addition to it being the same for the states.
_	Alexander said at the time that, "I did the Dermott Series for many personal reasons, and I'm overwhelmed by the response this collection is creating here in Texas".
_	However, it was understood by all the state parties at the time that the armistice agreements were not peace treaties with Israel, nor the final resolution of the conflict between them, including the borders.
_	According to Broward Mill, the past president of the Sumter County Historical Society, Lake Panasoffkee from the time that Sumter County was settled by whites until damaging freezes which wiped out the area's citrus industry in the 1880s and 1890s.
_	They had also used it to encourage Walt Disney Studios into producing the film, as at the time that they discovered the image, the film was close to being dropped.
_	They were both used by The Leader in an attempt to travel back to the time that the Gamma Bomb that transformed Bruce Banner into the Hulk detonated.
_	However, by the time that European colonial explorers and settlers began entering Kentucky in greater numbers in the mid-18th century, there were no major Native American settlements in the region.
_	By the time that he entered the École Normale Supérieure in 1916, he was already on the road to studying linguistics and the classics.
_	By the time that the nature and location of the event had been clarified in this irregular manner, German communication intelligence was once again working systematically.
_	The Mahdi became synonymous with the "Hidden Imam" who was thought to be in occultation awaiting the time that God has ordered for his return.
_	The station master wanted to correct this mistake, but miscalculated the time that the delayed express train would need to reach the station.
_	One archeologist, Cheryl LaRoche, said at the time that “there is overwhelming evidence… of Abolitionist activity” at Chatel’s house.
_	Ironically, the journal "Science" stated at the time that "his colleagues have felt for many years that by consulting him they could extract more information from his encyclopedic mind than they could obtain from a visit to a library".
_	The combination of the popular issues of slavery, the Orient, racial ideology, and sexual titillation gave the reports of Circassian women sufficient notoriety at the time that the circus leader P. T. Barnum decided to capitalize on this interest.
_	Around 40% of children have tried alcohol by the time that they are ten.
_	During the time that she was not attending college Ladd worked as a public school teacher until her aunt's aid allowed her to reenter Vassar and graduate in 1869.
_	Colt is often considered the father of the Connecticut River Valley industrial revolution, although there were a handful of small outfits already in operation by the time that he purchased a large tract of land in the area in the 1840s.
_	He also skated at the 1952 Winter Olympics of Oslo, but his 10,000 m time of 17:36.8 – almost identical to the time that won him silver in 1948 – was only good for the eighth place.
_	In December 2012, years after it landed on his desk, the then Attorney General, Yehuda Weinstein, decided to close the case because the time that passed had weakened the evidence.
_	Saul's father was naturalised as a British citizen by the time that Saul himself was three; a Bernard Yaffie is recorded as living at Abbortsford Place in the old Gorbals, where the young Saul spent the early years of his childhood.
_	The French national motto, "Liberté, Egalité, Fraternité" (Freedom, Equality, Brotherhood), was replaced by "Travail, Famille, Patrie" (Work, Family, Fatherland); it was noted at the time that TFP also stood for the criminal punishment of ""travaux forcés à perpetuité"" ("forced labor in perpetuity").
_	He is Sai's boss at the time that Makoto died.
_	Winther suggests that the mother will spend the time that the child is asleep "deleting sorrows from the long list".
_	"From early on, R.E.M. and Brian Eno were a band and a musician that sort of factored into the time that David Lipsky and David Foster Wallace spent together.
_	The glide ratio is expressed as the ratio of the distance travelled to height lost in the same time; it is expressed as the number of feet (or other length units) traveled horizontally during the time that one foot (or other length unit) of vertical distance is traversed.
_	Labino and Harvey Littleton, with whom Labino would stage a ground-breaking glassblowing workshop at the Toledo Museum of Art in 1962, met during the time that Littleton was a ceramics instructor at the Toledo Museum of Art School of Design (1949 to 1951) and Labino was taking evening craft classes there.
_	In addition to the information given by ITS and TPC, more specialized detectors are needed: the TOF measures, with a precision better than a tenth of a billionth of a second, the time that each particle takes to travel from the vertex to reach it, so that one can measure its speed.
_	It was common knowledge at the time that he was benefactor and patron to his nephew Heinrich Heine.
_	The series premiered in the middle of the 1994–95 Major League Baseball strike and was canceled around the time that the year's World Series would have been played.
_	The band's name comes from "one o'clock", the time that the band used to practice their music on weekends.
_	The school, built from Ballochmyle red sandstone, opened in the 1890s with Mr. Mudie as headteacher, at the time that Hessilhead school closed.
_	He justifies the regulation of a concealed weapon because during the time that this law was enforced the state was not under attack, so the use of the militia was not needed.
_	Sheikh Mohammed suggested at the time that he and Cecil had disagreed about the fitness of one of his thoroughbreds, Mark of Esteem, to run at Ascot - a disagreement which Cecil had made public.
_	The "nasciturus" fiction states that, if an advantage accrues whilst a child, later born alive, is a foetus, he is deemed to have the requisite legal personality from the time that the benefit accrues.
_	Fonville noted at the time that, in his opinion, speed was more essential than beef and weight in the shot put.
_	The changes met with furious reactions, but the city authorities explained at the time that these were necessary to solve traffic problems.
_	The doctors stated that they knew at the time that it might cause cancer.
_	By the time that the plans to build the St. Lawrence Seaway were announced, commercial usage of the harbour was already in decline.
_	KTVX was the only Chris-Craft owned station to have never been affiliated with UPN during the time that the company owned a partial stake in the network.
_	It was steered by hand controlled rudders, unlike Rogallo wing hang gliders of the time that were steered by the pilot shifting his body weight.
_	The launch of the company coinciding with the time that the UK regulatory authority (Ofcom) began the process of liberalising the UK spectrum regime.
_	In the time that followed, there were further divisions of the lordship, which often left it subject to several lords, although it remained a cohesive territorial unit.
_	This came around the time that Mindy Herman was forced from the network and the new executive put in her place decided to take the network's programming in a direction that was gentler to celebrities and less exploitative about their private lives.
_	ULA stated at the time that 95% of the hardware required for the Atlas V Heavy has already been flown on the Atlas V single-core vehicles.
_	By the time that happened, the economy would be recovering, giving the impression that tariff cuts caused the crash and the reverse generated the recovery.
_	At the conclusion of the case, constitutional lawyer Louis Marshall stated, "I hold before me the decision in the case of the People against the Brooklyn Cooperage Company...the consequence of that was that this 'tremendous' tract of thirty thousand acres was to be cut down 'flat' from one end of it to the other, in order that the scientific foresters might start a new forest which might mature a hundred years from the time that that contract was entered into.
_	By 1961, however, Singapore had grown receptive to the idea of joining Malaysia, largely because of the prevailing idea at the time that industrial Singapore could not survive without access to Malayan markets.
_	And the historic Dean Marie Dominique Peyramale had been dead for about a year and a half by the time that Bernadette herself perished on 16 April 1879.
_	The site of the Rossdale powerplant was a First Nations campsite from the time that people first moved into the Edmonton area after the retreat of the glaciers around 8,000 years ago.
_	Some evidence indicates human intervention between the time of discovery of Azaria's clothes and the time that the police photographed it.
_	Nobody knew at the time that it would be the park's final day of operation.
_	It was August 20 by the time that they reached a point in the mountains where they could look down and see the Great Salt Lake.
_	Stanton and Pike had ridden out with Reed but had become lost on their way back; by the time that the party found them, they were a day away from eating their horses.
_	It was said at the time that a family of premium V6s would follow, with displacements ranging from 3.3 L to 3.7 L, but only the LX5 was ever produced before GM axed the Shortstar in favor of their current flagship V6, the High Feature, in 2004.
_	At the time that Simon's Rock was looking for a school to acquire it, some of the possible schools included Boston University and Yale University.
_	By 1948, he had also become the sports director for WGR radio and served as principal sports anchor for WGR-TV from the time that station signed on in 1954 through the early 1960s.
_	Griffin was starring in the NBC series "Suddenly Susan" during the time that "Dilbert" was in production.
_	Doctor Price was staying at the hotel at the time that Mr. Leeman was found dead in his sleep, he calmed Basil down and convinced him that the out-of-date kippers he had served Leeman for breakfast were not responsible for the guest's death.
_	Neighbors also stated that they heard loud screams in a vacant home around the time that Richardson went missing.
_	At the time that Alpha Sigma Kappa was founded, scientific careers were often filled primarily by men.
_	Andy Jassy, AWS founder and vice president in 2006, said at the time that Amazon S3 (one of the first and most scalable elements of AWS) "helps free developers from worrying about where they are going to store data, whether it will be safe and secure, if it will be available when they need it, the costs associated with server maintenance, or whether they have enough storage available.
_	It was presumably at the time that Sæbbi founded the original abbey at Westminster.
_	He announced at the time that he would thereafter devote his efforts to Susquehanna's intramural and physical education programs.
_	It was expected at the time that natural disasters, winter frosts, and the raiding of building materials by the city's residents would shortly ruin the remaining ruins.
_	He was born during the time that India was fighting for its freedom from the British rule.
_	At the time that it exited beta, the mod's development was led by four core members, JohnnyLump (John J. Lumpkin), Amineri (Rachel Norman), XMarksTheSpot, and Ellatan (Alex Rozenfeld).
_	Flemmi has insisted that he did not know at the time that Bulger was also an informant.
_	(c) A landlord who exercises the authority provided in subdivision (a) to prohibit smoking shall be subject to federal, state, and local requirements governing changes to the terms of a lease or rental agreement for tenants with leases or rental agreements that are in existence at the time that the policy limiting or prohibiting smoking is adopted.
_	At the time that the Constitution came into effect, the United States had a significant debt, primarily associated with the Revolutionary War.
_	"Jane", now defunct, was one of the few magazines at the time that generated all writing in-house, as opposed to freelance.
_	It was announced at the time that the city would find an appropriate use for the eagle, but as of 2008 it was still in storage, despite a 2003 invitation for proposals from well-known artists and an exhibit of the suggestions, which included wrapping it in the manner of Christo and permitting nature to reclaim it by letting grass grow over it.
_	Much of this footage was recorded around the time that the "You Gotta Go There to Come Back" album was being recorded.
_	The building has a Prairie School design, a popular residential style at the time that was nonetheless unusual for an apartment complex.
_	Illinois State Police Director Terry Gainer said at the time that police were "there for this woman's protection and for the protection of her neighbors.
_	Some of the suspects may not have been present at the time that strikers were killed.
_	At the time that the Schuylers moved into their new home, Philip and his wife, Catherine Van Rensselaer Schuyler, already had three daughters: Angelica, Elizabeth, and Margarita.
_	During the time that the creamery was being converted to family living quarters, Dr. Upjohn erected a combination garage and guest house in the spot where the Conference Hall now stands.
_	The NBL itself was also in strife; with the competition falling on tough times, there was a real possibility at the time that there would be no league in 2009/10.
_	In addition, some armed groups such as the FDLR had even started to integrate into the social and economic organization of Walikale; as shown in a report by the Pole Institute dating from 2008, the FDLR had begun to constitute "a state within a state" (Rudahigwa, 2008): customary chiefs admitted at the time that an important part of Walikale territory was under control of the FDLR, who had imposed its own rules and organization.
_	During the time that Vietnam was under French administration, the French started minting cash coins for circulation first for within the colony of Cochinchina and then for the other regions of Vietnam.
_	It was noted at the time that Professional BMX in particular and BMX as a whole was not a mature enough sport for the concept to be a success.
_	The aircraft received names of famous Royal Navy warships; the first G-APEA was named "Vanguard", however by the time that the aircraft were delivered, BEA had adopted its new "red square" livery, which saw the end of naming and none of the Vanguards actually carried a name.
_	However, it must have seemed at the time that they did.
_	In April 1845, during the time that the colonial forces were gathering in the Bay of Islands, the warriors of Heke and Nene fought many skirmishes on the small hill named Taumata-Karamu that was between the two pās and on open country between Okaihau and Te Ahuahu.
_	The existence of a nuclear reactor so close to central London was largely unknown to the general public, even at the time that "Maritime Greenwich" was named a UNESCO World Heritage Site in 1997.
_	Whereas it was widely believed at the time that the sanctions caused a major rise in child mortality, recent research has shown that commonly cited data were fabricated by the Iraqi government and that "there was no major rise in child mortality in Iraq after 1990 and during the period of the sanctions."
_	The Kenizzites are listed (Genesis 15:19) as one of the nations who lived in the land of Canaan, at the time that God covenanted with Abram (Abraham) to give that land to his descendants forever (Genesis 17:8).
_	On 26 October 1916, 729 people who were unemployed or "work-shy" were picked up and by the time that deportations ceased on 10 February 1917, 115 deportation operations had taken place.
_	During the time that Harris owned the farm, it produced of tobacco along with wheat, Indian corn, and oats.
_	Black Court vampires still inhabit the human bodies that they lived in before they were turned into vampires, with the only difference being their bodies rotting like zombies in the time that they have been undead.
_	In 1904 two further bells were added at the time that the tower and spire were rebuilt.
_	He became a regular, weekly comic reader around the time that the 1985–86 DC Comics storyline "Crisis on Infinite Earths" ended, though he found that storyline too bizarre and impenetrable to a new reader; as a result, he gravitated toward Marvel Comics, finding Spider-Man to be his favorite, along with other books such as "Star Wars" and "".
_	Little did they realize at the time that they were starting a movement that would help end Communist rule."
_	The South Wales Echo reported at the time that Sangoe had initially been taken to Bute Street police station, before being transferred to the hospital where he was pronounced dead.
_	During the time that he was active and working, Domenico was the only Sienese painter to have received commissions by clients in Florence.
_	It was reported at the time that he was considering significant contract offers from other AFL clubs, specifically Fremantle and the Brisbane Lions.
_	By the time that last film was in release, Ziskin had been appointed president of Fox 2000, one of several offshoots 20th Century Fox developed to speed up their production and distribution.
_	J.B. Morrow, the newspaper publisher who took Foraker's statement as source material for Herbert Croly's 1912 biography of Hanna, disagreed: "it was understood at the time that his [Foraker's] heart was not in Sherman's candidacy ... his outraged feelings over Hanna's bargaining with Southern delegates can't be believed by me."
_	At the time that his New Jersey license was taken away, Jascalevich was practicing in the Bronx with a valid New York State license.
_	Humphrey said at the time that he was urging fellow Senator and Minnesotan Walter Mondale to run, despite believing that Ted Kennedy would enter the race as well.
_	In other words, during the time that would otherwise be spent waiting, more packets are being sent.
_	During the time that the Draft was produced, WWE was promoting their annual Extreme Rules pay-per-view event.
_	In light of human potential to develop herd immunity via vaccination in advance of a pandemic strain, the time that it allows us to do so before it evolves may become as crucial or more crucial to the measure of damage it causes than its own lethality and contagiousness.
_	Commentators suggested at the time that they represented the possibility of a change in the way in which new bands are promoted and marketed.
_	The implementation of the act successfully curtailed a resurgence in nationalist violence in Bengal, at the time that the Hindustan Republican Association was rising in the United Provinces.
_	During the time that he was a referee, McClung also pursued a career in steelmaking.
_	Tustin was a personal friend and political ally of Progressive Conservative leader John Diefenbaker, and it was suggested at the time that his loss was a setback for Diefenbaker's leadership.
_	The next year (1972), the band moved to Montreal, Canada around the time that they released their sophomore LP "Hot Wacks" to very good reviews.
_	Hook tells his son about the time that he was a marine soldier, ten years ago.
_	This team had much of the same membership as the Invaders, but had its adventures in the post–World War II era, the time that their adventures were published.
_	Reading of the servant's plan in "At the time of evening, the time that women go out to draw water," Rav Huna asked:
_	Rav Huna taught that there was just as little reason in the servant's plan, "At the time of evening, the time that women go out to draw water."
_	The frigate was damaged by the time that it was worked free: some copper was stripped away from the hull, the masts were twisted and some of them had developed long cracks.
_	It was later indicated by the leaked IPCC documents that Menezes may have run across the platform to get a seat on the train, and did not know at the time that he was being watched or pursued.
_	Also that year, when the officials Xue Qianguang (薛謙光) and Murong Xun (慕容珣) accused an associate of Princess Taiping's, the Buddhist monk Huifan (慧範), Princess Taiping pleaded on Huifan's behalf, and Emperor Ruizong, believing that Xue and Murong had only accused Huifan because they could do so during the time that Princess Taiping was out of the capital, demoted Xue and Murong.
_	Van Patten remarked to a correspondent at the time that his re-election related to the party's "difficulty in getting anyone who could write correct English" and was made possible by the absence at the convention of what he called the "thick-headed, dyspeptic element."
_	Paul McCartney wrote the song around the time that highlife and reggae were beginning to become popular in Britain.
_	Around the time that Phillips was eleven, she heard a sermon given by a member of the London Missionary Society.
_	Steve Greetham noted at the time that it was "very unusual" for Armatrading to ask members of her touring band to record with her, but said he and Alex White "were very pleased to be able to do it."
_	This Victorian hotel was built in 1867 along with the Manor Hotel in Mundesley effort to develop into a fashionable seaside resort at the time that nearby Cromer had grown into prominence as a resort.
_	The explanation lies in the course structures at Basel University during much of the time that Mahler taught there.
_	Atarah was awarded the MBE in 1980 for her work in this field and by the time that the band called time, it had played to over three million people.
_	It was said at the time that she had only a twenty percent chance of living to age five, but after almost two years of chemotherapy and herbal therapies she was designated cancer free.
_	The Organization for Security and Co-operation in Europe noted at the time that there were physical assaults and harassment of candidates and campaign workers associated with opposition political parties prior to the March election.
_	Slavery, segregation and African American civil rights were seen as the defining case against fusionism's relevance to modern times because of the insistence by Meyer and others at the time that states rights be preserved even in the face of these demands.
_	Apple co-founder and CEO Steve Jobs had plans to design and build a car, according to Apple board member and J.Crew Group CEO Mickey Drexler, who said that discussions about the concept surfaced around the time that Tesla Motors debuted its first car.
_	He had attached himself to the service of the Thracian chief Seuthes and was residing with him at the time that Xenophon and the remains of the Ten Thousand arrived in Thrace after their memorable retreat in 300 BCE.
_	The festival properly starts at two hours before sunset on that day, which symbolises the time that Bahá'u'lláh entered the garden.
_	It is evident from documents at the time that both the Viceroy Carlos Francisco De Croix and Viceroy Antonio María de Bucareli y Ursúa commissioned work from him.
_	By the time that the Rev. Morgan retired in 1980, the congregation was giving 50% of all general fund contributions to mission work, including providing partial support for 28 missionary families.
_	By the time that filming wrapped on 29 January 1946, the film was $600,000 over budget.
_	It had not been realised at the time that a coin of this size was impracticably small to use, and would prove unpopular.
_	Working initially through the studio Funnies, Inc., one of the comic-book "packagers" of the time that supplied features and complete comic books to publishers testing the waters of the new medium, Pfeufer drew the aquatic antihero in "Marvel Mystery Comics", "Sub-Mariner Comics" (beginning with #6, Summer 1942), "All Winners Comics", "All Select Comics", and at least one issue of "Captain America Comics".
_	Parker apologized, saying he did not know at the time that "it could be in any way offensive or harmful".
_	At the time that Zippy's was first created, there were a lot of Okinawan mom and pop restaurants.
_	Confucius later said, "From the time that I got You, bad words no more came to my ears."
_	At the time that he sings his rap part, shots of him along with the members of Epik High and four women are seen squeezed inside a narrow cubicle.
_	At the time that he left South Vietnam, the American press believed that Viên was one of the wealthiest generals able to escape the country.
_	Just before he is due to go home Herman gives Jacobo a sum of money as compensation for the time that he lost by having to care for their mother.
_	At the time that An arrived at Yecheng, he had only 1,000 infantry soldiers and 300 cavalry soldiers.
_	By the time that the plans were put before the Monitor Board in New York City, Ericsson and Stimers had a poor relationship, and Chief of the Bureau of Construction and Repair John Lenthall had little connection to the board.
_	In 2017, the magazine added that "Dylan fans will forever argue about the precise moment when [Dylan's] career hit rock-bottom but most pin it somewhere around the time that "Down in the Groove" landed with a thud in record stores in May 1988."
_	K&J Logistics operated 30 vehicles at the time that it adopted the York Pullman name.
_	His exploration and mapping was so extensive and thorough for the time that it was not until 1963, 70 years after his death, that major new passageways were discovered in Wind Cave.
_	At the time that he enlisted, he had been appearing on KBS' "Secret" as well as the "Radio Star", for which bandmate Kyuhyun took over the role.
_	The sources also relate some episodes that show al-Wathiq's "intellectual curiosity": he reportedly dreamed that the "Barrier of Dhu'l-Qarnayn" had been breached—probably resulting from news of the movements of the Kirghiz Turks at the time that caused large population shifts among the Turkic nomads of Central Asia—and sent Sallam al-Tarjman to journey to the region and investigate.
_	He admires the fact that his friend has kept his youthful appearance over the time that he has known him.
_	Michael Flavin’s "Benjamin Disraeli: The Novel as a Political Discourse" suggests that Venetia was largely a commercial endeavour for Disraeli, who was deep in debt at the time that he wrote it.
_	Suspicions abounded at the time that Lester was being primed for taking over the film, despite Donner's determination to complete the project at all costs and Lester's assurances to the contrary.
_	By the time that the crater fighting died down, both sides held the near sides of the craters.
_	However, Coleman wrote at the time that "two other major wargame publishers" were rumored to be in talks with the developer.
_	By the time that the plans were put before the Monitor Board in New York City, Ericsson and Simers had a poor relationship, and Chief of the Bureau of Construction and Repair John Lenthall had little connection to the board.
_	While it was stated at the time that channel 40 would go on the air in the first half of 1992, the start of regular operations would not occur for another three years.
_	By the time that the field has reached the climb up to Prati di Tivo, around 25 riders remained in contention for the stage honours.
_	Green had written 10 more songs by the time that he was 12.
_	During the time that Nova possessed Xavier's body, Lilandra became pregnant with their son.
_	Mohawk commentators stated at the time that this was not a surrender, but a cessation of hostilities, as per the burying of weapons of honoured tradition.
_	Their households, as well as that of Han Yuan (who would have suffered execution as well but for the fact that he had already died by the time that executioners arrived at his place of exile), were confiscated to become servants.
_	According to Rabbi Eliyahu Shmuel Schmerler, rosh yeshiva of the Sanz yeshiva in Netanya and a long-time confidante of the Rebbe, "The Rebbe mentioned at the time that the day would come when people would not say 'Kiryat Sanz—that’s near Netanya,' but that 'Netanya was near Kiryat Sanz'".
_	There was a saying at the time that Parkyn was ""So great that all three parishes claimed him"".
_	Adult semen volume is affected by the time that has passed since the previous ejaculation; larger semen volumes are seen with greater durations of abstinence.
_	Huston, who was in Europe at the time that Ruppert was considering the appointment, disliked Huggins and wanted to hire the manager of the National League's crosstown Brooklyn Robins, Wilbert Robinson, his drinking buddy.
_	By the time that Henry died the following year, in total the huge sum of £376,000 had been spent on the Device projects.
_	At the time that Queiroz left Operation Satiagraha, President Luiz Inácio Lula da Silva — without success — called for Quieroz to return to the case.
_	On the other hand, however, Mrs. Bennet is not so merciful, herself; when after Mr. Collins' and Miss Charlotte Lucas' engagement is announced, Mrs. Bennet becomes very paranoid about their plans, any time she saw them talking together up until their wedding, she convinced that they were both just counting down the hours until the time that they can assume possession of Longbourn and 'throw her out to live in the hedgerows' (""Mrs. Bennet was really in a most pitiable state.
_	The Paris Library was built before the time that Carnegie and his secretary James Bertram began to restrict the amount of leeway communities were given in designed their Carnegie libraries.
_	Similarly, the concentration in the ambient air would apply to the time that the person spends outdoors, whereas the concentration in the food that the person ingests would be added.
_	Little is known of the history of the Gbe languages during the time that only Portuguese, Dutch and Danish traders landed on the Gold Coast (roughly 1500 to 1650).
_	Every coronation of the Kutai Kartanegara Sultans, since the time that the first Sultan was inaugurated, had been commemorated with an Erau ceremony.
_	They would rotate out of an alert pad in Spain during the time that the 42nd had them.
_	The FDIC said at the time that IMB Management Holdings LP, a limited partnership composed primarily of hedge funds, controlled IMB Holdco LLC.
_	During the time that it was filmed, Suchet expressed his sadness at his final farewell to the Poirot character whom he had loved:
_	At the time that she and her sister Nellie left, a newspaper correspondent reported they were presented with a dinner and tea service by local inhabitants, including members of the cricket club.
_	His son John said at the time that Ghindia "kept teaching us and providing a great example right up to the end," and added, "Alleluia & Go Blue!"
_	Around the time that toyGuitar was taking off it was announced by Dead To Me that Jack would be re-joining the band, and they are due to release their first record together after an 8-year hiatus in the fall of 2016.
_	By the time that the plans were put before the Monitor Board in New York, NY, Ericsson and Stimers had a poor relationship, and Chief of the Bureau of Construction and Repair John Lenthall l had little connection to the board.
_	The defense based much of their case on Diamond's testimony that Sirhan was suffering from diminished capacity at the time that he fired the deadly shots.
_	Daniel fails to understand and asks again what will happen, and is told: "From the time that the daily sacrifice is abolished and the abomination that causes desolation is set up, there will be 1,290 days.
_	In 1868, around the time that Burford completed his mill, the town of Burfordville was created and construction was completed on the bridge, making the Burfordville bridge the oldest of the four surviving covered bridges in Missouri.
_	So, to enable these young men to marry, the rabbis, in effect, delayed the time that the amount would be payable, when they would be more likely to have the sum.
_	At the 16th Party Congress held in the autumn of 2002, observers noted at the time that six out of the nine new members of Standing Committee were considered part of Jiang's so-called "Shanghai Clique", the most prominent being Vice President Zeng Qinghong, who had served as Jiang's chief of staff for many years, and Vice Premier Huang Ju, a former party chief of Shanghai.
_	During the time that Philip was away with the army, one of the privateers with whom Anne had invested her money, Malachi Rackham, made overtures towards her, which she rejected.
_	The Chicago Sun-Times reported at the time that Rose had made calls listed to telephones in various locations where Basso operated sports betting operations.
_	Lobo basketball was unsuccessful at the time that Johnson Gym opened, and it was rarely more than half-full for games.
_	In this, his system is based on Buddhist systems of the time that divided things into principle (again, li), and function ().
_	This suggests that there is a vocabulary spurt between the time that the child's first word appears, and when the child is able to form more than two words, and eventually, sentences.
_	In the time that followed, the population figures steadily dropped.
_	Jr commented at the time that "the emergence of Namibia as a stable, decent society with a well-managed economy would inspire more rapid change away from apartheid in South Africa."
_	HMS Unicorn is a surviving sailing frigate of the successful "Leda" class, although the original design had been modified by the time that the "Unicorn" was built, to incorporate a circular stern and "small-timber" system of construction.
_	The new state shall, as soon as the necessary arrangements can be made for that purpose, assume and perform all the duties and obligations of this commonwealth, towards the Indians within said district of Maine, whether the same arise from treaties, or otherwise; and for this purpose shall obtain the assent of said Indians, and their release to this commonwealth of claims and stipulations arising under the treaty at present existing between the said commonwealth and said Indians; and as an indemnification to such new state, therefor, this commonwealth when such arrangements shall be completed, and the said duties and obligations assumed, shall pay to said new state, the value of thirty thousand dollars, in manner following, viz: the said commissioners shall set off by metes and bounds, so much of any part of the land within the said district, falling to this commonwealth, in the division of the public lands, hereinafter provided for, as in their estimation shall be of the value of thirty thousand dollars; and this commonwealth shall, thereupon, assign the same to the said new state, or in lieu thereof, may pay the sum of thirty thousand dollars at its election; which election of the said commonwealth, shall be made within one year from the time that notice of the doings of the commissioners, on this subject, shall be made known to the governor and council; and if not made within that time, the election shall be with the new state.
_	The demonstration was held by the National Union of Students of the Philippines (NUSP, ), led by their president Edgar Jopson from Ateneo de Manila University, upon the opening of the Seventh Congress, around the time that President Marcos was giving his fifth State of the Nation Address (SONA).
_	The video is notable for one of the last appearances of Kowalczyk's long hair, which he shaved off around the time that "I Alone" was released as a single.
_	In fact, with a mince pie for a basis the flavor comes to resemble brandy very strongly by the time that the cook, the maid and the mistress of the house and her daughter have added the proper proportion of flavoring, neither one knowing that the others have done likewise.
_	Electric recording which developed during the time that early radio was becoming popular (1925) benefited from the microphones and amplifiers used in radio studios.
_	The award of the VC was originally gazetted under the name 'Gerald Sexton', but he had disclosed his real identity by the time that it was presented to him by King George V at a ceremony at Buckingham Palace on 29 May 1919.
_	Satie was involved in gnostic sects and movements at the time that he began to compose the "Gnossiennes".
_	Several archeological sites relating to that theme were famously excavated around the time that Satie composed the "Gnossiennes".
_	At the time that Zhang Quanyi took over as the mayor of Henan, it was said by historical accounts that the city had been laid waste by the wars, with the remnants of the population gathered within three castles of the city, totaling less than 100 households.
_	A tercio ( "third") or tercio español ("Spanish third") was a Spanish infantry organization during the time that Habsburg Spain dominated Europe in the early modern period.
_	Reverend Kowta was allowed to remain with his family and congregation until the time that all Japanese Americans would be forcibly removed from California.
_	Explaining the lyrical content, Cardle says the song is about not leaning too heavily on the ideals of romance, "I fell in love and it didn't quite work out and how I was feeling at the time that's how I was putting it across in the song, that sometimes it's not the be all and end all."
_	I was taking such a huge amount of speed at the time that I had a massive amount of energy so I just started hoovering around and would come back with bin-liners full of anything with Noddy on.
_	At the time that I started writing "The Sum of All Fears", Jörg Haider was just starting to come into play in Austria.
_	Penalties are either releasable or non-releasable; releasable means that if a goal is scored by either team during the time that the penalty is served, the player serving the penalty can re-enter the play and both teams will once again have an equal amount of players.
_	Her heirs and various interest organizations alleged at the time that her financial affairs had been mismanaged.
_	The Penal Code (1965) was first enacted during the time that Tuvalu was part of the Gilbert and Ellice Islands Colony.
_	He revealed to the media at the time that between 70 and 80 positions would be made redundant from the overall business.
_	Tyner has competed in 311 races in his thirteen-year career from the time that he was 23 years old (in the 1957 season) to the time that he was 36 years old (in the 1970 season).
_	She said at the time that she did so with conflicted emotions: "There was a tremendous amount of pressure from my community, from the third world community, at Yale.
_	By the time that day comes, the princess has used her influence to learn the positions of the lady and the tiger behind the two doors.
_	Virginia athletic director Craig Littlepage stated at the time that "now is not the time to be talking about bragging rights."
_	After a subsequent 6-2 loss against the Army, several players from the Ottawa New Edinburghs were added to the lineup and, by the time that the team was set to depart for St. Moritz, ten of the original eighteen members had been replaced, although Brooks remained.
_	But Meadows boasted a passenger railway stop, a luxury of the time that most small towns did not have.
_	He was born at Viterbo in 1637, and was a pupil of Pietro da Cortona at the time that Ciro Ferri and Romanelli studied under that master.
_	The peloton slowly closed the time down at first, but by the time that the four leaders had gone over the climb and then moved on to the intermediate sprint in L'Aquila, efforts from , and had brought the time gap down to just under two-and-a-half minutes.
_	The department's involvement in policy issues increased substantially during the time that Summers was its secretary.
_	consider that Paley "tends to be overshadowed" by Austin, but the practice continued to design fine buildings throughout the time that Paley was a principal.
_	A spokesman for Nyko said at the time that they "[had] not knowingly violated anyone's intellectual property".
_	In the time that there was a football team at Drexel University, the athletic teams went through multiple name changes.
_	The Pye family had Scots pines planted around the summit, around the time that Faringdon House was rebuilt in the late 18th century.
_	Chepkurgor added at the time that his first wife, Grace, "did not object" to his proposal to Chelsea Clinton.
_	Havens used the Nevis synchrotron to produce neutrons as part of an Atomic Energy Commission project to see if plutonium could be produced without a nuclear reactor, as it was believed at the time that uranium was scarce.
_	Let denote the time that expires between the start of the computation and its end.
_	The Chatham Observer newspaper recorded at the time that although most of the fleet was scrapped, some went on to live a few more years as static facilities in various
_	At the time that Yeats purchased the tower, it had seventy-three stairs that are described in lines 16-18 of the poem:
_	During the time that AESD was active, the Large site also housed the Westinghouse Fusion Power Systems Department (FPSD), which had a role in development and startup of the Tokamak Reactor at the Princeton Plasma Physics Laboratory (PPPL) in 1982.
_	Jaffe was the President of the Society of Hematopathology at the time that the WHO's Revised European-American Classification of Lymphoid Neoplasms (REAL) classification system was developed in 1994; the REAL classification system is now considered the gold standard in hematopathology.
_	The present buildings date from c1780, during the time that Edward Shepherd—after whom the site is now named—was the tenant of the wheel (1749–1794).
_	The Home for Magdalens moved to Montgomery County, Pennsylvania, in 1915, about the time that it was becoming clear that the refuge had outlived its usefulness.
_	Some of these bouquets appeared there during the time that Meagher went missing, but their numbers increased sharply following the news of the discovery of her body on 28 September.
_	In the police report were listed the names of 19 voters who allegedly were either living in Lebanon, or were deceased at the time that their votes were cast.
_	At the time that Li Deyu was made the governor of Zhexi, Zhexi had just suffered through a plot by the officer Wang Guoqing (王國清) to overthrow Li Deyu's predecessor Dou Yizhi, and it was said that after the plot was over, Dou exhausted the circuit treasury trying to placate the soldiers.
_	Welsh played with Weezer from the time that they unofficially regrouped in 1998 until August 2001, when he experienced mental health related issues.
_	Early painting seems to have developed along similar lines to vase-painting, heavily reliant on outline and flat areas of colour, but then flowered and developed at the time that vase-painting went into decline.
_	He decided on fetal physiology as he thought at the time that study of fetuses would allow researchers to study simpler version of more complex adult physiology.
_	In the time that elapsed between the termination of Solrad 8 operations in August 1967 and the orbiting of Solrad 9, solar activity data were obtained using photometers in satellites OSO-4 and OGO-4.
_	By the time that NBC’s contract with the NHL ended after the , they were getting a 3.8 rating.
_	Commissioner Bud Selig stated at the time that Jackson's case was under review, but no decision was issued during Selig's tenure.
_	Around the time that "EE Ticket" was released, Yamaha musical instruments produced a prototype left-handed
_	The difference between the time that females and males spent eating living crickets was not significant, indicating that predatory attack is not necessarily more dominant in just one sex.
_	Sir Thomas More was the Chancellor of England at the time that Coxe had pushed for and gained Frith's freedom from imprisonment.
_	His first play, "Expedition 6", is about the International Space Station mission Expedition 6 that was in orbit at the time that the Space Shuttle Columbia was destroyed on reentry, grounding the U.S. space shuttle program, which was to provide the vehicle for the crew's return to earth.
_	Measles was so common in children at the time that it was not recognised as a disease.
_	When a court awards joint physical custody, the court may divide the time that the child spends time with both parents in a variety of ways, including a standard parenting time schedule, an equal division of time in each parent's home, or potentially with the children living in a home with the each parent coming to that home for parenting time.
_	At the time that Merriam became interested in birds, most bird study was based on collections and skins; however, she was more interested in studying living birds and their behavior in the field.
_	While Pandukabhaya’s uncles were satisfied at the time that they had eliminated their nephew, some years later they became suspicious again when they heard stories of a village boy who looked more like a prince than a herdsman’s son.
_	It was thought at the time that the season was over (other than last regular-season game).
_	At the time that WGN Program Director Dan Fabian requested the new song, "It's a Beautiful Day for a Ball Game" by The Harry Simeone Songsters was the theme song.
_	It was reported at the time that Spanish consumer associations were gathering evidence of possible overcharging.
_	During the time that he was in the contest he had problems with Javier and Dani Rubio.
_	Ever since he began to serve as a junior official, to the time that he served as a chancellor, he made sure that his wagons and clothes were all properly decorated such that they impressed the onlookers.
_	Many potash pits were built in or near areas of suitable deciduous woodlands and as such they are an important landscape features indicating both the processing of wool and the presence of a suitable hardwood woodland present at the site or nearby at the time that potash pits were in use.
_	At the time that the corps' folding was announced, present-day corps President Scott Swaldo was a marching member.
_	About the time that the production system was completely falling apart, there were some opinions to the effect that, "If we can't do satisfactory work, then what's the point of continuing?"
_	In 1981, McClatchy exited from television broadcasting to focus on its newspaper properties; it sold KMJ-TV to San Joaquin Communications, which changed the station's call letters to KSEE on February 27 of that year (McClatchy continued to own KMJ radio until 1987; the TV station had to change its call letters per FCC rules at the time that required TV and radio stations in the same market, but with different owners to use different sets of call letters).
_	At the time, the coup was generally believed to have been successful, although 20th century evidence suggests the rumors at the time that Radama had actually survived the attack and went on to live to old age as a regular citizen were in fact true.
_	It was while she was at Tech that Colley made her first trip to New Orleans, not having realized at the time that she would live most of her life within twenty miles (32 km) of the city.
_	It was known in the White House press corps at the time that Lorena Hickok was a lesbian.
_	As chief of the National Disaster Warning Centre in Thailand, Dharmasaroja publicly stated that a solar eclipse could trigger natural disasters such as earthquakes and tsunamis in Thailand, depending on "the time that the sun unleashed its energy."
_	By the time that Wang Xu reached Zhang Prefecture, his army was running low on food.
_	During the construction of a plant on the Shinano River in the Niigata Prefecture in July 1922, it was reported at the time that Korean workers were being mistreated and murdered.
_	He said at the time that 1956 was the most successful year of his life, when he earned £5000 (average wage then £900) from painting murals in pub lounges that came into existence only when 'six o’clock swill’ was legislated out of existence by reform of hotel licensing hours.
_	Additionally, during the time that NMSU's women's teams were known as the Roadrunners, an arrangement of the theme song from the Warner Bros.
_	Firstly, it focuses upon the time that Essendon's Cameron Clayton stole his headband and his team-mate Tony Buhagiar ended up with it and threw it into the Waverley Park crowd, and combined this with the time in a match against Hawthorn, he was tackled around the neck by Kevin Ablett.
_	McDonnell was quoted as saying he was "astonished at the amount of money [the developers] wanted to spend on art" and noted at the time that he had only seen one other shopping center that spent more on artistic development.
_	However, Zapata was worried that if he did not fully control all the major towns in Morelos by the time that Madero concluded negotiations with Díaz, the demands of his agrarian movement and the issue of the autonomy of Morelos would be ignored or sidelined.
_	In motorsport rallying, a crew's due time is simply the time that they are due at the next time control.
_	By the time that Li Huaiguang arrived in Chang'an's vicinity, Fengtian was under intense siege by Qin troops under Zhu Ci. Li Huaiguang sent his officer Zhang Shao (張韶) to Fengtian to inform Emperor Dezong of his impending arrival, and then attacked Qin forces at Liquan (醴泉, in modern Xianyang) and defeated them.
_	It was believed at the time that Li Huaiguang arrived right on time and that, if he were even three days late, Fengtian would have fallen.
_	It was quite well known at the time that this would likely lead to an immediate inflationary impulse (essentially because the subsequent depreciation of the dollar would boost the demand for exports and increase the cost of imports).
_	It was reported at the time that he did not intend to return to ministry after the war, defending his position that "though the Church [was] right in its principles, it [did] not always follow its principles into practice".
_	According to "The New York Times", an NYBC employee stated at the time that NYBC recognized a responsibility for the lifetime care of the chimps, but NYBC disputes this, stating that its employee's comment was not authorized.
_	Moreover, being a Spanish colony, the island had a primarily Roman Catholic population which appealed to the Irish immigrants, as opposed to the Protestant majorities of most of the colonies of the British Empire and the United States at the time that were openly hostile to Irish immigration.
_	At the time that Dr. Frantzis wrote the article he was unaware of several important factors.
_	It was during the time that he was serving that the Pentecostal Assemblies of the World's procedures regarding the filling of pastoral vacancies was established.
_	Weston was educated at Alleyn's School, Dulwich, during the time that Michael Croft, founder of the National Youth Theatre, was there creating drama of a very high standard.
_	Yet it was readily apparent at the time that the fracturing of planes in many Precisionist paintings originates in the Cubism of Picasso and Léger; similarly, Precisionist renderings of shafts of light as rigidly drawn "lines of force" is a clear borrowing from Futurism.
_	In addition to phonological similarities between these names and "*ŋʷjat-kje" and Tukhāra, Henning pointed out that the Guti could have migrated from the Zagros to Gansu, by the time that the Yuezhi entered the historical record in China, during the 1st millennium BC.
_	Around the time that monarchies were common, the Funck family was of nobility.
_	This layer has usually been stripped away by sand and surf by the time that the empty shells are washed up on the beach, and the valves are usually found singly, because the muscles that hold them together are weak.
_	Their eyes open at around 12 days, and the kittens begin to take solid food at two months, around the time that they begin actively climbing.
_	At last, the trunk was given a decent burial in the monastery, and it was noted at the time that Clifford had lately dreamed of his own capture by O'Donnell and of being carried by monks into their convent.
_	About the time that "The Genesis Flood" was having a large impact in the evangelical world, a number of progressive Adventist scholars educated in secular universities began promoting Theistic Evolution.
_	It was double the time that in 1938, when services operated by Central Argentine took 9 hours to connect both cities with two intermediate stops.
_	By the time that Haggard began writing "She", society had more anxiety about the role of women.
_	It was believed at the time that Wu Yuanheng's assassins were sent by Wu Yuanji's ally Wang Chengzong the military governor of Chengde Circuit (成德, headquartered in modern Shijiazhuang, Hebei).
_	At the time that the Institute was granted a Royal Charter in 1912, full membership was only open to "men working in insurance."
_	He stated at the time that he was 28 years of age.
_	In January 2010, it approved a draft law to provide social assistance to trafficking victims bridging the time that they leave the shelters until they find employment.
_	Four years later, the company felt that Hertz and Advantage were using slogans at the time that imitated its own too closely.
_	Information at the time that the tax agency office took over the duties of issuing ID cards was also incomplete or vague regarding who could vouch for your identity, leading to confusion both among applicants and among employees.
_	This was according to custom of the time that Elizabeth Gordon, of her own free will, resigned her lands before Parliament at Perth and she and the Regent Albany issued a new charter of "All and whole of the lands and baronies of Gordon and Huntly lying within the sheriffdom of Berwick; the lands of Fogo and Faunes with their pertinents; the lands of Strathbogie and Beldygordon with the pertinents in Aberdeenshire; to be held by the said Alexander and Elizabeth and their heirs lawfully procreated; whom failing the true and lawful heirs of the said Elizabeth whomsoever; rendering the services used and wont."
_	That the defendant did so knowingly; that is to say, that the defendant knew at the time that he (she) was acting to prevent an arrest by a police officer acting under color of his (her) official authority.
_	He wrote to his mistress of the time that "the poor boy had become more of an animal than anything else."
_	From the time that the family Monimiaceae was established by Jussieu in 1809, until it was monographed by Philipson in 1993, it was usually circumscribed to include three distinct groups in the Laurales, which are recognized in the APG III system as the separate families Siparunaceae, Atherospermataceae, and Monimiaceae "sensu stricto".
_	It was felt at the time that, precisely because most soldiers in combat were afraid, an example needed to be made of men who deserted.
_	She wants for a child not only because she longs for one but also because during the time that she lives that's all a woman could hope for.
_	The reason these may not appear and be cut from an episode is either because of the language used or the highly politically incorrect answers the panel members give, at the time that the show was broadcast:
_	Crookes concluded at the time that this showed that cathode rays had momentum, so the rays were likely matter particles.
_	Fadi says "I've waited a long time for this moment," referring to the time that Bourne killed his sister (which we later learn is untrue).
_	That auction lasted the time that a candle takes to consume (although some times it was three candles' time), and the job was given to the master whose bid was on top at that moment.
_	The statue was then removed around the time that the William Huskisson was toppled from its pedestal in 1988.
_	These benefits are only present when recipients are actually distressed during the time that the supportive act takes place.
_	In August 2016, Sharp spoke to the media saying "I'm totally disappointed in the NRL's decision in finding me guilty of being part of a system that defrauded the salary cap, That never happened, but I have to live by the decisions of the NRL,I'm not saying it didn't occur I'm saying that I didn't have the knowledge at the time that this stuff was happening,I don't apologise for something I wasn't aware of,I've lost the love of the game over the last 18 months, I still love Parramatta and I care about the club but I've lost the love of the game, and going back to my earliest memory, I've always had it.
_	The stimulus for this change had built gradually from Miller's first studio recording in 1981: "my recording activity increased and by the time that it got into 1986–87 I was on so many records it was unbelievable until eventually it became rather overwhelming and stressful, so I had to cut back."
_	This was also the time that the mall saw an original anchor depart, but a new anchor take its place from downtown.
_	Josh Homme stated at the time that Hernández was the only drummer considered for the job.
_	Despite the length of the marriage that Empress Wang had with Emperor Gaozong, she did not bear him a son, and by the time that she became empress, he had already had four sons with his concubines—and the mother of the fourth son Li Sujie, Consort Xiao, who had also given birth to two daughters (the later Princesses Yiyang and Gao'an), was particularly favored.
_	Since it was deemed by the government of the time that a referendum solely for that purpose "would rightly be seen as a time wasting and expensive exercise", the lacuna was filled in 2009 by a new offence of "publication or utterance of blasphemous matter", against any religion, under the Defamation Act 2009, section 36.
_	For the next three years, she slowed down in making movies releasing only a handful including her final team-up with Dolphy, "My Bugoy Goes to Congress", which was a hit during the time that it was released.
_	Garland explained to a reporter at the time that he would not accept money from "a system which starves thousands while hundreds are stuffed" and which "leaves a sick woman helpless and offers its services to a healthy man."
_	Art historians such as Strehlke and Bruce Cole claim that it is highly likely that during the time that Domenico worked as a Gharzone for the Opera's projects, he received many influences from many of the mentioned sculptors.
_	The New Zealand Herald reported at the time that then Member of Parliament (and now a New Zealand Cabinet Minister), Dr Wayne Mapp (who was also a former associate professor of law) said "“the decision was a "clear warning shot"" to the Government.
_	With a gun in hand, she shows up at the Chandler mansion, looking for Emma, at the time that Stuart Chandler, Adam's twin, is mistakenly shot.
_	Wass secured College very clean ball after pushing the hot two posts—indeed, it was said at the time that the rules of hotting could be simplified to "the winning hot is whichever hot has Sam Wass in it".
_	Around March 1945, "Z20 Karl Galster" was transferred to the Baltic Sea where she helped to escort convoys of refugee ships and also rescued evacuees herself in May, around the time that Germany surrendered.
_	It is also to sell time since the usurer charges, in effect, for the time that the money is in the hands of the borrower.
_	In the time that followed, Sandberg made several more oil paintings that gained him recognition at various shows.
_	At the time that was the largest rookie contract in NFL history.
_	It was suggested in the popular media of the time that the Takarazuka "otokoyaku" (the woman playing the masculine role) caused women in Class S relationships to become "ome" couples (butch and femme), and persist in homosexual relationships long after it was acceptable.
_	Another story tells of Morrison naming the drink after Charles T. Pepper because the doctor granted Morrison permission to marry Pepper's daughter, but the girl in question was only eight years old at the time that Morrison moved to Waco.
_	Now was the time that merchants built more substantial brick buildings, many with architectural significance.
_	But "the thought of God, the thought of prayer did not even enter my mind, either that day, or all the rest of the time that I was ill, or that whole year.
_	Opponents of the creation of Nevada State College feared at the time that its creation would take resources from UNLV.
_	Marjorie Rosen, the historian of women in films, says of the two top blonde bombshells of the time that "Mae West, firing off vocal salvos with imperious self-assurance, and Jean Harlow, merchandising her physical allure for the masses, transformed the idea of passive female sexuality into an aggressive statement of fact".
_	With the Roman takeover of the Rhine’s left bank in the last century of the pre-Christian era, the time that followed brought the Treveri, a people of mixed Celtic and Germanic stock, cultural dominance, but enrichment, too.
_	Japan was dependent on U.S. oil, and it was thought at the time that such would be a provocative step.
_	At the time that it was negotiated it was anticipated that the terms of Treaty 3 would serve as a model for future treaties and would require the amendment of Treaties 1 and 2 [Letter from Minister of the Interior Campbell to Lieutenant-Governor Morris, 5 August 1873, Public Archives of Canada ("PAC"), RG10, Vol. 1904].
_	She has described the time that she spent at Kalatty between the ages of 5 and 8, before her parents' divorce, as her "happiest".
_	Stanfel said at the time that it was his respect for Ditka that lured him back to coaching: "I respect the man.
_	The US government announced at the time that the task force could help evacuate Pakistani forces from East Pakistan following a ceasefire.
_	By the time that Straight Deal reappeared in 1943 he had made excellent physical progress, with the "Sporting Life's" correspondent commenting that the colt had "strength written everywhere on his frame."
_	Commentator Pat Buchanan reported at the time that "Washington Post" columnist David Ignatius, who traveled often to Iraq and supported the war, said the generals "mirror the views of 75 percent of the officers in the field, and probably more".
_	Projects on the boards during the time that Willis worked with Hunt and his partner Elmer Grey include:the Edith Daniels House, in Aradia, CA (1904), the Livingston Jenks House, San Rafael, CA (1904), the Astronomer's House (aka The Monastery) and other buildings, at the Mount Wilson Observatory, Mount Wilson, CA (1904), the Thomas H. Foote House, East Colorado Street, Pasadena, CA (1905), and the J.W. Gillespie House, in Montecito, CA.
_	During the time that Margarete Dessoff lived in Frankfurt, the Dessoff family home was across the street from the aunt and uncle of the American banker Felix Warburg.
_	From the time that Hernán Cortés crossed Petén in the early 16th century, the Spanish mistakenly believed the king of the Itza (the "Aj Kan Ek"') was the overlord of the entire central Petén region.
_	The carpentry work was removed from the Cathedral in 1883 at the time that the central tower of the Cathedral was in danger of collapse.
_	Mantle did not know at the time that most of the men in his family had inhaled lead and zinc dust in the mines, which contribute to Hodgkins' and other cancers.
_	During the time that he served he was exposed to the racism of the day which left a mark in his beliefs towards the relationship of Puerto Ricans and the United States, thus becoming a leading advocate for Puerto Rican independence.
_	One rule states that players may not delay their move beyond the time that it takes for their partner to make three moves.
_	In 2008, Classic Media acquired the rights to the series and stated at the time that they intended to release the entire series on DVD.
_	He said at the time that he had had a lifelong complex about his nose to the extent that he could not mix socially.
_	It was also noted that, at the time that difficulties were emerging for Great Southern, its CEO sold some of his shares at the top of the companies' fortunes for $32.6 million.
_	By the time that the Thirtieth United States Congress was sworn in (in December 1847), the General Assembly had divided the state's counties into two districts, which in August 1847 had elected their own representatives, William Thompson in Iowa's 1st congressional district and Leffler in Iowa's 2nd congressional district.
_	Troops were encamped on Nigger head road – about the boundary of the City of Wilmington N.C."," and that they remained there from the time that he got to Wilmington in July 1864 to the end of the war, in May, 1865.
_	Within three years following the end of the Second World War, India, Pakistan, and Ceylon became independent realms within the Commonwealth (then still called "Dominions"), though it was made clear at the time that India would soon move to a republican form of government.
_	Black, who is gay, was an avid fan of "", on which Pedro Zamora was a cast member, though Black himself was still in the closet at the time that it originally aired.
_	He later served as Lieutenant Governor during the time that Jimmy Carter was Governor.
_	PTAF signed with Capitol Records around the time that Nicki Minaj released an unauthorized remix of "Boss Ass Bitch".
_	However, by 1963 the Decepticons had raided the "Ark" and removed all but five of the pillars and hid them on the Moon along with an army of hundreds of Decepticons, awaiting the time that the pillars would be used.
_	Boris Ephrussi was a pioneer in questioning the consensus at the time that heredity could be accounted for exclusively by nuclear genes.
_	Around the time that "The Sacred Harp" was first prepared, it appears that pitchers sometimes used a pitch pipe, sometimes not.
_	According to Gerald A. Larue, Josephus' listing represents what came to be the Jewish canon, although scholars were still wrestling with problems of the authority of certain writings at the time that he was writing.
_	The aircraft's altitude and the type of bomb being used were used to calculate the time that the bomb would take to reach the ground, and when that was multiplied by the airspeed, the range was produced.
_	She later described her time spent on "Star Trek: The Next Generation" as "miserable", and it was well known at the time that she was unhappy with the way her role had been developed.
_	By the time that Alex is proven to be a fraud, he and Marlena have renewed their vows, and left on a honeymoon.
_	Critics of the Book of Mormon claim there are places where the language is anachronistic and suggestive of a 19th-century origin consistent with Smith's upbringing and life experience, as well as the books and other literature published just preceding the time that the Book of Mormon was published.
_	By the time that the Camden 28 were brought to trial in the Spring of 1973, their case was viewed by many as a referendum on the Vietnam War.
_	There were several independent comic titles at the time that employed computer lettering, but none as high-profile as "Flaming Carrot".
_	Further, it happened at the time that there were droughts, floods, and locust-driven famines throughout various parts of the Later Jin realm.
_	The popular Irish claim made at the time that most of the men serving in the Black and Tans had criminal records and had been recruited straight from British prisons is incorrect, as a criminal record would disqualify one from working as a policeman.
_	Rated as one of Slade's most evocative videos, Powell noted in his diary at the time that "we go "Amadeus" on the video", in reference to the 1984 American period drama film of the same name.
_	Despite Pei's high status, little is firmly established about his career except for the time that he served as chancellor—as, unusual for a chancellor, he did not have a biography in either the "Old Book of Tang" or the "New Book of Tang".
_	The book covers Archie's and Cooper's lives and careers, and Manning's life and career up to the time that the book was released, and examines football from both Archie's and Manning's points-of-view.
_	Nocturnal demons are associated with erotic dreams and the time that Romauld shares with Clarimonde in his dream-space is certainly erotic.
_	Around the time that he moved to live in Muswell Hill, he took a keen interest in bee keeping, and discovered how bees created the hexagon-shaped cells in their hives.
_	At the direction of Stalin, Soviet authorities forcibly unified the Communist Party of Germany and Social Democratic Party into the SED, claiming at the time that it was a legitimate Socialist/Communist organisation and would not have a Stalinist, anti-Marxist orientation.
_	By the time that the most advanced logic system was introduced for SQ, the "Tate Directional Enhancement System", by Martin Willcocks and Peter Scheiber, realized into the superb Tate II 101A decoder by Jim Fosgate, "quad" was already considered a failure.
_	But the overall figure of 143 years has been preserved by a fortuitous circumstance: it is repeated in three instances in Josephus, and in one of these instances it is not given as simply 143 years, but as 155 years from the start of Hiram's reign until the time that construction began for the Temple, which was in Hiram's 12th year ("Against Apion" 1.17,18).
_	There were rumours at the time that McInnes had asked Beaven that his son, William Wallace Burns McInnes, a federal Member of Parliament, be included in his cabinet.
_	At the time that King Norodom (1860–1904) the eldest son of King Ang Duong, who ruled on behalf of Siam, signed the Treaty of Protection with France in 1863, the capital of Cambodia resided at Oudong, about 45 kilometres northeast of Phnom Penh.
_	The company stated at the time that Woolfolk would help the company's development and implementation of steroid testing for Texas high school athletes.
_	An individual person is accountable for their actions/decisions/instructions, subject to prosecution in both national and international law, from the time that they have reached age of majority, often though not always more or less coinciding with the granting of voting rights, tax and military duties/ individual right to bear arms (protected only under certain constitutions).
_	By the time that Arnold reached the settlements above the Saint Lawrence River in November, his force was reduced to 600 starving men.
_	Kgosi Mothibi, son of Molehebangwe, had succeeded as leader of the BaTlhaping by the time that William Burchell visited there in 1811.
_	During the time that radio programs were the dominant medium in the United States, some programs advertised "souvenirs" of the various shows, which were sometimes called radio premiums.
_	Images of the streets in Canada were taken early on by Immersive Media, the contractor used by Google at the time that took most of the early images.
_	Personnel from a small outpost on Allan Cay were evacuated to Grand Bahama, despite indications at the time that Betsy would curve away from the Bahamas or the East Coast of the United States.
_	It was planned to be situated outside the main entrance of the City Hospital in . made drawings and a model of the sculpture in a workshop he set up in an unfinished wing of the hospital during the time that he was a patient there.
_	During the time that the ride operated, the park also operated a similar outdoor Jet Star III coaster, the Beast.
_	Feigin was 102 years and 199 days old at the time that this last exhibition opened.
_	Although the material borrowed from Yusuf al-Warraq dated from the 10th century, he also included information on events that occurred close to the time that he wrote.
_	Around the time that Hove Borough Council was merged with Brighton Council to form the Brighton and Hove unitary authority 1997-8, they instead sold it for circa £300,000 to Sirus Taghan.
_	Although some records suggest that she was renamed to "Penguin" on 2 October 1798, she was already sailing under the name "Penguin" at the time that she captured her first prize in 1796.
_	The issue of settlements throws up the particular and fairly extreme view of the religious-right in Israel at the time that believed negotiating over territory and the possibility of Palestinian self-rule in the religiously symbolic territories undermined what it meant to be Israeli.
_	It was suspected at the time that the bomb had been placed outside the church by anarchists, particularly the "Galleanist" faction led by adherents of Luigi Galleani.
_	In 1500, about the time that the church was rebuilt, Richard Bulkeley was Archdeacon of Anglesey and so would have been involved in the work here, and is likely to have contributed towards the cost.
_	The south-east of the constituency included some Edgware Road frontage which included the Metropolitan Theatre of Varieties music hall, a famous entertainment centre which was open for almost all of the time that the constituency was in existence.
_	The last song on the album they had to record in Thunderload studio, Sweden, since it was one of the few studios at the time that had the gear to record the over 20 minute epic "The Chronicle of the Seven Seals".
_	During an interview on Lou Dobbs Tonight, Toensing was ask about what she may have learned from the informant, she claimed that "It’s quite significant", the informant “can tell what all the Russians were talking about during the time that all these bribery payments were made”.
_	Unlike most distilleries of the time that looked like little more than a sawmill sitting in a thicket, Taylor's distillery on Glenn's Creek, near Frankfort, was designed to resemble a medieval castle with the landscaped grounds of an estate.
_	His wife had died of pancreatic cancer during the time that he worked on the DNZB.
_	It was said at the time that "he looked as though he were about to molest the child."
_	It was reported at the time that "Oscar Arce is a wizard of ball control who was so determined to play for Aston Willa that he completed a two-year residential qualification in this country".
_	Evans was unaware at the time that the striking red cliffs along the coast had been remarked on much earlier when the Dutch ship Duyfken under Willem Janszoon charted the shores of Gulf of Carpentaria, making landfall at the Pennefather River in the Gulf of Carpentaria (the first authenticated European discovery of Australia), and again, in 1802, by Matthew Flinders.
_	The writer of the time that the weight of the ships was such that several old olive trees, which had been set the winches, were literally torn from the ground and that, to stop the descent, resorted to the advent of waiting for the strong wind that blowing from the south in the afternoon and explaining the sails to lighten the weight of the ships.
_	It was widely discussed in the media at the time that most of the players signed by Baldini were not performing as well as had been expected.
_	At the time that the "Rescript" was sent, Honorius was holed up in Ravenna by the Visigoths and was unable to prevent their Sack of Rome (410).
_	Thus, Jijabai became the acting regent during the time that her adopted son was a minor.
_	Conversely, at the time that a noble or a commoner become a member of the Imperial family, such as through marriage, his or her family name is lost.
_	The film speaks about the ending of World War II, at about the time that Malcolm X entered prison.
_	At the time that they broke away from Penguin Books, Signet and Mentor correlated to Penguin's original series of Penguin and Pelican.
_	It was thought at the time that the flightless (and "primitive") penguin might shed light on an evolutionary link between reptiles and birds through its embryo.
_	For example, according to the time that they act, relative to a security incident:
_	WHTT was the callsign for the current Boston, MA radio station WODS, a classic hits station at the time that played the same music the fictional WHTT apparently airs before flipping to Top 40 in 2012 as "103.3 Amp Radio".
_	Allen & Sracic show results where measurements were acquired with CSLDV in a hundredth of the time that would be required for LDV.
_	This coat, along with the quarterly shield as the great seal, prevailed in the time that followed, and the Royal conferral acceded to Wachenheim’s wish to be allowed to bear both coats, albeit with a chief added to the great arms with a black W.
_	From the time that the synagogue was deconsecrated in 1929, it underwent numerous changes.
_	However, it was widely believed at the time that her dismissal was in response to her activities promoting the equality of African-Americans during a time when the leading citizens of the city were not ready to face equality for all.
_	Hecker later testified before the United States Congress that while North Korea seems to have successfully extracted plutonium from the spent fuel rods, he saw no evidence at the time that they had actually produced a workable weapon.
_	They did however incorrectly believe at the time that Shoshone Lake was the source of the Firehole and Madison Rivers.
_	Georgia created a cumulative poll tax requirement in 1877: men of any race 21 to 60 years of age had to pay a sum of money for every year from the time they had turned 21, or from the time that the law took effect.
_	The series provoked such a press outcry at the time that the BBC banned its overseas sale, since it was deemed to have portrayed Britain's police and criminal justice system in such a wholly unfavourable light.
_	The same range of Holden Caprice almost got imported in North America right around the time that the Impala 9C1 based on the 8th generation Impala in FWD form was about to hit the police market.
_	At the time that Churchill made the speech both the United States and his own government publicly disagreed with him.
_	The station first signed on back in 1986 as KKRE; broadcasting a Christian Adult Contemporary format and was a handful of stations at the time that did an all Christian music format.
_	She said that despite the Martin Luther King Jr. being away from his children at times, "his children knew that Daddy loved them, and the time that he spent with them was well spent."
_	The same year, at the time that his own father became mayor, he was named captain of the "Schutterij", a function which he continued until his death in 1644.
_	He considered writing in the Dutch language although at the time that language was believed to be unfit for literature as French was the language of the educated and the ruling class.
_	They have lived in the area that today is the Southwestern USA from the time that the area represented the northernmost region of the colony of New Spain.
_	States cannot take reservations after they have accepted the treaty; a reservation must be made at the time that the treaty affects the State.
_	At the time that Herivel started work at Bletchley Park, Hut 6 was having only limited success with Enigma-enciphered messages, mostly from the Luftwaffe Enigma network known as "Red".
_	Their romance began in 1991; St. John stated at the time that he wanted the series to "take its time as romance blossoms" between Neil and Drucilla.
_	By the time that a spring had been found at the site of the rooms in 1811 Leamington already had a reputation as an up-and-coming spa resort.
_	Nonant supported John's side throughout the time that Richard was on Crusade and in captivity, and was tried with John after Richard's return to England in 1194.
_	However, his poetry took off after reading Schiller's play, "Robbers", and composing a sonnet in response dedicated to Schiller during December near the time that he composed his sonnet to Bowles.
_	Many commentators, both at the time that Descartes wrote and since, have argued that this involves a circular argument, as he relies upon the principle of clarity and distinctness to argue for the existence of God, and then claims that God is the guarantor of his clear and distinct ideas.
_	His fellow artist Walter Sickert wrote at the time that Nevinson's painting "La Mitrailleuse", 'will probably remain the most authoritative and concentrated utterance on the war in the history of painting.'
_	Hillel say that "when you lie down and when you arise" (ובשכבך ובקומך) comes to tell us that it is recited at the time that people are lying down and rising, and not the physical position one should be in while reciting.
_	Frank Bowden, a recent convert to cycling who on medical advice had toured extensively on a tricycle, first saw a Raleigh bicycle in a shop window in Queen Victoria Street, London, about the time that William Ellis’s investment in the cycle workshop was beginning to take effect.
_	By the time that the disease was halted in October 2001, the crisis was estimated to have cost the United Kingdom £8bn (US$16bn).
_	During each full cycle of four periods, two periods (passage along the "long" sides of the rectangle) control the time that the bolt takes to drive forward and load a round into the chamber, and how quickly it extracts it.
_	His reputation for healings was so great at the time that a reference is made to him in the famous novel "Ulysses" by James Joyce.
_	Seeming to borrow from a common idea at the time that the Earth's atmosphere was conductive, he proposed a system composed of balloons suspending, transmitting, and receiving, electrodes in the air above in altitude, where he thought the lower pressure would allow him to send high voltages (millions of volts) long distances.
_	Sports writers in Philadelphia joked at the time that this older team emphasized the "veteran" in their home ballpark, Veterans Stadium.
_	In 2013, Vado signed with We the Best Music Group after his personal friendship with Cam'ron eroded, although Vado maintained at the time that they still worked on a business level and had no animosity towards him.
_	At the time that pre-production started on "Ragtag" in mid-2015, about 30 employees were assigned to it, with plans to bring the remaining 30 aboard once they completed "Hardline".
_	At the time that the Monmouth School for Girls was established, Mary Ellen Bagnall-Oakeley was appointed as a governor, along with three other women, and was responsible for managing the school.
_	It continued to work together with other rebel groups throughout early 2014, stating at the time that its aim was to "fight so that Syrian men and women may choose a free and democratic system that establishes a prosperous state respecting the aspirations of Syrians in the freedom and dignity for which they have fought."
_	This Frederick of Augustenburg had become the symbol of the nationalist German independence movement in Schleswig-Holstein since the time that his father, in exchange for compensation, had renounced his claims as first in line to inherit the twin Duchies of Schleswig and Holstein following the London Protocol of 8 May 1852, which concluded the First War of Schleswig.
_	His motivation for disliking Ross is jealousy (as he is aware of Ross' relationship with Rachel), which is made clear numerous times, most notably in "The One the Morning After" when he reveals to Rachel that Ross (who mistakenly thought at the time that his relationship with her was over—"We were on a break") got drunk and cheated on her.
_	He said at the time that he had no idea who or what motive might have been behind the attack.
_	In summer 551, when Hou was defeated by Xiao Yi's general Wang Sengbian, Hou fled back to Jiankang, and his fleet was in such a disarray at the time that Xiao Daqi had an opportunity to escape to Northern Qi, and Xiao Daqi's attendants largely encouraged him to do so.
_	With some exceptions, the lien attaches or relates back to a time prior to the time that any notice of it appears in the public records.
_	Virginia suffered several droughts around the time that the Jamestown settlement was established, which limited the abilities of both the natives and the new settlers to provide for themselves.
_	At the time that the new Eta College was emerging, new legislation and regulations that governed South African education were brought about.
_	I think I must have lost control, because I have only a vague recollection of the time that elapsed afterwards.
_	On 5 October 2014, after a 7-month hiatus, Day released a statement defending himself from the allegations, announcing that he "didn't realise at the time that [the women] felt pressured", and apologised to them.
_	At the time that the term was coined, Herbert Smith’s corporate practice was focused on privatisation work, which had dried up.
_	At the time that the list was released in December 2011, Mountain stated in response: "I feel like I’ve influenced in the sense that if you want to do it, do it.
_	Little did he realize at the time that he had just embarked on a career of service to the world's poorest families that would continue uninterrupted for the next four decades of his life.
_	Federer's loss at the time caused widespread shock and uproar, and Federer referred to having 'created a monster' due to the expectations from the media at the time that Federer must win everything.
_	They achieved limited federal recognition in 1956 as an ethnic Indian nation by a special act of the US Congress, and accepted at the time that it was without benefits.
_	Although originally French dances of rustic provenance, danced to the dancers' singing, the branle was adopted, like other folk-dances, into aristocratic use by the time that printed books allow us to reconstruct the dances.
_	He commanded the 4th Cavalry Brigade, consisting of the 11th, 12th, and 16th light dragoons, at the Battle of Waterloo, and from the time that The Earl of Uxbridge was wounded and had to leave the field he commanded, as next senior, the whole of the British cavalry at Waterloo, and during the advance on Paris until Louis XVIII entered the capital (on 8 July).
_	At the time that these regular earthquakes began to affect the village, there was a lack of seismic stations in the okrug.
_	This was in contrast to the usual, protracted barrages at the time that gave the defenders time to bring up reserves and evacuate forward trenches while damaging the battlefield so badly that it was hard for attackers to advance.
_	Sun stated at the time that they were concerned about preventing forking of the Java platform.
_	He resisted the trend in the Japan at the time that advocated completely Western and modern approach to design.
_	By the time that the plans were put before the Monitor Board in New York City, Ericsson and Simers had a poor relationship, and Chief of the Bureau of Construction and Repair John Lenthall had little connection to the board.
_	Around the time that Tiwa grows into her teens and first performs Draag meditation, which allows the species to travel with their minds, she loses some interest in Terr, who has become a young man and acquired much Draag knowledge.
_	The pastor, Rev. Rudolph Juarez stated at the time that the current church building was probably a total loss.
_	By the time that the plans were put before the Monitor Board in New York City, Ericsson and Stimers had a poor relationship, and Chief of the Bureau of Construction and Repair John Lenthall had little connection to the board.
_	However, by the time that Macquarie arrived in Sydney, both Macarthur and Johnston had already sailed for England to defend themselves.
_	This was about the time that the synagogue now visible was built.
_	At the time that KNXV had been named Phoenix's new ABC affiliate in 1994, the station already had been building a news department under General Manager Raymond Hunt.
_	Gold mining along the Motloutse and Limpopo rivers started around 1200 CE, about the time that Great Zimbabwe rose to become a regional power.
_	In the time that Gates was there, research focused mainly on honey production, brood diseases, wax extraction and horticultural pollination in the cucumber and cranberry industries.
_	The first four "Dragon Quest" titles were subjected to censorship in their North American localizations, largely in keeping with Nintendo of America's content guidelines at the time that placed severe restrictions on religious iconography and mature content.
_	It was reported at the time that every single building in Peldon was damaged in some way, including the local church, causing heavy financial ramifications for the local area.
_	His wife and the three youngest of his five children all died at the time that they joined the body of the Mormons in heading west.
_	Borg and Dubé were co-presidents of NDP McGill (the NDP student group at McGill University) at the time that they both won election to Parliament, and both had spent the campaign working to re-elect Thomas Mulcair in the nearby riding of Outremont.
_	The complainants noted at the time that they were met by institutional resistance from the University of Konstanz and any consequences imposed by the University were never reported.
_	About the time that the Rose McClendon Players closed in 1942, Campbell was chosen by the Army to produce Black USO camp shows.
_	At the time that she entered the race, Kassebaum was legally separated from her husband Philip but not yet divorced.
_	She said "I was so ignorant at the time that I didn't know that any other Bangor existed, so it was categorically this Bangor, and it was Bangor because it scanned and for no other reason than that.
_	The poems themselves appear to have been composed over a long period of time, from the time of Alexander the Great until the time that paganism gave way in the Roman Empire.
_	It was led by Field Marshal José Ramón Rodil at the time that Luis López Ballesteros was Minister of Finance.
_	He claimed at the time that the condition was due to physical training in service.
_	However Gorospe lost the leader's jersey and Delgado took over the leadership but could not regain the time that Italian Marco Giovannetti had gained and ended the race second overall behind Giovannetti.
_	Later he was adjutant general and chief of staff of Gen. Martindale during the time that the latter commanded the Department of Washington.
_	It has been said that it was the process of whites working along blacks during the time that encouraged a breaking down of social barriers and a healthy recognition of diversity.
_	During the time that Proserpina resides with Pluto, the world goes through winter, a time when the earth is barren.
_	This is due to the perception of the time that pistol shooters, especially in free pistol, were professionals who competed in tournaments which awarded prized money.
_	By the time that Cornish was recognised by the UK government under the European Charter for Regional or Minority Languages in 2002, it had become recognised that the existence of multiple orthographies was unsustainable with regards to using the language in education and public life, as none had achieved a wide consensus.
_	The company stated at the time that it expected business to continue as normal in the event of such a filing, although one analyst believed attendance at the company's parks would decrease by six percent, suggesting parents would be leery of letting their children ride a roller coaster operated by a bankrupt company.
_	Further, Flick adds that the term was "universally acknowledged and accepted" by the time that the Erie Canal was completed in 1825.
_	Some comedians joked at the time that the reason why the rescue took so long was because cables and wires being used by broadcasters at the site were blocking the path.
_	By the time that added section was completed in 1970, Indiana had obtained federal approval to sign it as I-465 as well, resulting in the creation of the dogleg part of I-465 outside of the loop (now I-865 as noted above).
_	Pep Band Director Adam Lorentson said at the time that "cost is the key reason the University does not have a traditional marching band."
_	At the time that SH-42 was commissioned, its northern terminus was at SH-41, which was later renumbered to SH-152.
_	By the time that they were first flown Hanriot and Ruchonnet had already started work on a series of closely related monoplane designs, which were exhibited at the "Salon d'Automobiles, d'Aeronautique, du Cycles et des Sports", which opened in Brussels on 16 January 1910.
_	The technology and design firm Modlife was then founded by DeLonge in 2007, around the time that Blink-182 decided to part ways.
_	"Sega Saturn Magazine" commented at the time that "this is quickly becoming a joke of a situation.
_	Bentley had not previously mentioned this in any of her earlier debriefings or testimonies, and there was no evidence at the time that Bentley had any role in this transfer.
_	It was intended as a replacement for the Breguet 693 but testing was incomplete by the time that France surrendered to Germany, and no production followed.
_	It was reported at the time that city officials were in negotiations with the American Hockey League for an expansion franchise.
_	It was thought at the time that empty space was filled with a background medium called the luminiferous aether in which the electromagnetic field existed.
_	Alexei Moiseev, chief economist at Russia's VTB Capital, said at the time that "a '91-style meltdown is almost inevitable," referring to the crisis which accompanied the dissolution of the Soviet Union.
_	At the time that Emperor Muzong took the throne, he inherited a state that had just recently been, during his father's reign (which was known as the Yuanhe Restoration (元和中興), due to Emperor Xianzong's era name's being "Yuanhe"), restored to unity under the imperial government after various circuits, the most defiant of which were Pinglu (平盧, headquartered in modern Tai'an, Shandong), Weibo (魏博, headquartered in modern Handan, Hebei), Chengde (成德, headquartered in modern Shijiazhuang, Hebei), and Lulong (盧龍, headquartered in modern Beijing), had been effectively independent from the imperial government.
_	Lloyd Webber stated at the time that, even if a Broadway production did not happen, he felt that he had closed the chapter on the piece, as the filmed version is something he's, "very, very proud of" and it does not really matter to him, "if it comes tomorrow or five years' time".
_	It was alleged at the time that American prisoners of war who had confessed had been "brainwashed".
_	The first nine pages, printed in italic, consist of a letter of the unknown friend, M.H., in which he looks back to the time of their common period as students, to the time that Petty became a professor in Oxford, and to the time he became the chief physician to the governors of Ireland.
_	Cīttalai Cāttanār, the author of the "Manimekalai" reflected Tamilakam's perception at the time that Nāka Nadu was an autonomous administrative entity, kingdom or "nadu" stretching across coastal districts, distinguished from the rest of the island also ruled intermittently by Tamil kings; Eela or Irattina Tivu-Nadu.
_	It was during the time that Fritz studied under renowned palentologist William Arthur Parks that she took on a leadership role in the North American study of Ordovician Bryozoa.
_	It is not known when Li Zi was born, but as his oldest brother Li Wen was born in 833, and Li Zi was already born by the time that his father Li Chen became emperor (as Emperor Xuānzong) in 846, he must have been born between those dates.
_	Before then, WUPL was one of two television stations in New Orleans at the time that whose ownership held interest in a major network (the other was former WB affiliate WNOL-TV, owned by that network's part-owner, the Tribune Company), and the only one to be a network owned-and-operated station.
_	At the time that Tavar painted this mural 24.6% of Spaniards were unemployed; for under-25-year olds, 53% were unemployed.
_	In the 1920s product improvement through the use of statistical process control was promoted by Dr. Walter A. Shewhart at Bell Labs, around the time that Waloddi Weibull was working on statistical models for fatigue.
_	On January 24, 2013, it was reported that Luckie had potentially tried to claim mileage reimbursement for an unused parking pass during the time that he was under investigation and that the Franklin County Prosecutor was weighing the possibility of additional charges after seeking more information.
_	They were living there at the time that Luther's famous heresy trial took place at nearby Wittenberg College.
_	The university indicated at the time that it intended to return to the air alongside WREN, but on December 9, 1991, WREN returned to the air alone on 1250 kHz.
_	There was also a policy in place in Israel at the time that required the German athletes and staff to complete a questionnaire regarding their political past and if and what category they had been denazified in, this was due to issues surrounding the Holocaust that occurred many years earlier.
_	MONUC officials said at the time that the majority of these Mai Mai form small, unstructured units with no chain of command and have largely devolved into common bandits.
_	At about the time that Waugh was discovering his affection for the "Diary" another writer, J. B. Priestley, was extolling it as an exemplar of English humour; Jerome K. Jerome, Priestley asserted, never wrote anything as good: "[P]oor Mr Pooter, with his simplicity, his timidity, his goodness of heart, is not simply a figure of fun but one of those innocent, lovable fools who are dear to the heart".
_	They have kept order in Aethia for much of the time that Rose and Thorn were in exile, and claim that things are better that way.
_	In 1929 he moved to Asunción, with the intention of dedicating fully to his specially, “tuberculosis”, at the time that disease was a great problem, it affected a big part of the population, plus there were just a few drugs that could serve to treat it and the use of X-rays was still very restricted.
_	It was alleged at the time that Smith along with teammate Kevin Locke had crashed his car into another vehicle and into the wall of a house.
_	Although there was speculation at the time that a smaller indoor event could see the festivals return in 2013, this was revealed not to be the case the following January when the organisers released a statement informing there were "no plans" for a return that year.
_	He said at the time that the film would be fictionalized and focus on journalists and the media circus surrounding the trial more than on the actual events in dispute.
_	This marks the time that the film has been released in high-definition Blu-ray and on Blu-ray 3D.
_	Aside from the Atchison, Topeka & Santa Fe Railway, the isolation was similar to the time that New Mexico was culturally isolated from the rest of Spanish America.
_	Unlike other pickups of the time that used C-channel frames, the Comanche's frame design (called a "Uniframe" by Jeep) under the cargo bed was fully boxed, with a large X structure centered over the rear axle.
_	Around the time that Maudslay was visiting Verapaz, a German colony had settled in the area thanks to generous concessions granted by liberal presidents Manuel Lisandro Barillas Bercián, José María Reyna Barrios and Manuel Estrada Cabrera.
_	The library director said the ghost "seemed to be very active right around the time that our Lone Sentinel was dying".
_	The competing Mitsubishi and Nakajima aircraft were even less successful however, and after modifications made by Tokuichiro Gomei of Aichi Kokuki, the aircraft was accepted by the Navy in August 1933 as the Kugisho Navy Type 92 Carrier Attack Bomber, with a short designation of B3Y1, with production by Aichi, Watanabe and the Hiro Naval Arsenal, 129 being produced by the time that production finished in 1936.
_	He later said that he wanted to fire Rice in December, but did not believe at the time that Rutgers policy would support a firing.
_	Missionary David Zeisberger recorded at the time that Catherine Montour was still living near Niagara.
_	"Hard" is notable as the last single release by Goodbye Mr Mackenzie that Shirley Manson participated in; she had left the group's side-project Angelfish to join American alternative group Garbage by the time that follow up E.P. "The Way I Walk" was released.
_	Harvey and Cywinska broke up in October 2015 right around the time that Harvey missed a New York Mets team workout.
_	Rogue had flashes of memories, both of she and Gambit during the time that they had known each other, and of the millions of minds she absorbed, while in her coma-like state before she briefly woke up and recognized Gambit.
_	Li's high status, little is firmly established about his career except for the time that he served as chancellor—as, unusual for a chancellor, he did not have a biography in either the "Old Book of Tang" or the "New Book of Tang".
_	"I wrote a lot of songs inspired, in a way, by what I was going through at the time that this album was being made, and he was definitely a big part of that," she told MTV News.
_	This refuted the popular genetic theory of the time that genes were fixed in their position on a chromosome.
_	The "laches" defense does not apply if the claimant was a minor during the time that the claim was not brought, so a party can bring a claim against an historical injustice when they reach their majority.
_	A perfect situation would occur if the music were continually present, the listener came at the time that he or she felt convenient and left when the right moment right to do so was found.”
_	Myers at the time that he introduced her to psychic research and the SPR.
_	A company representative remarked at the time that "the title is on track to easily exceed our 500,000 target, and it may easily become a one million seller by the end of this calendar year."
_	This lack of formal legal advice could account for the fact that several of the men claimed that drunkenness had led them to desert (a common defense in military trials at the time that sometimes led to lighter sentences), and others described how they were forced to join the Mexican Army in some form or another.
_	This is the time that NUMT was coined to designate the large stretches of mitochondrial DNA in the genome.
_	Labour leader Eamon Gilmore said at the time that a national strike would serve the country no good.
_	It was not known at the time that Nash was suffering from paranoid schizophrenia, and as a result, he was deeply suspicious of everyone around him—including his colleagues—and was convinced that many were involved in conspiracies against him.
_	It is noteworthy that Germany claimed at the time that its invasion of Poland was in fact a 'defensive war,' as it had allegedly been invaded by a group of Polish saboteurs, signaling a potentially larger invasion of Germany by Poland that was soon to be under way.
_	Peter Martyr, in dedicating to Cooke his "Commentaries on St Paul's Epistle to the Romans" (published 1558), wrote: "I for my part doubtles have, ever since that the time that I dwelt in England, borne a singular love and no smal or vulgar affection towards you, both for your singular piety and learning, and also for the worthy office which you faythfully and with great renoune executed in the Christian publike wealth, in instructing Edward, that most holy King..."
_	Similar concerns had previously also been raised in the context of the Relativistic Heavy Ion Collider, with Frank Close, professor of physics at the University of Oxford, to comment at the time that "the chance of <nowiki>[</nowiki>strangelet creation] is like you winning the major prize on the lottery 3 weeks in succession; the problem is that people believe it is possible to win the lottery 3 weeks in succession."
_	While Liquid Fidelity creates an HDTV image by controlling the amount of light reflecting from it, DLP creates an HDTV image by varying the percentage of the time that its mirrors are aimed toward the projection screen.
_	He turned down the idea of running the show, given the time that production of "The Original Series" had distracted him from his family.
_	Bushrod finished building Claymont in 1820 for $30,000; a massive sum at the time that became known as "Bushrod's folly."
_	Charlie Siringo was a real life lawman during the time that the game was set, though the game is not based on any true story.
_	By the time that the Moles, nomads from the east, had burrowed into Aquitar, the country was at the threshold of revolution.
_	The carriage shed at Farnham was built in 1937 around the time that the line was electrified.
_	At the time that the area was declared a national park, rampant harvesting of this tree was taking place to create charcoal to supply Bolivian mines.
_	Older Bulgarians call it Birch Month as it is around the time that birch trees start growing leaves and giving sap.
_	He successfully showed that the prevailing government sentiment of the time that commercial properties offered higher tax yields and lower service demands created unnecessary barriers to build housing for those less well-off.
_	A modified box car containing a 450KW generator was added to the consist in 2013 in order to maintain constant power to the train during the time that the locomotives are switched for the return trip from St. Helena.
_	This fact served him very well upon entering into elective politics at about the time that Tennessee blacks in rural areas were first being allowed their constitutional rights to participate in political decisions which had been guaranteed under the Tennessee and federal constitutions but previously unenforced.
_	However, at the time that Zhang was about to accept leadership and enter the headquarters, his horse bit his leg.
_	(During the time that Li Shouzhen was kept at Kaifeng, the people of Kaifeng, whenever they saw him and Du out in public, would curse them; neither of them showed any sign of shamefulness.)
_	The ULA and Socialist Party stated at the time that the story was a "manufactured controversy" and part of a "vindictive smear campaign by Independent Newspapers".
_	Expanding the scope of his research to include countries in Eastern and Western Africa as well, he addressed the politics of agricultural development and food supply just at the time that dearth and famine increasingly arose on the continent (Markets and States in Tropical Africa: The Political Basis of Agricultural Policy.
_	At the time that was a part of London which had not been connected to Bazalgette's system, and 93 per cent of the fatalities occurred within the area.
_	He stated at the time that he would like to return to Yorkshire in a coaching role after his retirement from playing for South Australia.
_	I presumed at the time that these were all Uzbek nationals—that may have been a false presumption.
_	He goes on to say that he did not know at the time that any non-Uzbek nationals were flown to Uzbekistan and although he has studied the reports by several journalists and finds their reports credible he is not a firsthand authority on this issue.
_	Crull had been drawn to the D-Q U story from the time that he was a professional
_	We have to cherish the time that we have here, and love the people who surround and support us, even if they make us crazy, because things happen.
_	At the time that the game was declared forfeit, Tulane was leading with a score of 2 to nothing.
_	BASF stated at the time that they wished to focus on "more rapidly marketable projects."
_	It seemed at the time that the Japanese were advancing just about everywhere.
_	The acts of sabotage were attributed to widespread unrest among the sailors at the time; the RAN claimed at the time that Communist influence was the cause, although Tom Frame and Kevin Baker ascribe it to Depression-era pay cuts and retrentions, which were more likely to be forced onto sailors than officers.
_	However, with the prevailing attitude at the time that names used in synonymy could not be used to identify forms, he later felt that "P. n. candida" could not be used and then amended this by creating the name "Pagodroma nivea pealei".
_	According to Svoboda there are two large events of mass rape recorded by Yuki Tanaka at the time that the R.A.A. brothels were closed down in 1946.
_	The preferred shares typically offer relatively high and secure dividend yield at a fixed coupon rate but with no expectation of capital gain by the time that the split share corporation is wound up.
_	There were even rumors at the time that the Duke sought to kill the King and usurp the throne.
_	He told media at the time that he was considering electing for the 2008 AFL Pre-Season draft.
_	It was said at the time that the elder Jewett had taken the contract for printing the strips and had attended to their distribution."
_	Because of the time that would go into any page of an infinite canvas comic, Zabel deemed it unlikely for such webcomics to gain a large popularity.
_	It is not clear whether or not this took place before or during the time that the Japanese navy went to battle the Tang ships.
_	Little did he know at the time that the term rockabilly would become a genre of music that would circle the globe.
_	The book is focused on the early 20th century in New Orleans, around the time that jazz became in vogue in the city.
_	"Around the time that I recorded the first FF tape, I was reading a lot of books on UFO's.
_	Nevertheless, at the time that the operation was planned there was no way for the Australian commanders to know when the war would come to an end and there were political and operational reasons to carry out the campaign.
_	At the time that the flavor was released, the Irish nationalist movement was still offended by the historical association of the title.
_	Each digit represents the number of throws that occur by the time that same prop will be caught.
_	(Since the Jie did not appear to use family names, and Shi Le's own family name of "Shi" was given to him by his friend Ji Sang (汲桑), presumably this was also the time that Shi Le gave Shi Hu the same family name and gave him the courtesy name Jilong as well, patterned after his own courtesy name Shilong (世龍).)
_	This was one of three type 4-6-2, class G5d light weight "Pacific" locomotives that were operational at the time that Steamtown, USA was in Bellows Falls.
_	The reporter thought at the time that "Miller" sounded remarkably like Trump, and played the tape to several people who knew Trump and agreed it was Trump.
_	When Morton stated he would be making an important announcement with President Nixon in December 1969, it seemed all but certain at the time that it would be to declare his candidacy.
_	At the time that MONIAC was created, electronic digital computers that could run complex economic simulations were unavailable.
_	Keith Still, Professor of Crowd Science at Manchester Metropolitan University in Britain, who helped redesign the Jamaraat (the pillars representing the devil stoned by pilgrims) after a disaster in 2004, said there was criticism at the time that the upgrades at the Jamaraat had not been extended to other areas.
_	In fact, mortality on the "Pearl" was not nearly as severe as that on "Severn"; by the time that ship reached Rio de Janeiro on 6 June 158 of the ship's crew had died and of the remainder, 114 were too sick to be of use leaving just 30 men and boys to work the ship.
_	At the time that Joan lived, her voices and visions would not have been doubted.
_	The trial was such a sensation at the time that there were crowds of people outside the courthouse unable to find room inside.
_	After looking through her phone for clues, forensic linguists came to the conclusion that the texts sent from her phone around the time that she disappeared seemed very different than her usual texting style, and soon started looking to her ex-boyfriend, David Hodgson, for clues of what happened to her, including looking through his phone and studying his texting style.
_	It was long believed that the document was written by a knight on the island of Cyprus, around the time that the island was the base of operations for the three major military orders, the Knights Templar, the Teutonic Order, and the Knights Hospitaller.
_	Though Calissi's suspicions were strong, he and his assistant Fred C. Galda had come to the conclusion at the time that hard evidence did not exist to move further with the case.
_	Darwin's mysterious symptoms which included vomiting, sweating, sighing, and weeping, particularly troublesome in the early months of 1872, seem to have improved around the time that he completed his work on the emotions.
_	The time to untenability is judged by the time that is available to the occupants before either (a) room flashover occurs, or (b) untenability due to toxic gas production occurs.
_	Once the accident was cleared, the breakaway trio were allowed to leave with their original three-minute advantage, after the peloton had negated their gap through the time that they had been stopped.
_	Nagatsuki had recently been playing "Chaos;Child", which Umehara had written for, and he approved the choice, suggesting that they let Umehara write the "painful parts"; Umehara was invited to join the project around the time that the scripts for episodes 8 and 9 were being written.
_	Onophrius was one of the Desert Fathers who made a great impression on Eastern spirituality in the third and fourth centuries, around the time that Christianity was emerging as the dominant faith of the Roman Empire.
_	It was joked at the time that he betrayed his former trade by choosing the "best piece of Holland " in the County.
_	Brennschluss (a loanword, from the German "Brennschluss") is either the cessation of fuel burning in a rocket or the time that the burning ceases: the cessation may result from the consumption of the propellants, from deliberate shutoff, or from some other cause.
_	Shortly after midnight on January 4, 1974 (around the time that he terminated his relationship with Brooks), Bundy entered the basement apartment of 18-year-old Karen Sparks (identified as Joni Lenz, Mary Adams, or Terri Caldwell by various sources), a dancer and student at UW.
_	Just around the time that Lambton got his survey approved by Lord Clive, he happened to hear of some instruments being carried back from China by astronomer Dr. James Dinwiddie.
_	The two boys see the police on the road and confess to their father what they have done, believing at the time that the American woman has died of her wounds.
_	Strip clubs appeared in the 1990s, around the time that rehabilitation of the plaza started to be considered.
_	This correspondence allowed Heisenberg to provide the rule for the transition intensities, the fraction of the time that, starting from an initial state , a photon is emitted and the atom jumps to a final state ,
_	Roberts was so well known at the time that he was even painted by the portrait artist, Norman Hepple.
_	Johnson noted at the time that the painting is based on his observations during the Civil War Battle of Manassas.
_	Slovenia's Prime Minister Borut Pahor stated at the time that documents – notably maps – that Croatia had provided as part of its candidacy for accession could prejudice a resolution of the two countries' long-running border dispute.
_	At the time that Mary is due to give birth, she and her husband Joseph travel from their home in Nazareth to Joseph's ancestral home in Bethlehem to register in the Census of Quirinius.
_	He said at the time that the trio was “searching for a free sense of tonality and form”.
_	During the time that the League Championship Series was best-of-five, a "2-3" format was used, with one team hosting the first two games, the other the last three (these respective roles alternating between the Eastern and Western Division champions regardless of which one finished with the better regular-season record).
_	Using gastric balloons and a landmine detector to track the progress of steel balls through the gastrointestinal tracts of volunteers, Davis produced evidence that stomach contractions were largely absent when the stomach was empty, a finding that directly refuted the popular hypothesis of the time that hunger produced the most intense stomach contractions.
_	Jarod and Kyle are allowed to see each other on multiple occasions as they run simulations together, but don't know at the time that they are brothers.
_	He was forty-six at the time that he first became Party secretary, a notably young age to hold such a prestigious position.
_	Other members of his family have stated that they were concerned at the time that he was a danger to himself from his erratic behavior.
_	“The dang whole cast of “8 Seconds” has that ring,” Snyder said, “and when I watched that movie when I was just a little kid – it was about the time that I was starting when it came out – that made me want to be a bull rider.
_	The architecture design of his projects differed slightly from the classic pattern of the Brussels one-family houses of the time that was partly determined by the establishment of regulations which set the widths and depths of the lots in the new residential neighborhoods, six-meters facade for about fifteen meters deep.
_	Trevor Philpotts was Master of the lodge during most of the time that it existed.
_	"Morning Girl" was so popular at the time that the reference to Cheerios sparked interest from General Mills to arrange the song for Bobby Bloom as part of a promotion for a premium for a doll called Beautiful Dawn.
_	The rate of front advancement controls the time that dendrites or nuclei have to form in the solidification region.
_	She stated at the time that she got involved again in politics because she wanted to encourage young people to vote, and to re-connect disenfranchised people with the political system.
_	The standard Westinghouse Air Brake has the additional enhancement of a triple valve, and local reservoirs on each wagon that enable the brakes to be applied fully with only a slight reduction in air pressure, reducing the time that it takes to release the brakes as not all pressure is voided to the atmosphere.
_	While DNA had been known to biologists since 1869, many scientists still assumed at the time that proteins carried the information for inheritance because DNA appeared simpler than proteins.
_	After the closing of the archives, the tapes were sent to Mende personally, who then had a look at the material, all of which had originally been rejected by Falco's recording label Teldec; this was explained by Horst Bork in an interview mentioning that Falco had tried to use a different style of music at the time that the label did not want to support.
_	About the time that she turned thirty, she decided she needed to learn more about writing.
_	However, according to the archeological site report, this statue was discovered in a level of occupation dating several centuries after the time that Idrimi lived.
_	About the time that Van Gogh painted this work, he wrote to his mother, "But for one's health, as you say, it is very necessary to work in the garden and see the flowers growing."
_	The manifesto was written by scholar Johann Adler Salvius in a style common of the time that promotes a "just war".
_	Historians who define the Nanking Massacre as having started from the time that the Japanese Army entered Jiangsu province push the beginning of the massacre to around mid-November to early December (Suzhou fell on November 19), and stretch the end of the massacre to late March 1938.
_	By the time that de Bourg was eleven, he had been admitted to study at the exclusive Royal Ballet School, graduating top of his class with his final solo performance.
_	The aqiqah is sunnah and mustahabb; it is not obligatory at all, so there is no sin on the one who does not do it, or the one who delays it and does not do it at the time that is mustahabb, although he misses out on the virtue and reward of that.
_	During the time that the two colonies became independent, many left to Europe and the United States, a few returned to Cape Verde, after, the Cape Verdean population would be moved to the nearby island of Príncipe, many Cape Verdean descendants, some with another descendant became elemented into the Príncipe Creole society.
_	There was some concern at the time that the deed of cession was null since the sultan had no rights over the archipelago.
_	[The officers] had known at the time that General Westmoreland's insistence on an O/B total of no more than 300,000 was an artificial position dictated by political considerations, and that the true number of enemy forces had almost certainly been much higher.
_	The whole massif was named "Cerro de la Neblina", since Maguire and Reynolds considered at the time that the massif constituted a separate formation from the Imeri range to the southeast.
_	He began his career at Riverkeeper during the time that the organization discovered that Exxon was using its oil tankers in order to steal fresh water from the Hudson River for use in its Aruba refinery and to sell to Caribbean Islands.
_	He said at the time that the reason for this is because he wanted the focus of the video to be on the storyline, versus him playing the song.
_	The news magazine had announced at the time that the identity of the nude female in that picture could not be determined.
_	In the Joss landings, the LSIs HMS "Princess Astrid" and HMS "Princess Charlotte" anchored approximately from Licata, about the time that the moon was setting; at 01:00, 10 July.
_	The United States were invited to send two players to the World Championship; it was assumed at the time that Samuel Reshevsky and Reuben Fine, leading grandmasters and participants in the 1938 AVRO tournament, would be chosen.
_	Overall, it was the political and economic landscape of the time that offered the perfect opportunity for professionals outside of firms to gain power and exert their influence in order to drastically change corporate strategy.
_	The NTSB could not understand why the captain failed to detect the mistrimmed rudder (as evidenced by the abnormal displacement of the rudder pedals and the tendency for the plane to keep trying to turn left), during the time that the plane was taxied to the takeoff position.
_	By the time that the war had ended, the Vikings had discovered that monasteries and towns situated on navigable rivers were vulnerable to attack.
_	In his final years he spent much of his time handling requests made by those with questions about the Confederacy, even during the time that he was recovering from cataract surgery in 1914.
_	Natalie has her own reasons not to stop Monk, mostly because of payback for the time that Dr. Kroger used medication to enable Monk to follow her to Hawaii ("Mr. Monk Goes to Hawaii").
_	Mira said that by the time that Paul got to watch the video, she would have been dead.
_	The original plans for the space involved two chambers, one on each floor, and the new design was adopted only in 1879, Burges noting at the time that he intended to "indulge in a little more ornament" than elsewhere in the castle.
_	Hawke said in Parliament at the time that "the settlement of the long and complex issue of Namibian independence is an important international event.
_	It had a range of variant titles in the time that it was published, but was commonly known as "Walch's Almanac"
_	It was thought at the time that Brampton had been appointed to the post to position the title for women over the age of 40.
_	This was also the time that the main church of the monastery began to function as the parish church for the city of Cuernavaca.
_	It was decided at the time that it was not appropriate, although the writers had hoped that there would be a time when the viewers would accept such a relationship.
_	It was thought at the time that 22 people from Northern Ireland had died in the disaster and only the names of those victims are recorded on the memorial.
_	By the time that Governor James Williams was elected to office, the building was about to be condemned.
_	"I don't think any of us could have known at the time that this little venture would lead to the breakup of DD [v1.0]
_	By the time that he was 11 years old, the family was traveling to the municipality of Caguas to have him practice with higher-level teams.
_	A number of business news websites, newspapers and magazines claimed at the time that Putin’s diatribe against Zyuzin caused a panic on the Russian stock market, triggering a market-wide sell-off from which the stock market took years to recover.
_	He was very much afraid, however, that the form of evil which had been existing since the time that men and women first trod the earth would be rather difficult to extinguish by a Queensland Parliament".
_	Mary Whitehouse, social critic, argued at the time that "EastEnders" represented a violation of "family viewing time" and that it undermined the watershed policy.
_	Established under the aegis of 49 Pandyan kings with 449 participating poets, it ran for 1850 years, ending around the time that Christianity emerged.
_	Subsequently, at the time that the payment for the area of the surface was due, Hammersons negotiated the retention of the cars parking under their control.
_	The workshop shows that the vases that were made there were most likely sold for a large profit, because of the time that was taken to make the vases.
_	In contrast to first-person RPGs at the time that were restricted to 90-degree movements, "Wibarm's" use of 3D polygons allows full 360-degree movement.
_	Rintel was born in Edinburgh, Scotland, during the time that his father, the late Rev. Rabbi Myer Rintel, was minister of the Hebrew congregation.
_	A popular "condensed translation" was published in England in 1928, at the time that Hilton would have been gathering inspiration for – or perhaps writing – "Lost Horizon".
_	Proving satisfactory, a further three were ordered, again from Kitsons; but by the time that they were delivered in December 1906, the LD&ECR was in the middle of negotiations with the GCR which would lead to the LD&ECR being taken over by the GCR at the start of 1907; these three were paid for by the GCR.
_	In 2006, Frost was charged with 12 counts of sexual exploitation related to acts on three females and four males between the ages of 14 and 16, alleged to have occurred during the time that Frost was Danton's junior hockey coach, with the Quinte Hawks.
_	His manager insisted at the time that the allegations were "totally untrue".
_	By the time that the Battle was entering service in 1937 it had already been rendered obsolete by the rapid advances in aircraft technology that were being made at the time.
_	By the time that construction on this section was to begin, resistance from the National Parks & Wildlife Service to the proposed route forced the Department of Main Roads to take a route through Calga, using part of the first stage of a proposed freeway route to Singleton which had been built the 1960s.
_	The widow of Tory Chauncey Beardsley, Huldah took pleasure in talking of the exciting times of the Revolution and related during her lifetime about the time that two companies of French soldiers, under the command of French General Rochambeau, encamped a whole winter during the war on what is now known as Mountain Hill, a high rocky bluff in the central part of the village of Nichol's Farms.
_	It was reported in the press at the time that her extravagant lifestyle, expensive cars, clothes and a yacht, caused her downfall.
_	At the time that a PG&E background study of chromium(VI) was conducted, average chromium(VI) levels in Hinkley were recorded as 1.19 ppb with a peak of 3.09 ppb.
_	1960s was the time that Cansever met with Bodrum.
_	Because both of her parents had died by the time that Ava was only ten years of age, she was reared thereafter by her older siblings, including, her brother, Houston Brister, and his wife, Era.
_	However, by the time that Wang launched his attack, Guo had already returned from the west, and Wang's attempt to fight out was a failure, with Wang himself seriously injured.
_	He believed that the Danubian region of modern Austria had thus been part of this unified German civilisation before the growth of the Roman Empire, an idea in contrast to the view accepted by historians of the time that linguistically German communities only settled in the area during the reign of the Frankish king Charlemagne in the ninth century CE, pushing out the pre-existing linguistically Celtic groups.
_	However, Scottish band Mogwai managed to convince Albini at the time that they were ATP curators and the band was very impressed by the experience: "They (ATP) completely changed the festival game.
_	There were suggestions in the press at the time that Allen illegally threw, rather than bowled, the ball.
_	The personal needs allowance is the time that is associated with workers’ daily personal needs which include going to the restroom, phone calls, going to the water fountain, and similar interruptions of a personal nature.
_	A Network Rail spokesman stated at the time that the project would be delayed until 2017 and attributed this to the organisation having to wait for the needed permission of the transport secretary to carry out the construction of new track at Tinsley.
_	I was unaware at the time that I was not signed up in both Pro Classes" (Cruiser and 20"-editor.).
_	By the time that the "Idflieg" approved the Mercedes engine for installation, Siemens-Schuckert did not have the workforce available to install them, and placed the R.II in storage instead.
_	By the time that these revisions had been completed, the Senate had been reduced to 600 members, and after this point, the size of the Senate was never again drastically altered.
_	Hyrum Smith, brother of Joseph Smith, was a member of the First Presidency of the church at the time that his signature appeared on the document known as the "Danite Manifesto."
_	Online journals and U.S. newspapers stated at the time that Google was hiring former Microsoft web developers among others.
_	It is for the time that anyone from Qasr-e-‘Aali has travelled to the land of Iran for higher studies.
_	It was renovated in 1954, around the time that another famous early model – the Rysum organ – was repaired.
_	A challenge for the company was at the time that it had overcapacity after a recent drop in ridership.
_	It was noted in a news report of the time that all four were likely to appeal to the federal ALP executive and that they had the support of then Prime Minister Bob Hawke.
_	It is known to have derived from a word or descriptive term used by Native Americans who continued to occupy this section of Charles County at the time that Neale patented the property.
_	Cavett's lawyer, Melvyn Leventhal, asserted at the time that Cavett left because of a manic-depressive episode.
_	From the time that he started doing research, Dahn has worked closely with industry.
_	The audience memory curve is a principle that relates to the amount of information a person is able to retain and remember from a presentation depending on the time that the information is presented.
_	He had thought at the time that this plan originated at a local level, but was ashamed of his earlier caution when he found that Imperial Army HQ had originally advocated it.
_	At the time that the lease was executed with the City of Tucson, it was known that the shop would only be temporary as that property was subject to condemnation for the planned widening of Broadway Boulevard.
_	During the 19 years from the time that Conrad had left Kraków in October 1874 until he signed off the "Adowa" in January 1894, he had worked in ships, including long periods in ports, for 10 years and almost 8 months.
_	This was also the time that the IRA took the issue of Northern Ireland to Great Britain, maintaining a prolonged bombing campaign on the British mainland.
_	Coello was the last Spanish painter of eminence for some years, as from the time that Luca Giordano was summoned to Spain, the art sank gradually to its decay.
_	Hamner stated that Jess-Belle's original animal incarnation in the script was a tiger, but Herbert Hirschmann told him at the time that the tigers provided by animals trainers were too hard to work with - Hamner recalled Hirschmann phoning him and complaining, "I'm up to my ass in tigers and none of them can act!" - so it was changed to a leopard.
_	At the time that war was declared peace-time garrison troops stationed in North Africa and the Middle East were using the civilian postal services, as they had done since 1882, but by July 1940, under a special arrangement with the Egyptian government, a Base APO was established in Cairo and the Royal Engineers (Postal Section) were allowed to run their own post offices and collect the resulting revenue.
_	She said at the time that she had met Van Gogh 100 years before, in 1888, as a thirteen-year-old girl in her uncle's shop, where he bought some canvas, later describing him as "ugly" ("laid"), "blighted by alcohol" ("brûlé par l'alcool"), and visiting brothels ("il fréquentait des maisons de tolérance").
_	The drive-through concept was so unfamiliar to people at the time that the Jack in the Box "clown," where the speaker was housed, held a sign saying, "Pull forward, Jack will speak to you."
_	So, above, the emission and reception of the light both took place in the vehicle's frame, making the time that an observer in the vehicle's frame would measure the proper time.
_	The customer is then throttled to 2.5 Mbit/s for the next five hours from the time that they exceed the threshold, after which normal service is resumed.
_	Another Congressional staffer said she witnessed the boat encounter, but Gravel said at the time that he had never met either of the women.
_	When King left Tombstone in early 1881, around the time that the troubles started between the Cowboys and the Earps, Tattenbaum followed him.
_	At about the time that Fitzsimmons reached Woonona, Thomsen was spotted just outside the breaking surf off Bulli beach.
_	The effect of these defaults was exacerbated by the fact that few if any investors—including housing market analysts—understood at the time that Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac had been acquiring large numbers of subprime and other high risk loans in order to meet HUD’s affordable housing goals."
_	Parents, or in the case of the dog daycare, owners, have a busy schedule and the often prolonged hours at work drastically reduce the time that could be spent with their children or pets.
_	By the time that the setup was cost-effective, there were single card solutions that rivaled the theoretical capabilities of the SLI configuration, for lower costs.
_	Kondo recalls having been "fascinated by [Tsutsumi's] outside experience" and recognized at the time that his co-worker's "vision always seemed to be greater than the box [of] our responsibility."
_	It was suspected at the time that the mother, Wong Yuen-siu, was mentally unstable, a claim that was backed by her constant swearing in public.
_	By the time that Prohibition was repealed in 1933, only 140 wineries were still in operation.
_	The "New York Times" speculated at the time that the change might lead to a less negative tone by the Clinton campaign.
_	By the time that Milk reached adulthood, he was managing his parent's farm and soon purchased the adjoining farm.
_	Around the time that the Tự Đức Bảo Sao (嗣德寶鈔) was produced the copper content of the alloys of the brass Tự Đức Thông Bảo was reduced to 50% as this coincided with the introduction of high denomination coins with low intrinsic values.
_	At the time that Rajoelina submitted his candidacy, he would have run against forty other candidates in total, of whom seven were affiliated with his own political movement.
_	When interviewed later by Olympic documentarian Bud Greenspan about what she was doing, she credited dancing to this song, a current hit at the time that was being sung and played on bongos by American fans near the start line.
_	The artist Walter Sickert wrote at the time that "La Mitrailleuse" 'will probably remain the most authoritative and concentrated utterance on the war in the history of painting.
_	The Parliament Act 1911 was amended by the Parliament Act 1949 (12, 13 & 14 Geo. 6. c. 103), which further limited the power of the Lords by reducing the time that they could delay bills, from two years to one.
_	Around the time that Mark Schindele took over, Target Canada had largely sorted out its inventory issues.
_	Rules of the time that automatically restored the amateur status of all active military personnel, however the CAHA ruled that a reserve officer was not the same as soldier on active duty.
_	This is the time that elapses from the spark plug firing until 90% of the fuel–air mix is combusted, typically some 80 degrees of crankshaft rotation later.
_	Another report based on sonar and laser measurements, and an ISPRA underwater video, indicated that the ship might collapse in its midsection because its weight was not supported between the rock spur supporting the bow and the rock spur supporting the stern, and said at the time that both of those rocks had "now started crumbling dramatically".
_	Some would say it was this experience with the “rest cure” and “fresh air” used for treating tuberculosis at the time that stimulated his interest in the use of physical agents in medicine.
_	However, due to technical difficulties, it was decided to move it up to 16 mm format, as they wanted to film the project in the style of the many low-budget films at the time that had come out in the 1970s.
_	He is best known as the CEO of the Dutch bank ABN AMRO at the time that the bank was sold to a consortium of banks.
_	However, by the time that May completed his plans for Magnitogorsk, construction of both factory and housing had already started.
_	Liam Howlett commented at the time that in contrast to most rave music being associated with the drug ecstasy, "Fire" was more inspired by marihuana, which was equally prevalent among ravers:
_	Following his death in 1980 the bungalow was sold, and it was noted at the time that ""The bungalow was somewhat bizarre in having ugly hardboard doors throughout and internal cedar cladding, but furnished with amazing antiques (Louis XV table, chairs and sideboards and 6-8 huge oil portraits of the family past and present)"".
_	It was widely believed at the time that the authorities wished to make an example of Orr to act as a deterrent to potential United Irish recruits.
_	Five of the seven Supreme Court justices (including Story) referred to the commonly-held view at the time that the southern states in the Constitutional Convention of 1787 would not have agreed to the U.S. Constitution if the Fugitive Slave Clause had not been included, though there is little historical evidence for this.
_	Campaigns were mounted to subdue the Fang people in the 1920s, at the time that Liberia was beginning to cut back on recruitment.
_	During the time that Lü served as chancellor, he drew further criticism by making his father-in-law Cheng Chubin a deputy minister and brother-in-law Cheng Zhen a junior official.
_	Dayan admitted at the time that he was in possession of cocaine for personal use.
_	He also clarified at the time that the game would not make the transition onto mobile devices or the PS3 as an HD Remaster.
_	He added: "I want and hope in the time that remains to deepen my friendships, to say farewell to those I love, to write more, to travel if I have the strength, to achieve new levels of understanding and insight."
_	It was due to dissent amongst different groups in the town at the time that the Oakes Ames Memorial Hall was never used for its intended purpose as the town hall and to this day the Frothingham House is used for this purpose.
_	Skaters were also given byes through a qualifying competition if they are assigned to an international event during the time that qualifying event was to take place.
_	The petitioners claimed to have settled the grant in accordance with its contracted terms and had continued as a municipal corporation, embracing all of the land within the exterior boundaries of the grant, up to the time that the New Mexico Territory was ceded to the United States, and that the said tract was granted in common, not only to the petitioners, but to all other settlers who might join them in the future.
_	Although more technical in nature than often marketers require, a system integrator (SI) can also play an equivalent role to the marketing IT process strategist, particularly at the time that new technology tools need to be configured and rolled out.
_	By the time that these paintings were being produced in the 13th or 14th century, Buddhism had been assimilated into the Chinese philosophical system, and this syncretism had long since begun to influence iconography.
_	By the time that all of the reinforcements arrived, nearly 1,800 Americans were engaged in the buckwheat field.
_	John J. McCloy said at the time that he did not believe that Rockefeller would not go down in history as a great banker but as a "real personality, as a distinguished and loyal member of the community".
_	French attacks continued for another two weeks, took small amounts of ground and drove off several German counter-attacks but had made few gains, by the time that the offensive was suspended, on 13 January.
_	Law's constituents in Blackfriars were not overly enthusiastic about tariff reform – Glasgow was a poor area at the time that had benefited from free trade.
_	It was noted at the time that he was only eligible because of the shotgun formation (an NFL quarterback who takes a snap from underneath the center was and still is an ineligible receiver, a rule not found in any amateur level of American football).
_	"Boston Globe" relayed that AfterElton.com created a running ticker of the time that had elapsed since Luke and Noah last kissed on the lips onscreen.
_	The industry was so secretive, and there were no good text books, plus it seemed at the time that he was the only kid he knew interested in monsters and makeup, so Elsey had to struggle to develop technique.
_	By the time that Ellington left the Senate, the district lines had changed somewhat and included even a few precincts as far south as the northern portion of Avoyelles Parish.
_	After the French capitulation in June 1940, it seemed at the time that only Great Britain would have a little chance to win in a fight against the Germans, and a greater chance to negotiate humiliating peace.
_	In the time that Wilder took to calm down the secretary and arrange a small detachment to escort him back to safety, the opportunity for a successful attack was lost and he ordered his men to withdraw to the west.
_	By the time that Libyan relations with the United States had worsened so that by the time American planes bombed Tripoli in April 1986, Libya was providing key logistical and air support to Sudanese offensives against the Sudan People's Liberation Army in the rebel South.
_	At the time that the film was in production various "Quadraphonic" (four speaker) sound systems were being marketed to the domestic HiFi market.
_	The President of the Constituent Assembly Rajendra Prasad, before signing the Constitution on 26 November 1949, thanked Rau for having "worked honorarily all the time that he was here, assisting the assembly not only with his knowledge and erudition but also enabled the other members to perform their duties with thoroughness and intelligence by supplying them with the material on which they could work."
_	Constable Charles Japhta alleged that Hewana told him he had instructions from Western Cape provincial police commissioner Mzwandile Petros to change statements on the docket relating to the time that Yengeni had been arrested.
_	The mirror, constructed in 1720 by the Mirror Manufacture of the Electorate of Mainz in Lohr, had been in the house during the time that Maria’s stepmother lived there.
_	He remarked later that he was so small at the time that he was almost buried in his doctor's gown and that all the spectators laughed.
_	He had realised at the time that he was the only member of the main cast without a stunt double as he had never had an action scene that required one.
_	Computer scientist David Birti considered it fortunate at the time that their hacking activities have mainly been restricted to denial of service attacks and have not been as severe as password leakage yet.
_	This trend occurred around the time that the title character of the Punky Brewster television series popularized this style.
_	At the time that the Society was founded in Britain, similar societies were also founded in other European countries.
_	There was a suggestion at the time that he had struck a bird although this is now considered an unfounded rumor.
_	King's mother said at the time that she was satisfied with her daughter's decision to become a minister and stated that they had become closer than ever in the months leading up to the sermon.
_	Portman said at the time that he looked forward to the responsibility, "It's a big job.
_	It was common practice at the time that Abbots unsympathetic to the will of the King were replaced with more favourable ones; in this case Abbot More was implanted by Dr. T. Leigh.
_	During the time that Tim and Graeme are searching for a replacement for Bill, Tim receives an application for the job by telephone.
_	Coffin Break was formed in Seattle in the late 1980s, during the time that grunge was beginning to catch on; however, the group eschewed the nascent alternative sound, taking their influences from punk rock.
_	They played a second set of reunion dates in 2007 and stated at the time that this was the last time the original four members, or any other line up, would ever perform under the Tyketto name.
_	Once enough power plants have been secured, the player goes back in time, arriving at the time that Soviet forces are first invading San Francisco.
_	The Princess had been out of production for four months by the time that the Ambassador went on sale.
_	He commented at the time that Barkley was upset, but that the station demanded a change.
_	"" / during the time that the Franks won the Morea.
_	Johnson also denies the accusations that she removed, copied, or distributed any confidential information and said in her book that her attorney disproved them at the time that the temporary restraining order was lifted.
_	He is the founder of the concept of historical continuity of Greece from antiquity to the present, establishing the tripartite division of Greek history in ancient, medieval and modern, and sought to set aside the prevailing views at the time that the Byzantine Empire was a period of decadence and degeneration, not recognized as part of Greek history.
_	Close to the time that "Super" was released, another film on the topic of amateur superheroes, "Kick-Ass", was released.
_	He argued against the orthodoxy within psychiatry and psychoanalysis at the time that the personality is more plastic in the early years; his paper on the subject, "Is the human personality more plastic in infancy and childhood?"
_	The Court held that the civil courts were still operating in Indiana during the time that Bowles and the others were arrested, tried, and convicted by the military commission.
_	Shortly expect to see Remix 28 about the time that Fedora 28 is released.
_	Hearts announced at the time that Romanov would assume the title of chief executive "on a temporary basis... pending a further appointment".
_	At the time that the "R. D. Whitehead Memorial" was completed, watering troughs were found at many intersections around Milwaukee.
_	By the time that the Hanley Mark III was available for testing, the Dart, which was developed from Blackburn's earlier Swift, had already been ordered into service.
_	These comments were all posted at the time that episodes originally aired.
_	He stands in the midst of a rice-field, on one foot only, it being incumbent on him to continue in this uneasy attitude during the time that a common peasant takes in ploughing once around him in a circle.
_	Samuel Coder appears to have served in this capacity until the time that Williamsport was incorporated as a city in 1866.
_	Dir. Stephen Richardson and the Chief of DFAS, John F. Bennett, believed at the time that a court order was their only alternative.
_	Allegations at the time that the election had allowed for voting by at least 100 unqualified voters were confirmed decades later.
_	By the time that the Germans arrived in Paris, two-thirds of the Parisians, particularly those in the wealthier neighborhoods, had fled to the countryside and the south of France, in what is known as the "exode de 1940", the massive exodus of millions of people from the Netherlands, Belgium, Luxembourg, the north and east of France, fleeing after the German victory of the battle of Sedan (12–15 May 1940).
_	A meeting with university president William G. Bowen in her sophomore year saw no results, leading to Sotomayor's saying in a "New York Times" story at the time that "Princeton is following a policy of benign neutrality and is not making substantive efforts to change."
_	The caste distinction is based on their caste at the time that they or their ancestors converted to Christianity since the 16th century, they typically do not intermarry, and sit separately during prayers in Church.
_	Americans may have lost interest at about the time that Nirvana came roaring in from the Northwest, but Roxette has been consistent, scoring hits throughout the 90's and beyond with their usual practice of attractive pop hooks and Marie Fredriksson's emotive vocals."
_	He worked both as a page in the state senate and as apprentice printer at a Jacksonville newspaper during the time that his father, Emanuel, was a Reconstruction politician in Florida.
_	Jones commented at the time that she did not find Blanche funny, explaining:
_	It was speculated at the time that the Ewing's electoral gain led to the establishment of the Kilbrandon Commission by the Labour government of Harold Wilson to look into the viability of a devolved Scottish Assembly.
_	(WVTM did not switch as WBRC, which was placed a blind trust, was later sold to Fox outright as New World could not keep both due to FCC rules at the time that forbade duopolies).
_	Dunval Hall is Elizabethan and was clearly built by the Goldstones since they were living there and owned it at the time that it was constructed.
_	For the time that followed, no records are available, caught as the whole countryside was in the throes of the Thirty Years' War.
_	Her grandfather, Alexander Allan, founded the firm in 1819, and by the time that her father – the youngest of Alexander Allan's five sons, also named Alexander – took over the running of the company's Glasgow operations, the line had many vessels, additional offices in Liverpool and Montreal, and had wrested the Royal Mail's North American contract away from the Cunard line.
_	During the time that Myka leaves the Warehouse, Claudia apparently steps up to full-time agent status alongside Pete and Artie.
_	By the time that the Columbia was reached, "Telephone" had a lead of several boat lengths over "Telegraph", and had lashed a broom, the traditional symbol of victory in a steamboat race, to its jackstaff.
_	Staff were told at the time that the new organisation would be rolled out to other Faculties across UCL, though this has not happened.
_	174 people serving in the Armed Forces applied for nomination papers, as it was usual practice at the time that any serving personnel doing so would be given an honourable discharge.
_	Products for this expansion included a starter set, Elite Assault Theme Deck (MSRP $19.99), which included a fixed 30 card deck focusing on the events surrounding the time that Supreme Chancellor Palpatine issued Order 66, a set of units which included two prebuilt Jedi Starfighter PocketModels.
_	Soubry was a strong supporter of the Equal Marriage Bill stating at the time that she was "very much in favour of legalising same-sex marriage".
_	In his article “New Evidence for the Speed of the Roman Imperial Post,” Elliot agrees with A. M. Ramsey that the typical speed was about per day and illustrates this with another instance, the time that it took news of the proclamation of the emperor Septimius Severus to reach Rome from Carnuntum.
_	Howard Dodson announced at the time that the United Palace would be the musical's permanent home.
_	Gallus undertook the expedition from Egypt by the command of Augustus, partly with a view to explore the country and its inhabitants, and partly to conclude treaties of friendship with the people, or to subdue them if they should oppose the Romans, for it was believed at the time that Arabia was full of all kinds of treasures.
_	Most commonly referred to as the Dingo Bar, it was one of the few drinking establishments at the time that was open all night.
_	Utilisation of machines focuses on reducing the time that machines spend idle and increasing the amount of time during shifts that machines are actively contributing to production.
_	Meanwhile, Rosie is looking through a bloopers reel of her old show, when she realizes that it was filmed at the time that the speeding ticket claimed Adam had been driving with Brianna, and deduces that the only person who could have sent it was Jeannie.
_	By the time that New York City’s economic crisis hit in the 1970s, Veselka was a fixture in the neighborhood.
_	At the time that RCA Victor commissioned this building, it was a subsidiary of General Electric.
_	Domestic violence had become so common in society at the time that it had been named the top health risk against women.
_	She said she did not know at the time that the Red Cross segregated blood plasma and did not find out until several years later.
_	In September, around the time that kelp harvesting is finished the townspeople have an Autumn Festival.
_	While it was widely known at the time that Morris was active behind the scenes, his only significant public role of record during the Convention was to nominate his friend George Washington as its president.
_	During the war, he headed a program to find housing for workers flooding into Minden to take jobs at the Louisiana Army Ammunition Plant, a since defunct munitions factory which opened early in the war during the time that Floyd D. Culbertson, Jr., was mayor.
_	At the time that Hecht's name was brought up, he was in Italy working on Norma Productions' "The Crimson Pirate" for Warner Brothers and a subpoena for his testimony was only procured two years later.
_	The "Luboml" documentary makes it clear that despite all the time that has passed since its destruction, those survivors who once lived in Luboml still remember their hometown dearly.
_	By the time that Dodgson abruptly ceased photography (1880, over 24 years), he had established his own studio on the roof of Tom Quad, created around 3,000 images, and was an amateur master of the medium, though fewer than 1,000 images have survived time and deliberate destruction.
_	At the time that the program launched, the typical retail price for a laptop was considerably in excess of $1,000 (US), so it was infeasible to achieve this objective without also bringing a low-cost machine to production.
_	Clement VII is Pope at the time that most of the events take place.
_	During the time that Cruikshank attended Washington & Jefferson, the football team was among the elite programs in the United States.
_	The Hornbach Monastery pledged the “Münchweiler Tal” (dale) in the time that followed to the Raugraves of Neuenbaumburg and Altenbaumburg.
_	Or put another way, the time that it takes for the plasma concentration to fall by half from its maximum levels.
_	By the time that Alexander Farnese, the future Duke of Parma, took control of the army in 1578, the Low Countries were increasingly split between the rebellious north and those southern provinces still loyal to Spain.
_	This suggests that former *r' escaped depalatalization because it had evolved into a new sound — no longer paired with a corresponding non-palatal sound — by the time that depalatalization occurred.
_	It is not known exactly when Bhrikuti married Songtsen Gampo, but it was presumably about the time that Narendradeva fled to Tibet (c. 621 CE), following Dhruvadeva's take-over of the throne (who, according to an inscription dated in 623, was ruling jointly with Jiṣṇugupta.)
_	By the time that this group had raised enough funds to actually found the school, the ideal of coeducational schools had gained so much ground among the members that the school that was founded in 1886 became a coeducational one.
_	He was so young at the time that he wasn't allowed to use a knife, and was limited to tasks such as plucking chickens and washing vegetables.
_	School Superintendent Jerry Lott said at the time that the work compiled by Reynolds' committee "emphasizes abstinence".
_	Muhaxheri claimed in Facebook posts at the time that he controlled the appointment of the imam at the Kaçanik Mosque, the center of a conflict between radicals and traditional locals.
_	(in contradiction to this source however road works in the past - 1980's - revealed some of the rails buried well under the modern road surface, in addition in Waverley Road on the Depot Entrance a set of tramway rails and points remain, however this may actually be from the time that the depot was used to service the horsetrams - they were towed up to the depot using double decker buses).
_	In essence, Belbachir entered this political scene after the khalifa's position was fully defined, but it was not enforced at the time that the Spanish protectorate came into existence.
_	In serious trouble, the project was rescued by Lieutenant Charles Wilkes, Commander of the United States Exploring Expedition, who arrived in Oregon at about the time that Gale joined the project.
_	Such was the Ranger's popularity at the time that even his horse Silver had a comic book, "The Lone Ranger's Famous Horse Hi-Yo Silver", starting in 1952 and running 34 issues; writer Gaylord DuBois wrote and developed Silver as a hero in his own right.
_	Yet another CBS hit Paley hated was "The Munsters", part of a trend of fantasy shows at the time that included CBS's "My Favorite Martian" and "Gilligan's Island".
_	Rb decays in magma and elsewhere so that every 1.42×10 years half of the amount has been converted into Sr. Knowing the decay constant and the amount of Rb and Sr in a rock it is possible to calculate the time that the Rb must have needed before the rock reached closure temperature to produce all Sr, yet considering that there was an initial Sr amount not produced by Rb in the magmatic body.
_	Manager Ian McCall expected at the time that Lennon would fight for a first-team place at the club.
_	After the reproaches of the reunion are reconciled, Robert tells him that he wants them to live together for the time that he has left, but Alfred tells him that if he really loves him, he has to help him die with dignity.
_	Brenda's free time is committed to solving the case on her own, which crosses over into the time that Fritz would like to spend with her.
_	During the time that Domenico di Bartolo was employed to paint sections of the hospital, the primary artist in charge of decorating the interior frescoes was Bartolomeo Bulgarini.
_	(Eventually, this would become precedent for the future chancellors Cui Yanzhao and Zhang Jun, whose mothers were also alive at the time that they would be chancellors, at imperial feasts.)
_	Tim McCarver, who had caught for Carlton in St. Louis and Wise in Philadelphia, said at the time that the trade was "a real good one for a real good one."
_	"Tarbellites" was a phrase used at the time that reflected the belief that women's skill was derived from their mentors, like Edmund C. Tarbell.
_	That station was sold to allow Metromedia to acquire WCVB (to comply with FCC rules in effect at the time that limited the number of VHF stations owned by a single company to only five), and it is believed that Metromedia gave Hearst a right of first refusal offer if WCVB ever went up for sale again.
_	The was also the same name of the organization responsible for organizing the top-tier hockey league of Russia at the time that existed from 1996 and 2008, when it was rebranded and reorganized as the Kontinental Hockey League.
_	The trip takes about 30 minutes, or about half the time that it had previously taken.
_	By the time that Newberry's widow, Julia Butler Newberry, died in 1885, the Chicago Public Library was already well-established as a circulating library.
_	Circular electron accelerators fell somewhat out of favor for particle physics around the time that SLAC's linear particle accelerator was constructed, because their synchrotron losses were considered economically prohibitive and because their beam intensity was lower than for the unpulsed linear machines.
_	Rubio said at the time that his father's "health is in a fragile state; however, the order by the courts was well thought out and reflected that they, too, are concerned about his condition."
_	At the time that the field was frozen, the 59 was in the lead.
_	This is also the time that the press release content may be distributed to the public by press agencies.
_	At the time that "Penguin" captured the French privateers, they had been out of Brest for 18 days and had taken four prizes, all of which Pulling was pleased to report "Penguin" had recaptured.
_	NBC said at the time that the show "needed a fix, and we had the fix right here."
_	During the time that Reverend Robert Fraser was Minister (1882–87) he made an interest-free loan of £300 to the Committee of Management which was used to strengthen the roof and erect pinnacles on top of the buttresses.
_	Around the time that Lambton proposed a triangulation survey of the Peninsula of India, Colonel Colin Mackenzie had already begun a topographical survey of the Mysore region.
_	By the time that Alice Coleman's critique of 1960s planned housing, "Utopia on Trial" (1985), was published, the estate was regarded as being representative of unsuccessful large-scale social housing projects.
_	This is another moment believed to have been the time that Smith hollered out, "My God, don't shoot," but Murphy pulled the trigger, killing him instantly with a bullet to the heart.
_	When the Prussian plan was cancelled, Queen Caroline saw a need to arrange a new marriage quickly, as there were rumours circulating at the time that Frederick had received an offer to marry the granddaughter of the Duchess of Marlborough, Lady Diana Spencer, in the duchess's lodge at Richmond.
_	This was a $3 million study done for the Resolution Trust Corporation by the Pillsbury, Madison & Sutro law firm at the time that Madison Guaranty Savings & Loan was dissolved.
_	At the time that the Railway Act had been passed the 5000 citizens of Rockhampton objected to having no provision made for the construction of a railway to their hinterland.
_	However, both "Alien"<nowiki>'</nowiki>s director Ridley Scott and screenwriter Dan O'Bannon claimed at the time that they had never seen "Planet of the Vampires".
_	Basie also added flute to some numbers, a novelty at the time that became widely copied.
_	The universities are all of different ages with the established age representing the time that each institution was granted its own university status.
_	It was thought at the time that money would be better invested on designing new aircraft types than building a third London airport.
_	At the time that she worked for the service, it was an experimental unit and only adopted across the NHS in the 1980s.
_	Ingvar Kamprad's IKEA opened its first UK store in Warrington on 1 October 1987; the UK was the 20th country at the time that IKEA had been established; Germany has the most IKEA outlets.
_	Scott Ritter, former Chief UN Weapons Inspector in Iraq, stated at the time that McChrystal should be fired for insubordination for disclosing information that he should have said only in private to the President of the United States.
_	It was reported at the time that his arthritic wrist had "lost its snap, and the power of his bat and throwing arm was gone."
_	By the time that shooting was rescheduled, some actors were otherwise committed, and the ITV Network Centre was left with no option but to cancel filming for a fourth series.
_	"Ford Star Jubilee" routinely featured major stars, such as Judy Garland, Betty Grable, Orson Welles, Julie Andrews (at the time that she was preparing for her starring role in "My Fair Lady" on Broadway), Louis Armstrong, Bing Crosby, Lillian Gish, Charles Laughton, Jack Lemmon, Raymond Massey, Lauren Bacall, Claudette Colbert, Noël Coward, Nat 'King' Cole, Mary Martin, Eddie Fisher, Ella Fitzgerald, Red Skelton and Debbie Reynolds.
_	Jessica died in 1932 around the time that Darling was commissioner in Rawalpindi.
_	About the time that the Autograph records of Crawford were made, Jesse Crawford accepted an offer to be organist at the Paramount Theatre in New York City.
_	His marriage collapsed around the time that his pathology work at Sick Children's received heavy scrutiny.
_	The distinguishing feature of a prospective cohort study is that at the time that the investigators begin enrolling subjects and collecting baseline exposure information, none of the subjects have developed any of the outcomes of interest.
_	A pattern florin exists for King Edward, which would have been due to receive approval around the time that the King abdicated in December 1936.
_	The revised 1978 version ended with Debby Boone's "You Light Up My Life" (the number one song at the time that version was being prepared), while the 1981 version ended with 1981's "I Love a Rainy Night" (Eddie Rabbitt), followed by The Beatles' version of "Rock and Roll Music".
_	In the time that it takes us to die, other forces and commanders can come and take our place."
_	In 1969, Fay lost his national committeeman's position about the time that the attorney William Steger was elected state party chairman to succeed Peter O'Donnell of Dallas.
_	The film consists on a series of archival footage, all previously approved by the Francoist censorship, with popular songs of the time that give a second meaning, often satirical, to what is displayed.
_	The items in the store were initially marked up 7% to account for the labor required to bring them to market with the price increasing the longer the time that a customer spent with the shopkeeper, as measured by a timer dial; later this markup was reduced to 4%.
_	Georges Heights was named after King George III, who reigned from 1760 to 1820, which was during the time that the First Fleet left Portsmouth, England in 1788 and arrived in what is now Sydney Harbour.
_	She was under attack by Japanese aircraft at the time that a ceasefire was announced, and possibly fired some of the last shots of World War II.
_	Yu proposes that Asii were "probably" the dominant tribe of a confederacy of four Issedonean tribes "from the time that they had settled in the valleys of the Ili and Chu" who later invaded Sogdiana and Bactria.
_	Support for these programs is limited to the time that the author has available.
_	At the time that the Protestant Reformation took hold in Utrecht, Calvinist mobs attacked the Catholic cathedral there.
_	He lost a closely contested election for Los Angeles County Supervisor and said at the time that perhaps actors were not suited to run for political office.
_	It was rumored at the time that he was appointed bey only because his uncle was not killed, had converted to Islam, and had become an officer in the Ottoman army.
_	It was also one of the few banks at the time that would hire African Americans as tellers, clerks and bookkeepers.
_	Lebanese bankers stated at the time that the crack was simply due to the fact that Beidas was overextended.
_	This choice saves the time that the algorithm would otherwise spend adjusting the weights of vertices in its priority queue.
_	However it is clear from the documentation of the time that the regeneration reserves, as distinct from the tree plantations, utilised principles of natural regeneration and also principles of what is today known as the contemporary restoration concept ecological restoration.
_	Louis B. Mayer decided to keep both girls, but by the time that decision was made, Durbin's contract option had lapsed.
_	However, this paper was very expensive and generally had to be imported at the time that illuminated manuscripts were being widely made, so it appears less often than the third alternative, parchment (Permanence/Durability of the Book 11).
_	It was decreed at the time that a place be appointed that was convenient to the parish priest and the parishioners.
_	American rock critic Dave Marsh noted comments by disc jockeys of the time that the song was "the 'Louie Louie' of the nineties" and wrote, "Like 'Louie', only more so, 'Teen Spirit' reveals its secrets reluctantly and then often incoherently."
_	It was perceived at the time that the resulting model would be a stopgap until the new T45 range was ready for production toward the latter half of the 1970s.
_	Egede's (now ship-borne) explorations found no Norse survivors along the western shore and future work was hampered by the two mistaken beliefs both prevalent at the time that the Eastern Settlement would be located on Greenland's east coast (it was later established it had been among the fjords of the island's extreme southwest) and that a strait existed nearby communicating with the western half of the island.
_	It was his business connections through his roles at Southern Pacific and his involvement in the influential social clubs of the time that gave legitimacy to the enterprise, drawing in an influential and well-heeled group of early residents to bring his vision of a bucolic residential commuter community to light.
_	Burruss wrote at the time that "Jerry Boykin is a Christian gentleman of the highest order."
_	The time is calculated from when the burn occurred, and not from the time that fluid resuscitation began.
_	By the time that he was a teenager, he had formed the McClurkin Singers, and later he formed another group, the New York Restoration Choir, with recordings from as early as 1975.
_	According to the "Globe", Marshall also "railed" against Norplant, a contraceptive not-yet-marketed at the time that is implanted under the skin and works for up to five years.
_	Despite the fact that McMahon could not physically have perpetrated the alleged rape, and the lack of any evidence that a crime had even taken place, McMahon (who had no idea at the time that he had been subpoenaed) was arrested in a restaurant on April 7, 2011, in front of television news cameras.
_	No more were built, because by the time that further 0-4-4Ts were required, Wainwright's H class design was ready; it owed much to the R1 class.
_	There had been many LGBT customers at Cooper's taken into custody before, and on the day of the riot, two police officers entered the cafe and asked patrons for ID as LA law dictated at the time that if a person's gender presentation did not match the gender shown on their ID they were taken to jail.
_	Under the current law there are two applications of the insanity defence; where it is claimed that the defendant was insane at the time that he committed the crime, and where it is claimed that he was insane at the time of the trial and thus unable to effectively defend himself.
_	In 1984 he co-authored a scientific paper critical of the evidence available at the time that homosexuality might be genetic.
_	Because the composition of written works was yet uncommon at the time that the Jewish Kalam flourished, there are few surviving books from this era.
_	Campbell commented in a letter at the time that "Sinister Barrier", "Trouble with Water", and Where Angels Fear ... by Manly Wade Wellman were the only stories in the first issue that accurately reflected his goals for the magazine.
_	WPA policies were consistent with the strong belief of the time that husbands and wives should not both be working (because the second person working would take one job away from some other breadwinner).
_	On the issue of the LDS Church policy of the time that did not allow black people in its lay clergy, she defended the church, saying, "If my church taught me anything other than that the Negro is equal to any other person, I could not accept it."
_	Around the time that the Aksumite empire began to decline, the burgeoning religion of Islam made its first inroads in the Abyssinian highlands.
_	Hi Records, however, did not release the song as a single at the time that the album "I'm Still in Love with You" was on the charts, instead releasing the title track, "Look What You Done for Me," and "For the Good Times."
_	Around the time that the film was produced, Universal Studios were producing a number of musicals named after well-known songs, such as "Ma, He's Making Eyes At Me" and "I'm Nobody's Sweetheart Now".
_	At the time that it disbanded, Guard said that The Whiskeyhill Singers had posted a loss of $10,000.
_	On the children's show, "Sesame Street", Parton and this song were spoofed, respectively as Polly Darton, performed by veteran Muppeteer Fran Brill, and "Counting One to Five", about the time that Polly went to school, when her teacher asked her to count to five.
_	There was no expectation at the time that road transport would be able to adequately serve the public transport needs of Wainuiomata, thus a rail link was considered to be a very real possibility.
_	The newspaper reported at the time that he was “Lying on a sick bed, from which he may never arise”, ill from an attack of gastritis, “too weak even to sit up.”
_	NME reported at the time that, while Foxton and Weller apparently reconciled no later than 2010, "Weller and Buckler are said to have not been in the same room since their band’s demise."
_	Verizon said at the time that it planned to have two Android-based handsets on the market by year-end with more to come in 2010.
_	In the time that followed, Hollnich was mentioned several times in documents in connection with the Ehrenbergs’ ownership matters and taxation obligations, until in 1492, Landgrave Wilhelm of Hesse enfeoffed Johann, "Vogt" of Hunolstein, with the taxes in oats, chickens and money at Hollnich.
_	But in 1995, ratings dipped and Leno's show consistently beat Letterman's in the ratings from the time that Hugh Grant came on Leno's show after Grant's arrest for soliciting a prostitute;
_	It was thought at the time that these air raids were attempts to attack the important 11 Group Fighter Command Sector Station nearby at RAF Middle Wallop, but German records make it clear that RAF Andover was the intended target, as the Luftwaffe thought wrongly that it was an operational bomber station.
_	There was not much Republican versus Democrat infighting and partisanship, it was really about issues at the time that I served.
_	Relative surplus value is amplified because machinery shortens the part of the day that the worker works for his or her means of subsistence and increases the time that the worker produces for the capitalist.
_	These can be excavated and analysed to reveal how the geography and life has changed during the time that they were deposited.
_	For example, the Unihan database entry for 亀 (U+4E80) considers 龜 (U+9F9C) to be its z-variant, but the entry for 龜 does not list 亀 as a z-variant, even though 龜 was obviously already in the database at the time that the entry for 亀 was written.
_	At the time that Layforce was raised, the British were in the ascendency in the theatre, as they had largely defeated the Italians.
_	This graphics-rendering technique was an innovative technological achievement at the time that made racing games more realistic, the first of which was "F-Zero".
_	According to his introduction, "When Zabdiel Podbury fled from Stoke-on-Tritham in the Spring of 1689 with Drusilla Ives, taking passage on the bark Promise, sailing for Massachusetts Bay, it was not realized at the time that, from this union, and the joint labors of the Penthesilean pair, the village of Stotham (so named by them in memory of their autochthonous abode) would in later days come to be regarded as a typical example, although, perhaps, not so well known, of the unspoiled New England Village."
_	South Africa had close relations with Portugal, particularly during the time that Mozambique and Angola were Portuguese colonies.
_	Mansfield was performing in the London production of the "Strange Case of Dr Jekyll and Mr Hyde" in 1888 during the time that Jack the Ripper was murdering prostitutes in London.
_	This view was a key motivation for the ethnologists who collected and preserved examples of Australian Aboriginal music, since it was widely believed at the time that the Aboriginal "race" and Aboriginal culture would eventually die out.
_	Soliman said that "Corrective measures have been undertaken since the time that the reports came out."
_	After the press conference, William Adama and his son, Lee Adama argue with Tom Zarek, who opposes the planned official alliance with the Cylons, stating that in the time that he is the acting president, such an alliance will not happen.
_	At the time that W. S. Gilbert began writing plays:
_	It was not known at the time that Churchill had done a deal with Clement Attlee and the Labour government which came to office in 1945.
_	Neighbors reported nothing unusual during the time that the Lutzes were living there.
_	By the time that the plans were put before the Monitor Board in New York City, Ericsson and Simers had a poor relationship, and Chief of the Bureau of Construction and Repair John Lenthall had little connection to the board.
_	Greater Media stated at the time that classical music would be best preserved as a non-commercial format; Greater Media's support of WRTI also served to deflect criticism that the company was taking away Philadelphia's only Classical radio station.
_	Following Reinboldt's death, around the time that the Mark Foley scandal broke in 2006, Burdge unsuccessfully attempted to bring the charges against Hastert to light; she contacted ABC News and the Associated Press on an off-the-record basis, and also contacted some advocacy groups.
_	Olson was 55 at the time that Wyeth created the work.
_	The MTA's Light Rail began service around the time that Oriole Park at Camden Yards opened.
_	Fort Brooke recorded peak winds of , and a barometer at the fort measured a minimum pressure of , though the winds were still blowing at the time that reading was made.
_	As a vocalist and a songwriter of the band, Tamaki spawned multiple successful compositions which were mostly co-written by lyricists including Goro Matsui and Yosui Inoue, by the time that the group suspended their career in 1993.
_	These techniques were based upon the manner in which the AllAdvantage "Viewbar" tracked the time that users actively spent browsing the web, through the detection of which applications were "in focus" as well as keyboard and mouse movements.
_	By the time that Michell's paper was rediscovered nearly two centuries later, these ideas had been reinvented by others.
_	Clear references are made to the exact time the bomb detonated ("It's eight fifteen, and that's the time that it's always been"), and questions are asked as to whether the action was necessary.
_	At the time that the episode was produced, new, more stringent censorship laws had been put in place.
_	Anderson said: "If I didn’t come up with it right then, there were a lot of other people at the time that were working toward that same end goal.
_	This was to coincide with increasing deregulation of the private sector rental market as it was felt at the time that local authorities would have a better understanding of local rental market conditions than the DSS.
_	Maddox, who also designed Priory Street in Monmouth, resided at Kingsley House on nearby Monk Street during the time that Priory Street was planned and constructed.
_	Although it was widely believed at the time that communists had set the bombs, the government took no official action against the French Communist Party, to the disappointment of "Cagoulards."
_	"Exclaim!" magazine reported at the time that Jean would retire as chairman of Yéle Haiti.
_	First issue of "Rzeczpospolita Polska" was published on 15 March 1941, and last in July 1945, at the time that the Council of National Unity and the Government Delegation had disbanded.
_	At the time that the First World War broke out, Acharya had reached Berlin and was one of the founding members of the Berlin Committee that reorganised the liaison's and terms of German help for revolution in India, which had initially faltered on account of differences between Har Dayal and German Foreign office.
_	This was according to custom of the time that Elizabeth Gordon, of her own free will, resigned her lands before Parliament at Perth and she and the Regent Albany issued a new charter of "All and whole of the lands and baronies of Gordon and Huntly lying within the sheriffdom of Berwick; the lands of Fogo and Faunes with their pertinents; the lands of Strathbogie and Beldygordon with the pertinents in Aberdeenshire; to be held by the said Alexander and Elizabeth and their heirs lawfully procreated; whom failing the true and lawful heirs of the said Elizabeth whomsoever; rendering the services used and wont."
_	As an Irish design, it was an unusual sight and brought a lot of attention along the way, in part because of rumors circulating at the time that Ireland might soon invade Scotland.
_	The band was promptly renamed "Devilish" due to an article published at the time that referred to their "devilishly great" sound.
_	Station owners stated at the time that this was because they could not sell enough ad time.
_	This is in order to minimise the time that the video player takes to locate and focus on the second layer and thus provide the shortest possible pause in the content as the layer changes.
_	The color scheme is caused by the concentration of iron present in the groundwater at the time that each new layer was being deposited.
_	He led the Carabineros Corps, established by a royal decree issued by King Fernando VII in 1829 at the time that Luis López Ballesteros was Minister of Finance.
_	Scholars have suggested that these reflect clichés current at the time that he accepted uncritically, rather than any racism.
_	Anglicans in Botswana felt at the time that being part of the Diocese of Matebeleland meant that their church remained “foreign in its own country” (previously it had been part of the Diocese of Kimberley and Kuruman).
_	Edmondson has not performed the cheer since his second retirement, saying at the time that "at 86 years of age, I've got to slow down.
_	By the time that European settlers arrived around 1600–1650, a significant percentage of the Indians living in the eastern region had been ravaged by disease, possibly introduced to them decades before by explorers and sailors (although no conclusive cause has ever been established).
_	Sufficient low-grade ciphers had been broken to reveal the Italian order of battle and the supply situation, by the time that the British offensive began on 19 January 1941.
_	Well he didn’t know at the time that he was to go on and conduct the band for 50 years.
_	Because its deposits, stretching from Gisborne to the Bay of Islands, were emplaced around the time that Māori permanently settled New Zealand, they have provided a useful archaeological marker.
_	By the time that Steele arrived back in Little Rock, after 40 days in which the expedition had covered 275 miles, he had lost 635 of the 800 wagons and 2,500 horses and mules, not including at least 150 wagons and several hundred horses and mules lost at the Battle of Marks' Mill.
_	Parsons commented at the time that he felt frustrated in having to accommodate the views of some of the musicians, which he felt interfered with his production.
_	During the time that UMUC had a campus in Mannheim, this beer was a popular choice among its students.
_	He was appointed CEO of Focus (DIY) on its acquisition by Cerberus Capital for £230m in June 2007, stating at the time that "Focus has the potential to be one of the most successful operators in the DIY sector".
_	Renewable energy for cooking and heating can reduce the time that children spend out of school collecting fuel.
_	Look at the time that aviator flew that serum to those Eskimos up north."
_	At the time that Governor Thomas B. Robertson resigned in 1824 to accept appointment as a federal judge, Thibodaux was President of the State Senate and succeeded him as Acting Governor, until Henry Johnson was elected.
_	Morrison's love of live performing was reignited by this set of concerts and he commented at the time that it was "more like appearing in a play, going to the theatre and doing your job every day - which I prefer to touring because that's very fragmented and disorientating."
_	However, even at the time that Edgar Snow's account was written, there were estimates that the distance traveled was closer to 18,000 li (9,375 km).
_	The authors who used the Annalistic tradition wrote histories year-by-year, from the beginning, which was most frequently from the founding of the city, usually up until the time that they were living in.
_	The timber industry has dominated the area historically with logging of the lower basin starting about 1852, around the time that the first mill was constructed in what was then known as Mendocino City.
_	By the time that the writers' and directors' guide for the series was published, dated March 23, 1987, the character was named Natasha "Tasha" Yar.
_	Bernie Ecclestone claimed of Charles Nickerson at the time that "He has bought nothing in Formula One.
_	During the time that Old Camp was built the Company also a clinic building that served the employees and was staffed at least part-time by a Doctor, Doctor Wong.
_	By the time that it reached Denmark as Gniao (the miaowing of a cat — "" in Italian), it had 42 cards.
_	This record was later officially beaten by the English "Mallard", a LNER Class A4 locomotive, although criticism was expressed at the time that this took place on a descent and that the locomotive did not survive the record journey without damage.
_	The loss of sound engineer John Archer and his Crystal Clear sound system in the early 1990s was a devastating blow for Creek and their fans, as was the decision to stop touring at the time that the jam band scene was heating up.
_	I felt he was so vital to what we were doing with "Spider-Man" at the time that I found myself doing something I never thought I'd want to do, which was to add yet another "Spider-Man" book".
_	To make up the full field of 156, additional places are allocated in ranking order from the Official World Golf Ranking at the time that these places are made available by the Championship Committee.
_	At the time that Getzinger joined the club, it was the dominant team in the National Soccer League of Chicago, having won the league title several years in a row.
_	At the time that it closed in 1980, "Grease"s 3,388-performance run was the longest yet in Broadway history, although it was surpassed by "A Chorus Line" on September 29, 1983.
_	Cāttanār, the author of the "Manimekalai", reflected the perception at the time that Naga Nadu was an autonomous administrative entity, kingdom or "nadu" stretching across coastal districts, distinguished from the rest of the island also ruled intermittently by Naga kings.
_	Unlike most banjo music in the popular minstrel shows of the time that more closely followed the melody of dance music, most of "The Banjo" consists of variations of a repeating phrase as is done by musicians in the Senegambia region in West Africa, the source for the banjo's ancestors.
_	Alexander appears to have conducted further operations in the north in 1230, about the time that the Meic Uilleim were extirpated once and for all.
_	It was reported at the time that Simon Grayson, the Caretaker Manager at Blackpool looked to bring Galas to Blackpool but restricted finances couldn't enable the move.
_	Cagle said at the time that "The forcible entry is blatantly false."
_	The narrator tells his former lover that he was going to give her everything in a week or two after the time that they had broken up.
_	Approaching the time that the group was ready to deliver their second album, Naturi Naughton announced that she was no longer a member of the group.
_	He hired several former officers from the German General Staff to tutor him, and by the time that he returned to Japan, he had formed a considerable background on military theory and doctrine.
_	Marcel Berlins wrote in "The Guardian" at the time that Cranston's appointment was unusual among judicial appointments in recent years, given that it occurred so soon after the end of his political career.
_	S.A.-Mann Brand (Storm Trooper Brand) is a German film made around the time that Adolf Hitler became Chancellor of Germany.
_	Though Kasahara acknowledges that many Chinese people left the city after November 23, he suspects that the influx of new refugees would likely have brought the city's civilian population up to roughly 400,000-500,000 by the time that the Japanese arrived.
_	Logi said at the time that the hiring process was highly political.
_	O'Rourke was an accomplished producer as well as a musician, and had produced over 200 albums by the time that Tweedy requested the collaboration.
_	"However, there are no official Marine Corps records produced at the time that can prove or refute Mr. Jacobs' location."
_	From the time that the photon is scattered at r until it is absorbed at r, the photon undergoes a change in phase
_	Haji Mohammad Rasjidi was State Minister at the time that handled Islamic affairs.
_	At the time that his promotion was announced, he was overseeing a project to repair the Yellow River levees.
_	He was suspended by his club in 1919 over a payment dispute, but there were incorrect rumours at the time that it was because he had been suspected of playing dead in a game.
_	The variable dm/dt is the rate of mass transfer into the gas phase, De is the average diffusion coefficient of free aroma molecules in the emulsion, Agc is the surface area of the gas/food interface, tc is the time that the surface elements are exposed to the surface, and cei(t) and ce(t) are the concentrations of aroma compounds in the interface and emulsion, respectively.
_	His mother Hilda had a strong relationship with her son, which dated from the time that Ronald's father was brutal with the family.
_	Although Malone was 20 years old at the time that the 13-year-old Gloria Bell was impregnated, she said that her family chose not to pursue criminal charges against Malone over the relationship.
_	The Bozell family grew to 23 grandchildren and a great-grandchild by the time that Bozell died.
_	At the time that Castro attended elementary school, schools were segregated in Douglas, and he attended the Fifteenth Street School, which was only for Mexican students.
_	Given that African American voters are typically Democratic voters, it was argued at the time that their exclusion "decisively" changed the outcome of the election.
_	From then until the US parent sold out in 1982, a number of branches were closed and sold, and at the time that ownership shifted to the UK, there were about 1,000 branches.
_	About the time that Macdonald published his prize winning essay on electric waves, Guglielmo Marconi was successful in the transmission of the first wireless signals across the Atlantic.
_	However, by the time that the National Football League awarded Fox the rights to broadcast games from the National Football Conference in 1993, it became convinced that the network would not be viable without more VHF affiliates.
_	By the time that the Normans conquered England in 1066, the town of Southampton occupied a rectangular area overlooking the mouth of the River Test, an important medieval waterway.
_	The unit cost of the last Type 12Ms had been about £10m; Type 21s cost around £20m each; when the first Type 22s were ordered, unit costs were estimated at £30m though, by the time that the first ship (HMS "Broadsword") commissioned in 1979, inflation had driven this figure up to £68m, which was far higher than the cost of the contemporary Type 42s (HMS "Glasgow", also commissioned in 1979, cost £40m).
_	At the time that Sheikh Hasina, the president of the Bangladesh Awami League, concluded her speech, nine grenades exploded.
_	A local journalist wrote at the time that Durham "has as good a knowledge of medicine as most of the gentlemen who practice.
_	Gosnell said "I realized at the time that I probably didn't have the ability to go on as a pro ball player, so it was a lot easier to do it."
_	Richard Longford and his amanuensis, from an earlier exemplar owned by Einion ab Addain, who was serving a prison sentence in Pontefract at the time that it was copied.
_	On May 26, 2008, Emerson was appointed Minister of Foreign Affairs following the resignation of Maxime Bernier, though it was reported at the time that Emerson's appointment to the position would be brief.
_	The site developed between 300 and 700 CE, at the time that Teotihuacan was declining and Tula was rising.
_	Slocum's log records that, at the time that passengers of the steamer were up to their knees in water in the big ship's saloon, "Spray" was laying snug under a goose-winged mainsail.
_	At the time that he died in 2007, a substantial percentage of all researchers in the world who were working with "Neurospora crassa" had either trained with or collaborated with Perkins or one of his students or associates.
_	During the time that Slovakia was part of Austria-Hungary, the village was listed on Hungarian maps under the name "Erdovagas".
_	During the time that Jack Spratt owned the vessel; it featured of sail and a six-cylinder Hercules truck engine, which was later replaced by a Palmer auxiliary engine.
_	The station's launch Chief Executive was Mike Powell who specified digital technology so advanced at the time that it was featured on the BBC science programme, "Tomorrow's World".
_	The band released the "A Room with a View" video and single under the name "D.A." and Cavestany explained to a reporter at the time that he now found the band's original name "Restricting.
_	Like many of the tracks on "Low Budget", it applies to the economic troubles occurring during the time that the album was released, such as strikes in Great Britain.
_	SECA/SCETV, however, was one of the very few public broadcasting entities of the time that was sympathetic to the conservative movement.
_	On October 18, "People" produced six corroborating witnesses who said Stoynoff had recounted the incident to them around the time that it occurred.
_	The time of day was associated with the time that women would begin to work for free if they were paid the same as their male counterparts.
_	By the time that Royal Applause reappeared in the Gimcrack Stakes at York in August, the form of his Ascot win had been boosted when the fourth placed Tagula won the July Stakes at Newmarket.
_	In the time that followed, the Reformed Church’s followers were subjected to great oppression, mainly by the Lutheran clergy.
_	The circa 26,000 B.P. time frame has been widely used by researchers as the approximate the time that sediments and mammoths bones accumulated within the sinkhole within the Mammoth Site of Hot Springs.
_	At the time that van Gogh painted this portrait he was 35 years old.
_	During the time that Cotton was establishing herself as a professional artist reporters found it odd that an influential society woman would, as one of them said, challenge the successful male portraitists such as Sargent or George Burroughs Torrey.
_	The US embassy in Moscow denounced that the pro-Russian military power surpassed at the time that of several NATO countries.
_	Some commentators said at the time that the cancellation was evidence that the (English language) massively multiplayer market had become saturated, though "World of Warcraft", released in November 2004, subsequently became the most popular MMORPG in the West with over 3 million Western subscribers as of December 2007.
_	He later left Origin for Looking Glass Technologies near the time that they were producing "", but kept the idea in mind.
_	Leslie Hamilton, the Cardiff club doctor, later said that he had believed at the time that Andrews was being far too soft on Friday; indeed, according to teammate Paul Went, the forward would simply leave after each match and not be heard of until he returned for the next game.
_	"The Courier-Mail" noted at the time that the Brisbane Repertory Theatre had made Australian theatre history by owning the first theatre in the country to be designed and built "in the round", a significant departure from traditional theatre design.
_	A string of large igneous province (LIP) volcanic events took place in three pulses during the time that the craton was part of Columbia, until the supercontinent fragmented.
_	It was speculated at the time that the lodge was to become an official residence of the Taoiseach.
_	From the time that the meadow jumping mouse goes into hibernation to the time it comes out there is a significant amount of weight loss.
_	The series was widely seen as a copycat and derivative of "The Apprentice", a popular show of the time that was hosted by Donald Trump.
_	He believed that the versions received by the evangelists had already been redacted and was therefore not in its original form at the time that they received it.
_	The move occurred around the time that the station was switching from being a CBS affiliate to Fox. From 1995 to 2005, Smith was the co-anchor of the 5 p.m., 6 p.m., and 10 p.m. newscasts with longtime anchor Tim Taylor.
_	On top of that, it was discovered that, in some cases, the CIA suspected at the time that the sources were compromised, but the information was sent up the chain as genuine.
_	Because first base was open, instead of a force play, the play became a "time play", requiring the home plate umpire (for this game, Larry Vanover) to judge the position of Ethier at the time that Pierre was put out.
_	It was noted in a news report of the time that all four unions were likely to appeal to the federal ALP executive and that they had the support of then Prime Minister Bob Hawke.
_	In other words, the wrongdoer must intend to commit or be negligent in the commission of the crime at the time that the crime is being committed.
_	Some tracks, such as "Where Does Love Go" and "Suddenly Single," have a glossy, contemporary sound typical of Bowen at the time that dates them to an extent, but Jennings singing is characteristically strong.
_	There was some suggestion at the time that Brindley had added extra meanders to increase the length of the canal, and therefore the tolls that could be charged, but this was strenuously denied in a newspaper advertisement placed by Brindley on 14 January 1771, where he argued that the winding route was necessary to ensure that the most customers could be served.
_	Likewise, the style that was to become known as Baroque evolved in Italy in the early 17th century, at about the time that the first fully Renaissance buildings were constructed at Greenwich and Whitehall in England, after a prolonged period of experimentation with Classical motifs applied to local architectural forms, or conversely, the adoption of Renaissance structural forms in the broadest sense with an absence of the formulae that governed their use.
_	The Telecaster Custom was introduced just around the time that Fender began to lose its reputation as a quality instrument company.
_	The first director, Paul Küppers, stated at the time that the aim was to present artworks which "do not simply function as a relaxing amusement but instead have a stimulating and – if necessary – provocative and scandalizing effect".
_	Muller believed it would take about four years from the time that the E8/E12 is revealed to actual production.
_	A potential conflict of interest was cited, because at the time that he was working with the filmmakers, the cases against the defendants involved had not yet been resolved.
_	Features that have now been removed include two earth closets, sited either side and to the south of the memorial, which were probably removed around the time that the new toilet block was installed.
_	The Duchy of Estonia (, , ), also known as Swedish Estonia, () was a dominion of the Swedish Empire from 1561 until 1721 during the time that most or all of Estonia was under Swedish rule.
_	In December 2012 he joined Middlesex as their new batting coach and it was reported at the time that he relished the opportunity of working with the players.
_	Following the Pan-African orogeny, in the Cambrian at the time that multi-cellular life proliferated, Nigeria began to experience regional sedimentation and witnessed new igneous intrusions.
_	Although this building has two romanesque windows and a massive pilaster on the front, it is in all probability an early 17th rebuild from the time that the Christ’s Hospital Bluecoat School occupied the premises.
_	Prior to political office she worked as a waitress during the time that she lived in the United States.
_	By the time that he was out of high school, he spoke not only English and his native Italian but also French and had studied Latin as well.
_	By the time that the pan-Asiatic regained any prominence, Japan's aggressive and often nihilistic war in China had robbed her of the high ground that Japan held among the Indian population, and among Indian nationalist leadership.
_	Another collegiate tower modeled after the Boston stump, Harkness Tower at Yale University, was completed around the time that the Alexander Graham Bell tower was planned.
_	From the time that the Schertz and Cibolo Common School Districts consolidated in 1940, the high school was called Schertz-Cibolo High School; first, when it was located in Cibolo in the 1916 building (on Loop 539) and then when it was located in Schertz in the 1953 structure located at 301 Main.
_	Sometime in the time that followed, a preceptory arose in Sulzbach.
_	The extinction of humanity has taken four months from the time that the missiles were first fired.
_	Around the time that "Parallel Universe" was released, the Church had returned to the studio to record yet another album, eventually titled "Forget Yourself".
_	The tax bracket is determined at the time that the distributions are taken.
_	The Bishopric of Ras emerged sometime during the 9th century, in the time that was marked by great missionary work of saints Cyril and Methodius and their disciples among Slavs, from Great Moravia in the north to Bulgaria in the east.
_	The school has hosted 7th and 8th;grades at the time that the Barnstable Middle School at Hyannis was being renovated.
_	After remembering some charities in Winnipeg, such as the Children’s Hospital, he left the residue of his estate to his alma mater, Depauw University, although it was admitted at the time that his assets consisted largely of real estate which were not readily marketable.
_	Shields has since claimed that he was unaware at the time that My Bloody Valentine was the title of a 1981 Canadian slasher film.
_	He acknowledged that he was conscious at the time that he was using a racial stereotype but remained unapologetic about it, stating that "at the time humor consisted in our society of bad English and physical difference in identity."
_	ToyNews at the time that "it’s a lot of worlds to manage, but we have really strong teams."
_	This is the time that H. A. Weymann and Son, the company, started earning media coverage in the Music Trade Review, and local newspapers such as the Philadelphia Inquirer, as a significant music instrument wholesaler.
_	Hunte, who had retired hurt when the total was 24, returned to make 72* by the time that West Indies declared 55 behind in the hope of forcing a win.
_	AboveNet acquired PAIX, and later sold it to Switch and Data around the time that AboveNet filed for chapter 11 bankruptcy protection.
_	The United States Department of Education conducted a 2003 Program Review of Collins College and found several serious problems with the school's administration of federal financial aid programs including: "many students failed to meet the attendance threshold...[and that the College's] practice of not considering failed courses as part of the [cumulative GPA] at the time that students fail the course...may...be falsely permitting those students to remain eligible for Title IV disbursements" and "Collins College had used "a coordinated subterfuge to under-report the effect" of federal financial aid dollars disbursed in order to show compliance with the so-called 90/10 Rule."
_	Horsky said at the time that he didn't know where Harvard was on a map.
_	York was with Self at the time that Matt decided to do his routine check on his neighbors, and was not at all expecting what he was about to witness.
_	At the time that it was inhabited, it was necessary to pass through seven entrances before being able to penetrate into the castle.
_	"The Female Bunch" was shot in the summer of 1969 at the Spahn Ranch during the time that it was occupied by the Manson Family.
_	Prosper's younger sister Melanie Caroline Jeanne Mestre was born 15 months later on 15 November 1790 in Lorient, and her father André Charles and her mother Helene claimed at the time that they had married in 1788 in Helene's home town of Rennes.
_	She photographed each site at dawn, the time that most of the men were executed; close to the date on which they occurred; and from around the same vantage that they were shot.
_	It was also noted at the time that the whole of the Grafton Gully area was likely to be needed for motorway use at some point in the not-too-distant future.
_	An intelligence official who was briefed at the time that the authorities learned of the threat, and who wished to remain anonymous, told "The New York Times" that some in the intelligence community had been skeptical of the supposed plot, particularly of the idea that the plot had been called off by Mr. al-Zawahiri.
_	At the time that Belcourt was purchased in 1956, the Tinney family comprised Harold Tinney, his wife Ruth Tinney, their son Donald Tinney, and Ruth's aunt Nellie Fuller (a descendant of Mayflower passenger Edward Fuller).
_	He felt at the time that his fellow chefs didn't give him much credit, as he wasn't well known prior to winning the accolades from Michelin.
_	About the time that all this was happening, 45 mya, the Chuckanut Formation was ceasing to gain deposits and the volcanic activity known as the North Cascades was in its youth.
_	Although the 709 was a superior machine to its predecessor, the 704, it was being built and sold at the time that transistor circuitry was supplanting vacuum tube circuits.
_	Overcome with passion, Alan begins kissing her and symbolically throws his pocket watch overboard, later explaining that he had become so focused on rushing all the time that he lost sight of what was most important.
_	The town of Arrah, headquarters of Shahabad district, besides its local inhabitants, had a population at the time that included British and European employees of the East India Company and the East Indian Railway Company, and their respective families.
_	At around the time that Bellini was in discussions with impresario Domenico Barbaja about a second opera for La Scala to follow "La straniera", the composer reported to his friend Francesco Florimo in Naples that he had been approached in August 1828 by another impresario, Bartolomeo Merelli, about writing the inaugural opera for the soon-to-be completed Teatro Ducale (now the Teatro Regio) in Parma which was due to open the following year on 12 May 1829.
_	In addition to the hotel suite in Amarillo, the couple lived in the capital of Austin during much of the time that Thompson served on the Railroad Commission.
_	It was reported at the time that officials believed the screening process would be compromised because Malta had outsourced the vetting of citizenship applicants to a single company.
_	She spent some years in Boston, Massachusetts during the emerging lesbian feminist movement at the time that the oft-quoted Combahee River Collective was in formation, even joining the Boston chapter of the Daughters of Bilitis.
_	Tertiary support was provided on an ad hoc basis from the time that the first Bridging Year students applied and were accepted to university.
_	The exact date for the foundation is uncertain, but it is first recorded in 1325 during the time that Bernard of Kilwinning (1324–c.1328) was Abbot of Arbroath.
_	About the time that Nunó first came to Mexico to start performing with the bands, Santa Anna was making his announcement about creating a national anthem for Mexico.
_	At the time that many of these cases were documented, there were limited medical resources to deal with many of these soldier's mental well-being.
_	During the time that James Hacker served as Prime Minister of the United Kingdom, Wainwright served as his Chief Political Advisor.
_	Dúngal did not die until 1025, at about the time that Donnchad started to make his presence felt outside Munster.
_	Hemmings later said, "In all of the time that I spent with him he never abused that trust", and Crawford wrote "I cannot say enough about the kindness of that great man ... he had a wonderful patience and affinity with young people.
_	Baden said at the time that he knew he would be cleared of the allegations.
_	He continued to sit as an independent until the time that the following election was called.
_	The BBC, Telegraph, Guardian and Independent newspapers reported at the time that during the weeks between arriving in the UK from Nigeria and the attack he had been subjected to bullying and beating, which included homophobic remarks by a group of boys at his school.
_	However, rare is the time that a student needs more than the two provided 80-minute sessions.
_	Kim travelled to China again in August 2010, this time with his son, fueling speculation at the time that he was ready to hand over power to his son, Kim Jong-un.
_	To this charge she responded at the time that she had no excuses, and later conceded that the "realities of family life took precedence".
_	During its initial theatrical release in North America, a video game set within the Hellboy universe was released around the time that of the film entitled "" for PlayStation 3, PlayStation Portable and Xbox 360, released on June 24 in North America and August 15 in Europe.
_	At the time that Serbia annexed Kosovo (1912–1913), the 1903 constitution was still in force.
_	However, this cartridge was introduced about the time that the last of the great buffalo herds had been destroyed.
_	This came around the time that most Fox stations in larger markets were adding newscasts at 10 p.m. Central (11 p.m. Eastern).
_	By the time that the borough was reformed by the Municipal Corporations Act 1835, silver owls had been added both as crest above the shield, and as supporters on either side.
_	There was a widely held belief at the time that Jordan did not like Thomas because he was seen as the "ring leader" of the Detroit Pistons teams of the late 1980s and early 1990s, known as the "", that employed overtly physical tactics against Jordan in the NBA Playoffs that were meant to throw Jordan off of his game.
_	The anomaly in the case of the WDAF television and radio stations is due to the fact that Kansas City was originally located east of the original "K"/"W" border distinction defined by the FCC at the time that the WDAF call letters were assigned to both stations.)
_	As revealed in the season 2 episode "Vendetta", Aleksandr was Artie's Soviet contact during the time that he was trading artifacts in exchange for the release of family members from the Gulag.
_	This is also the time that the Sun is directly overhead at 23.5°N, a parallel now known as the Tropic of Cancer.
_	The famous Iraqi historian and sociologist Dr. Ali al-Wardi in his six volumes "the Social Glimpses of the History of Modern Iraq" describes Ahmed Uthman's wisdom and ability in saving the city of Erbil when it was surrounded and threatened by rebellious tribesmen, in meeting with the tribesmen outside the gates of the city all on his own, negotiating with their leaders, meeting some of their demands, and persuading them to leave, at the time that there was no military protection in the city.
_	Zwicker's testimony, as to whether he had known of Peress' refusal to testify before the same committee at the time that Zwicker granted his discharge, was apparently inconsistent.
_	In contrast to other alchemists of the time that only wanted to reproduce minerals, Zieglerin wanted to reproduce human life through her alchemic work.
_	This may be because most college students plan to quit smoking by the time that they graduate.
_	In the time that followed, the Protestant princes thoroughly rid themselves of Imperial restraint, which led to the formation of two denominationally oriented camps.
_	During the time that Sears sat as a Superior Court judge, eleven cases in which she rendered a verdict were ultimately reviewed by the Georgia Supreme Court.
_	There was wide speculation at the time that Speaker would cross the floor to Western Canada Concept.
_	At the time that trains grew into mass transport systems this was not enough anymore.
_	Gale hinted at the time that 1970 may be his last as head football coach at Wayne.
_	By eliminating the need for atmospheric oxygen, the time that a submarine could remain submerged was limited only by its food stores, as breathing air was recycled and fresh water distilled from seawater.
_	Some Congressmen said at the time that he could face criminal charges for lying to a parliamentary committee.
_	Gilbey left ATV Northern Songs at the time that the company was acquired by Robert Holmes a Court, and established a venture with MCA Music.
_	The tracks were composed over the course of 2½–3 years, though during the time that Jeffrey and Maury were still working under Eiffel 65.
_	As time progresses, disclosure in marriage has been found to decrease, often around the time that spouses reach their 40's.
_	Nevertheless, the view was expressed at the time that Hewitt's flight was "a more difficult and dangerous feat" than Corbett Wilson's.
_	About the time that the NUR and National Union of Seamen merged in 1990 to form the RMT the Federation broke down, and neither federation nor merger has been negotiated since.
_	The entire tour was so physically demanding and such a large production that Bowie said at the time that "I don't think I'll ever take a tour quite this elaborate out on the road again.
_	Thackeray was a successful 19th century writer and novelist by the time that he came to write "Vanity Fair", but was also a virtual-widower as his wife had been held in a mental institute since 1842 due to severe depression.
_	Cosell's comment seemed to have captured the widespread view held at the time that New York City was on the skids and in a state of decline.
_	He created this school during the time that the Gault Cotton Mills were up and running.
_	In addition, the instrument itself introduces a mechanical delay of about a quarter of a second between the time that MIDI data is received and the moment when the hammers audibly impact the strings.
_	She studied in private schools in Beijing from the time that was seven years old until she was fourteen, and she was graduated from the Honour Math program in the University of British Columbia.
_	The Prison Service claimed at the time that Peterborough as a 'mixed-use' prison would become a blueprint for the prisons of the future.
_	By the time that all parties were reunited at Hut Point on 25 March 1915 the men themselves were exhausted and frostbitten, and there was a significant loss of confidence in Aeneas Mackintosh, the leader.
_	Based on his geographic origin and subsequent service under Zhang Wanjin (張萬進), it appeared likely that he first came under Zhang's service around the time that Zhang, then a general of the post-Tang state of Yan, was serving as the commander of the army of Yan's Yichang Circuit (義昌, headquartered at Cang Prefecture) as, in 912, Zhang, angry over the violence and licentiousness of Yichang's military governor ("Jiedushi")
_	The New York Times noted at the time that from the Nixon visit to China through Deng's visit to the U.S., Ji was the only person on either side capable of interpreting from English to Chinese.
_	The court further held that the sergeant had known, at the time that he formed his alleged "reasonable belief," that the information regarding the previous owner of the vehicle, which had been furnished to him by Mnyungula before the sergeant had formed his alleged belief, had not been checked.
_	Congolese Prime Minister Henri Lopes is reported to have said at the time that "Cabinda exists as a reality and is historically and geographically different from Angola."
_	Line was renamed the 'Atlantic-Australasian Line' in November 1924 but seems to have been better known as the 'Atlantic-Australia Line' around the time that its operations were taken over by the Roosevelt Steamship Co. in 1926.
_	In the case of manuscripts that were sold commercially, the writing would “undoubtedly have been discussed initially between the patron and the scribe (or the scribe’s agent,) but by the time that the written gathering were sent off to the illuminator there was no longer any scope for innovation.
_	During the time that this party existed, it was usually referred to as the Republican Party.
_	Despite the heartache Jade has put him through and all the time that has passed without seeing each other, Lucas is still in love with her and firmly believes that they are meant to be, despite the unsporting attitudes he gets from his family, friends and sometimes even Jade herself.
_	Given the time that has passed, languages with extremely few speakers might be extinct today.
_	The Portuguese continued to call at Fukuda and the nearby Kuchinotsu for a few more years, but they felt the terrains of these ports were lacking and kept searching until Ōmura Sumitada offered the Jesuits the nearby port of Nagasaki, a mere fishing village at the time that the Portuguese found to be perfect.
_	During his lifetime he was considered to be the greatest expert on the Americas, although he never visited the continent; he also wrote at length on the origins of ancient peoples, rejecting the popular idea of the time that China was originally a colony of Ancient Egypt.
_	However, although the ANC's armed wing started its campaign in 1962, no victory was in sight by the time that Steve Biko was a medical student in the late 1960s.
_	Both schools were closed around the time that Malvern's schools were integrated, in 1970.
_	It was believed at the time that the fresh air was an effective treatment for the disease and patients were sometimes put outside in their beds and encouraged to breathe in the air.
_	At the time that Bolívar was victorious in the west, Santiago Mariño and Manuel Piar, a "pardo" from the Dutch island of Curaçao, were successfully fighting royalists in eastern Venezuela.
_	By 1894, a report was given by social reformer Elbridge Gerry that child murder has been practically stamped out in the City of New York from the time that the New York Foundling Hospital commenced.
_	It was reported at the time that "if a crimminal blinked at Jelly Bryce, he would die in darkness."
_	The senior guide on the ascent, Wayne Naylor, said at the time that Ed Stewart had carried his own equipment and was accompanied by his wife.
_	In Afrikaans, the word ʽsaktydʼ refers to the time that a magazine or newspaper is sent to a printer to be printed.
_	The Supreme Court ruled in 1976 (citing "Brewer v. Williams", 430 U.S. 387 at 398) that a defendant's right to an attorney attaches "at or after the time that judicial proceedings have been initiated against him, whether by formal charge, preliminary hearing, indictment, information, or arraignment."
_	While an interesting character, it was McMahon's realistic feud with Stone Cold Steve Austin who had proven to be a huge money making draw for the company and become the company's most popular wrestler at the time that made the company finally dominate its competition.
_	By the time that he reaches the bathroom, Dexter has returned to normal size.
_	By the time that Carrera arrived to take command of the siege, Joel Roberts Poinsett and Juan Mackenna had already compiled a plan showing the enemy fortifications and for the location of the artillery.
_	The branch had not opened at the time that the BWR was taken over, so the LSWR was the first to operate services on the line.
_	According to "International Tools Ltd. v. Kollar", in Canada the length of a permanent injunction to force a defendant to cease using the plaintiff’s information should not normally extend beyond the time that the plaintiff’s trade secrets remains a secret which is exclusively known to the plaintiff and its confidants.
_	This made Wyman the first former wife of a United States president who was still living at the time that her former husband became president.
_	By the time that the 21st Brigade arrived back in Australia, it was heavily depleted, with only 44 per cent of its authorised strength.
_	They added plants to the gardens, keeping its basic plan, but by the time that the second Miss Russell died, the gardens has become neglected.
_	In 2015 the New Zealand office of the Privacy Commissioner raised concerns that smart meters recorded personal information including the time that homeowners were home or not, the office said "the [smart meter] readings undoubtedly contained private information, and power companies needed to be more upfront about their handling of the torrent of personal information gathered by smart meters".
_	I was unable to write about him at the time that book was initially published, as he was suing my ass in the High Court."
_	Around the time that the WPA ceased to operate, Delaney was awarded a grant from the Julius Rosenwald Fund.
_	During the time that they are alive, these lamb are reported to act abnormal, such as acting weak, drowsy, or walking unsteadily.
_	It was estimated at the time that there were about 20,000 Filipino troops surrounding Manila, with their distribution and exact composition only partially known.
_	At the time that it was built, it was located in the Alief area of unincorporated Harris County; the area was annexed by Houston shortly thereafter.
_	However it was thought unlikely at the time that the Liberals would keep their majority due to the strong polling of the Greens and the Jacqui Lambie Network.
_	However, the Kentucky State Fair Board stated at the time that they were still open to negotiating a revised lease agreement.
_	During the time that the British had banned Bharathiyar's songs, Vazhuvoor made these songs performed by his students in stage plays, thereby encouraging the support of Indian Independence.
_	The administrators said at the time that there was no formal closure plan for the entire store network.
_	Moreover, her letter stated that "Despite the time that has passed ... I consider seeking a pardon ... could be rightly perceived as glossing over very grave criminal acts".
_	The band stated at the time that it wanted to experiment with other sounds, which included Shepherd and Cornell playing mandolin and mandola in the song "Ty Cobb".
_	Titmuss was hired as a roving reporter on the Channel 4 programme "Richard & Judy", in late 2003, and stated at the time that the job was "an absolute dream come true".
_	It was also expected at the time that he would also become the first Governor of the separated state, should this objective be achieved.
_	Veteran marathon runner Werner Sonntag took part in the 1976 Marathon-Athens race and reported in his weekly column that the German sports magazine, "", claimed at the time that Yordanidis cut the course by using a car; however, no proof of this assertion was ever provided to the WMA authorities.
_	It was believed at the time that securing the means for the music department to set up a studio depended on having a piece to broadcast as soon as possible.
_	Because of the time that had passed before a new order would have been placed, NSB was already looking for a more modern class, and placed an order for twelve Di 6 in 1992.
_	One of his first steps was to decline meals sent to the chancellors from the imperial kitchen, which had become customary during Yuan's and Wang's term as chancellor and which were enough for 10 people — an act that, however, drew parodies from other officials of the time that the meals were intended to reward the chancellors for their accomplishments, and that if he did not have accomplishments, he should decline the position, not the meal.
_	At the time that the Brass Monkey cocktail was produced, liquor stores carried mostly beer, wine, and hard alcohol; there were very few premixed alternatives.
_	However (third,) it was noted at the time that the members got along much better than the staff, and by season's end the less-mature adults had squandered any chance of there being a merged Knights corps in 1992.
_	This can be prevented by using an inert or reduced-pressure atmosphere, applying resistive heating for a short duration, by limiting the time that material is under high heat, as is done in a walking-beam furnace, or through restorative carburization, which uses a hydrocarbon atmosphere to transfer carbon into the surface of the material during annealing.
_	In 2009, around the time that Myspace underwent layoffs and a management shakeup, the site "relied on drastic redesigns as Hail Mary passes to get users back".
_	It was said at the time that Lemass nominated Joe Mooney to help regain a Fianna Fáil seat in Leitrim lost at a by-election in 1960 to Fine Gael candidate Joe McLoughlin.
_	The emphasis was on historical research, and it seemed obvious at the time that records should be arranged and catalogued in a manner that would "facilitate every kind of scholarly use".
_	Phil manages to keep Claire at the fair till the time that he would get on stage and sing for her, but his surprise is ruined when their pharmacist, Harold Grossman (Rick Cowling), gets on stage right before Phil is supposed to get and sings amazingly.
_	It was during the time that he began using his adopted name, and passed himself off as an ethnic Russian.
_	This album only covers the time that the band was on Light Records, so selections from "Awaiting Your Reply" and "Rainbow's End" are nowhere to be heard.
_	He spent some time in hospice care, but he was able to return to work as an editor almost up to the time that he died.
_	This site served as the primary location for news media coverage and the scene of public celebrations on 24 September 1993, when it was announced by the International Olympic Committee of the time that Sydney would be the host of the 2000 Summer Olympics.
_	The 1st Division entered the line on 23 July, assaulting Pozieres, and by the time that they were relieved by the 2nd Division on 27 July, they had suffered 5,286 casualties.
_	Between the time that the treaty was ratified and placed into action, Harkins worked with the Choctaw population to register them as citizens of the United States so that they could stay on their land.
_	At the time that Bain and Harison reconnoitred the route, Bain was supervising the construction of no fewer than six passes, so that 10 years would elapse before he could start work on the Groot River Pass.
_	The two college students had been dating for approximately two years at the time that Herrin graduated and moved to Texas to attend a graduate program.
_	Reports indicated that humans living in the affected area during the time that the disaster took place and their offspring have developed problems with reproductive functions, mortality, age structure, and gender deformities.
_	The facility's general manager said at the time that the Boyle Heights center was the most expensive that Sears operated, partly because the facilities were "outdated."
_	Boyd and Johnson met around the time that Johnson and Charlie Luciano were forming the Big Seven and they took an instant liking to each other; Johnson began grooming Boyd to become the next boss in his organization.
_	No date for the proposed referendum was ever set however the expectation was at the time that it would have been held sometime in the first six months of 2006 with the possibility that it could have been held on the same day as the 2006 UK local elections which were scheduled and duly held on 4 May 2006.
_	Martinez's guilty plea offer was signed by his two Army defense lawyers who were permitted by Army regulations to sign the plea offer only if they believed at the time that Martinez committed the crime.
_	Around the time that he was forced out of Peking University, he was jailed for three months for distributing literature that Peking authorities considered inflammatory, demanding that all pro-Japanese ministers resign, and that the government guarantee freedom of speech and assembly.
_	She began appearing in Jesús Franco's films from the time that they met in 1971.
_	It was believed at the time that all of the men perished.
_	The antiquary William Borlase noted during his 1752 visit that there was a battery of guns at the Old Blockhouse, guarding the harbour, but by the time that the writer John Troutbeck saw the site at the end of the century, the guns had been removed.
_	The Rochester Convention took the significant step of electing a woman to preside, an idea that seemed so radical at the time that Elizabeth Cady Stanton and Lucretia Mott, two organizers of the Seneca Falls convention, opposed it and left the platform when Abigail Bush took the chair.
_	The song "Our House" by Graham Nash refers to Nash's two-year affair with Mitchell at the time that Crosby, Stills, Nash and Young recorded the Déjà Vu album.
_	Born in Verona, Rossi was writing religious verse by the time that he was 13 years old.
_	Superboy thus intrigued meets Kindred Marx the proprietor of the rave called The Event Horizon who offered Superboy a handshake and after receiving a shock discovered that in the back of his right glove he now has a white rising sun symbol to which Hero Cruz replies that the mark is not on his glove but in his hand, and as long as he wishes to return to the party he can do so by touching the mark, and if he wishes to return home he only has to touch it again during the time that he is in the rave.
_	At the time, the MFB was also receiving criticism from the government of the time that it wasn't efficient enough, and that firefighters were not adequately utilised in emergency services.
_	I just felt like I wanted to do something for myself, instead of in a few years realizing that I can’t jump down stairs when I’m 45, and I kinda wanted to have my own thing started by the time that happens.
_	Maillet said that he had never seen the murder weapon at Gaston’s property in all the time that he had visited the farm.
_	There was speculation in the local press at the time that he would soon rejoin for Ipswich.
_	The FDA required the companies marketing the drug in the US, which at the time that iPLEDGE was launched were Roche, Mylan, Barr, and Ranbaxy, to put this website in place as a risk evaluation and mitigation strategy.
_	Alice Pleasance Liddell was age 10 at the time that Charles Lutwidge Dodgson (Lewis Carroll) first breathed life into Wonderland.
_	According to her view, the Anaconda is a later, conceptual imposition of order on events for which order did not exist at the time that they took place.
_	By the time that the Great Northern Warehouse was constructed, Alport was "one of the lowest of Manchester slums", according to "The Railway Magazine".
_	However, it was said at the time that the matters of civil service were being controlled by Su, Yuwen Shu, Pei Yun (裴蘊), and Pei Ju, and that they were largely corrupt.
_	From the time that her husband was confronted with prostate cancer, she developed an interest in this subject and did research amongst couples who had to deal with this disease.
_	As there is no evidence from the time that the nobility were becoming increasingly arrogant during the period, modern explanations of seventh century tyranny have tried to find other reasons for unrest among the people.
_	After having declared a "hold" on their pursuit of the Southport megaport proposal on July 21, 2010 in the face of public and political opposition, NCSPA Board Chairman Carl Stewart stated at the time that he and the Port Authority Board remain committed to continue pursuing the Southport megaport proposal at this site in the future.
_	Lindisfarne Castle was built in 1550, around the time that Lindisfarne Priory went out of use, and stones from the priory were used as building material.
_	During the time that the houses were under construction, the Dalls completed numerous prominent projects, including Adelbert Hall, St. Paul's Episcopal Church, and multiple mansions in the Millionaires' Row on Euclid Avenue.
_	Bentley had not previously mentioned this to the FBI or to any of the committees, grand juries or prosecutors before whom she had testified earlier, and there was no evidence at the time that Bentley had any role in this transfer.
_	At the same event, President-Pauline also presented research that, despite not having been questioned in the collective, was presented regardless; this, JJ record the time that rival coaches Corinthians been in office since 2003, wanting to point out that the guild that manages has the same problems as their peers.
_	This was according to laws at the time that allocated bodies of criminals to medical schools.
_	It was reported at the time that City were to pay an initial £600,000 fee for Hart, rising to £1.5 million if undisclosed clauses were achieved, but John Wardle, then City chairman, revealed in 2012 that the transfer fee was actually £100,000.
_	Little did any of those boys realize at the time that this chance remark would provide the incentive for the formation of what was to become one of the largest organizations in the state.
_	Initially distributed by PRT, then Pacific, Charly and finally Total/BMG, by the time that the label ended in the 1990s due to severe financial losses, 850 songs had been recorded by 108 artists.
_	Competition for the gift was well underway by the time that Bishop of Bathurst, George Long heard about the competition while in London.
_	As we are learning more and more about the brain, there is a hypothesis that when a child is going through puberty, that is the time that accents "start".
_	An extreme post-AGB star would be expected to show measurable secular changes in its temperature and period over the time that R Scuti has been closely observed.
_	At the time that was roughly 8.6% of the city's population.
_	One day, he intercepts a phone call from Patricia, who is heading to New York because she has remembered the identity of Dorothy's boyfriend at the time that she died.
_	By the time that the regions of the Llano Uplift was slowly covered by Cretaceous sedimentary deposits, it had been reduced by erosion to a low relief erosion surface termed the Wichita paleoplain.
_	It was customary at the time that a local chieftain, who had been defeated by the Sultan, would send one of his children to the Sultan's court, where the child would be a hostage for an unspecified time; this way, the Sultan was able to exercise control in the area ruled by the hostage's father.
_	There were suggestions at the time that the incident was caused by Mr. Wilson, as the two dogs were in the ring awaiting his return from showing his Airedale Terrier in another part of the show ground.
_	Others were putting several other routes forward; chief among these was a route following the east coast; it was taken for granted at the time that only one trunk line between central Scotland and England was sustainable, so all the proposals were presumed to be mutually exclusive.
_	Hanahoe was captain that day and it was feared at the time that all the players would be sacked along with the management team.
_	It was the only parish at the time that was not located along the Mississippi River.
_	From the time that Queen Catharine was defended so stoutly and learnedly by the Bishop of Rochester [ Anne Boleyn ] did seek by all means his destruction.
_	It was noted at the time that the engine and wagons could complete seven round trips from the quarries in one day, proving far cheaper than a contractor with a horse and dray.
_	Around the time that the show enters its 'Top Ten' competitor phase, there are typically several format changes that take place.
_	As a critic, she does not take an analytical point of view and it is believed to be due to the influences of impressionism at the time that she was able to do so.
_	Furthermore, some writers maintain that Hume's writings on religion were not very influential at the time that they were published.
_	By the time that "Sinop" and "Georgii Pobedonosets" were finished the gun mount had been reduced in size enough that the sponsons could be eliminated.
_	The Imperial House schemes to gain full control of the Empire through the control of melange, precisely at the time that the Bene Gesserit breeding program is nearing fruition.
_	The aircraft obtained its nickname due to the time that it spent working for the United States National Guard in Memphis, where singer Elvis Presley lived for most of his life.
_	Taylor’s theories on the Etruscans, though now obsolete, caused great interest at the time that they were presented.
_	FRC used one of Museveni's speeches in an e-mail to its supporters praising Uganda’s commitment to Christian faith and "national repentance" around the time that he reintroduced the Anti-Homosexuality Bill.
_	Under this affiliation, some programs from the network that were not commercially sponsored or which were scheduled to cross the time that WLS and WENR shifted its use of the same frequency (such as baseball or football games) were transferred to air on a third Blue Network/ABC affiliate in Chicago, WCFL.
_	They and the players each contributed the sum of £50 to finance the expedition and later shared equally in the handsome profits that their enterprise generated, having carted the match takings around with them in a closely guarded strong-box all the time that they were away.
_	It also suffered from comparisons to not only the '80s film, but also another series called, "Parker Lewis Can't Lose"; at the time that series initially proved to be more successful when it came to ratings, lasting for three seasons.
_	The Israeli government claimed at the time that Hamas, the Islamic militant group that rules Gaza, would exploit the visit.
_	They also assert that there is an overhead to be balanced between the time spent planning and the time that fixing a defect would actually cost.
_	The water flowing out of each of the hour stones represents the time that has already elapsed.
_	In 1688 major restoration work included re-gilding of most of the cross, and it was said at the time that on a sunny day people could hardly bear to look directly at it.
_	Chennault stated at the time that Deng had complained to her that none of the American "China Hands" were "huaren" (overseas Chinese), asking "Why do all the so-called China experts have blue eyes and blond hair?"
_	During the time that Dick Sprang began illustrating Batman, he taught his wife — Lora A. Sprang — to letter, and she subsequently lettered most (and colored some) of his subsequent work under the pen name "Pat Gordon".
_	Liu Zhiyuan gave Wang the secret instructions that if Zhao and Hou had, by the time that he arrived at the circuits, already left for Kaifeng to pay homage to the emperor, then he were not to act against them, but if they had not and were watching for developments, he should act against them.
_	Next morning, the last wicket pair added 25 more runs which were to prove vital, as well as reducing the time that Australia had at their disposal.
_	However, it was popular opinion at the time that Brimsek deserved the spot on the First All-Star Team over Johnny Mowers, including Mowers' own coach and general manager, Jack Adams.
_	Preston stated at the time that his objective had been "...to give this band the decent burial that they didn't get in 2008".
_	According to a February 2012 update, the MTA had expected to have 8 conversion sets in service by the time that the 7 Subway Extension is opened for revenue service.
_	At the time that the colonists first substantively encountered the tribes, Daniel Gookin that they had a combined population of 12,000, with 3,000 living in the capital.
_	This saved the time that otherwise would have been needed to return the print head to its starting point.
_	Gandhi had been imprisoned in 1922 and was released around the time that Ranganathan was taking that job.
_	At the time that Sir Thomas Herbert visited the palace in 1628 there were about 2,000 families living in the town that at that time contained at least 300 public bath houses.
_	About the time that Johnson appeared on "Annie Oakley", he guest-starred in other series of the 1950s, mostly westerns: "The Cisco Kid", "The Range Rider", "Cowboy G-Men", "Stories of the Century", "Circus Boy", "Rescue 8", "State Trooper", and "The Adventures of Rin Tin Tin", in which he appeared as John Quinn in the episode "The Iron Horse" (1955).
_	He left for Canada on domestic and personal grounds around the time that Joseph Edamaruku, a staunch rationalist activist and writer of atheist literature, was made one of the Vice-Presidents of IRA.
_	This was about the time that the island was becoming a site of British military ordinance.
_	He returned to London with Eve in the summer of 1948, around the time that Marshal Tito of Yugoslavia broke ties with Stalin's Cominform.
_	Jara, the Foundation’s founder and Jara’s widow, said at the time that
_	Garrels announced at the time that he intended to make a specialty of the discus throw.
_	It was also the time that they revealed that Judy Ann Santos will act as the leading lady or the "Me" in the title.
_	(A rotation of liberal co-hosts faced off with Buchanan between the time that Myers left the show and Miller was officially hired as her replacement some months later.)
_	The time spent is comparable to the time that students in "brick-and-mortar" schools are also expected to attend.
_	At the time that the vernal equinox entered into Pisces, the system was located in the first ecliptic constellation of the Neo-Babylonians, "Kullat Nūnu" − 'Nūnu' being the Babylonian word for fish and 'Kullat' referring to either the bucket or the cord that holds the fish together.
_	Its reaction time, i.e. the time that elapses before the foot of the glacier advances or retreats due to major changes in conditions in the accumulation zone, is about 6 years in the case of the Glacier Blanc.
_	It was suspected at the time that Ms Vázquez-Rijos was involved in her estranged husband's murder; the motive was that she stood to gain more financially from the death of her husband, to whom she had only been married for six months, than from the divorce.
_	Left-wing opposition was outlawed as the Legislative Assembly made effective the article 98 of Costa Rica’s Constitution at the time that forbid Communist parties, making illegal the only party at the left of PLN, the Popular Democratic Action (PADA) led by Manuel Mora.
_	However, by the time that the next major electrification project, the West Coast Main Line (WCML), was underway, the decision had been taken to adopt 25 kV ac overhead as the standard supply system.
_	He had spent his father's inheritance by the time that he left the Belfast Royal Academy.
_	Blue Jays' outfielder Adam Lind revealed at the time that he had an intimate relationship with Murphy, "He keeps me loose", Lind said.
_	The translation is notable not only for its clarity of language, but for the extensive footnotes, which detail the classical references to mining and metals, such as the "Naturalis Historia" of Pliny the Elder, the history of mining law in England, France, and the German states; safety in mines, including historical safety; and known minerals at the time that Agricola wrote "De Re Metallica."
_	In this account the epidemic, and not long habitation, explained the number of graves found by Hill; the medals had not been buried with their original owners, but had been treasured by the band for decades, until the time that the pestilence was blamed on "evil gifts from the whites" and they were cast away.
_	In 1977, during the time that American fast food restaurants moved into New Zealand, Progressive Enterprises created Georgie Pie, a fast food restaurant with a menu based on meat pies.
_	It was thought at the time that the legendary Anglo-Saxon leader Hengist could be buried here, as he was said to have been laid to rest in an unlocated mound.
_	Del Yocam explained at the time that the new name was meant to evoke "integrating the enterprise".
_	Although the restorers said at the time that the monument would withstand a hundred years without another major restoration, it was discovered a few years later that the gilding of the stars was damaged, due to the restoration technique used.
_	During the time that they must fallback on the resources, they would feed on young leaves that are from a flowering plant known as "Spatholobus macropterus".
_	Hunter drank with the soccer team around the time that their friend Ally Vandermeed tried to kill herself.
_	It was assumed at the time that Britain and America would have an equal role to play in any postwar international organization that would be based on the principles of the Atlantic Charter.
_	He eventually accepted this linkage, even though he remained convinced at the time that "zombies" corresponded to the undead slaves of Haitian voodoo as depicted in Bela Lugosi's "White Zombie".
_	It is worth noting that no kingdom called "Armenia" existed during the time that Assyria did, but Urartu (which was also known as "Van") did.
_	With an annual budget at Ryde of £5m and £7m at Sandown Bay Academy this means that more than half a million pounds per year (or £2.5m over the time that AET has managed the Isle of Wight schools) is being removed from Isle of Wight by AET as its "management fee."
_	At the time that "Jingyuen" was ordered in October 1885, there was a debate in naval circles over the differences between armored cruisers and protected cruisers.
_	Web extras often include interviews or panel discussions, and may often be billed as "pre-shows" or "post-shows" depending upon the time that the segment was broadcast; for this purpose, if a discussion between two or more persons on the set is likely to run through the end of the broadcast, the host or presenter may often pause the discussion to wrap up the regular broadcast and then resume the on-camera discussion after the broadcast ends.
_	Although she was referred to as the 500th Playboy Playmate, it was not realized at the time that two of the earliest Playmates (Marilyn Waltz and Margaret Scott) were the same person, making Rickter No. 499.
_	By the time that the fire had been brought under control, the stage area, dressing rooms and the entire rear section of the building had been destroyed.
_	By the time that Reyes was appointed parish priest here in 2009, only the tandem of the medium-sized Dolorosa bell (kampanang menor) and the huge Santa Rita bell (kampanang mayul) gave the town a sense of time and ceremony.
_	He claimed at the time that the format echoed the tall window of his campus studio, and was confirmed for him by Chinese scroll paintings he saw in the university's gallery.
_	The British press was unanimous in its conviction at the time that these 29 May killings were organized and not spontaneous.
_	One can see from the time that Judith moves into the neighborhood that the feeling of the city is changing fast.
_	Almond intimated at the time that this could possibly be his last fully self-penned album.
_	This was close to the time that they pitted the winning car of Jimmy Clark at the 1965 Indianapolis 500.
_	At the time that they were getting ready to take her for further investigation, Tad comes in and tells them that is his fiancée and to let go of her.
_	Another MP, banker Robert Bickerdike, took him to task, and put such pressure on him through negative articles in the media of the time that Pringle backed down.
_	He campaigned with Nosratollah Amini for Mossadegh's election at the time that the future prime minister had settled at Ferdows Garden.
_	Further, he states that it is not enough to consider only the time that has passed between 2 and 3 to make statements about attrition.
_	He stated at the time that a goal of returning to politics was to push out State Senator John D. Calandra from his post as the Bronx Republican leader.
_	The other four operations had been cancelled by the time that Giralda was put into place.
_	Chief executive Jens Torpe said at the time that he expected the website audience to grow to be bigger than the printed version.
_	Jeff Jones, chair of the WJEC when it bid for and developed the WBQ, stated in 2011 that he thought at the time that the WBQ "looked like nonsense" but that the WJEC "needed the money and in any case we had to bid because we were the Welsh exam board".
_	In an interview about the making of the album, Joel talks about the fact that at the time that he was recording "An Innocent Man", he was newly divorced from his first wife, Elizabeth Weber, and was single for the first time since achieving rock star status.
_	The term drunken was used because it was believed at the time that Garcia's claim is merely market hype and that no one would be crazy enough to buy an Equitable PCI share for the price Garcia was asking for, which is 95 pesos, payable in cash.
_	During the time that the amoeba is infected, it begins to increase significantly in size.
_	The team also wore sweatshirts printed with the number 20.67, the time that the official score board malfunctioned to in the 50 freestyle on B.J.'s last individual race on the night of his death.
_	This provision, however, was not immediately brought into force when enacted, as the Government stated at the time that a grace period of at least four years was needed for modifications and refinements to the Elected President scheme to resolve unforeseen problems that arose upon implementation.
_	The band has suggested that it might have fared better had it not been for a strike of lighting technicians on the powerful UK TV programme "Top of The Pops" at the time that the record was released and rising in the charts.
_	The testimony was that Williams had claimed at the time that he had done it just to see if he could free himself and that he promised not to try this again.
_	It was rumored at the time that one reason for the stunt was that disgruntled WGCL employees who would be losing their jobs once Metropolis took over had stolen virtually all of the G-98 music library, forcing station staff to go out and purchase compact discs to play for when the new format launched (and in addition, the arrival of the compact-disc players the station had ordered was delayed for two days).
_	This factory was one of several in Acton and Concord, Massachusetts at the time that brought important developments to pencil manufacturing.
_	Stand-alone dryers make use of hot air or other heating elements to dry the clothes in a fraction of the time that it took the condensation-based drying system in combination units.
_	In 1986, during the time that a survey was conducted of the property, it was reported that a number of furnishings had been stolen from the hall.
_	In the time that lapsed between firing the first and the second torpedo, an enemy torpedo passed down "Trout"’s port side.
_	There was opposition to Aurangzeb's actions because both pregnant women gave birth to sons during the time that he was enacting his decision.
_	Reports also suggested that between the time that SEBI first initiated the inquiry four years ago and Roy’s eventual detention and it is to note that till today there is not a single charge against him, there has not been a single instance of an investor in either of the two Sahara firms under watch actually filing a police complaint or going to court..
_	It existed during the time that the agrarian leader Aleksandar Stamboliyski served as Prime Minister (1919-1923), both serving as his bodyguards and enacting the government's radical land reform policies.
_	Hole may have been shuttered in 2008; media noted at the time that several convoys of trucks appeared to have moved large amounts of equipment out of the site over the course of several weeks and a company guard force had been withdrawn.
_	In 1995, around the time that Morissette penned a deal with Maverick Records, the duo took the demos to a studio and began working on full band arrangements for some tracks.
_	By the time that Guzman was matched with Juan Sandoval on October 15, 1974 at Monte Cristi, he had already fought all over the Dominican Republic and abroad, making his Santo Domingo debut against Garcia (a first-round knockout win on July 6, 1974), and his international one against Sergio Rodriguez in Port-au-Prince, Haiti on March 18, also a first-round knockout win.
_	The discovery of Jurassic troodonts is positive physical evidence that derived deinonychosaurs were present before the time that avians arose.
_	Vigderhaus dreamt of becoming an architect from the time that he was a schoolboy; shortly upon demobilization, he was walking through Stalino destroyed during the war, and saw an officer, who was drawing sketches of ruins.
_	According to an old local legen, the name "San Miguel Chicaj" came from the time that Saint Michael Archangel descended from Heaven and landed on the region.
_	This theme is consistent in his writings from the time that the State of Israel was established.
_	At the time that these tidal flats were covered by the initial eruption of the Cardenas Basalt, the eastern grand Canyon region was at or very near sea level.
_	Although unconfirmed, there was widespread speculation at the time that the song was inspired by Noel's friend Kate Moss.
_	This application was significant during the time that coal gas was widely used for heating and lighting, during the nineteenth and early twentieth centuries.
_	Further, the campaigning was so extreme by the standards of the time that a Commons committee was set up to investigate, and Mohun was summoned to appear at the Bar of the House.
_	This was during the time that most companies did not have an Internet presence, and Dziabiak began designing websites for local businesses.
_	Cunningham commented at the time that Nuttall was "...just about the poorest man I ever dated.
_	Another model made by Signia for San Lorenzo was a silver kit, a rare jersey at the time that San Lorenzo wore in the 2000 Copa Mercosur.
_	The use of drugs was a key influence on many of the social events of the time that were personal to the Beat generation.
_	According to Nickell, meteor sightings also occurred at the time that could explain Billy Ray Taylor's claim that he saw "a bright light streak across the sky and disappear beyond a tree line some distance from the house".
_	Multiple writers argued at the time that the trades made the Cavaliers significantly better.
_	Originally "Overachievers" was planned as the album's lead single (then titled "The Over-Achievers"), with the band's producer Jeff Rogers even noting at the time that the band had contacted three different directors for music video concepts to complement that track's release.
_	At the time that design stresses were set for the MSRE, the data that was available indicated that the strength and creep rate of Hastelloy-N were hardly affected by irradiation.
_	Bessels stated that "My idea of the cause of the first attack is that he had been exposed to very low temperature during the time that he was on the sledge journey.
_	A farthing of King Edward VIII (1936) does exist, dated 1937, but technically it is a pattern coin, i.e. one produced for official approval, which it would probably have been due to receive about the time that the King abdicated.
_	During the time that Rathje was starting his projects many misconceptions began and the nation became more conscious of what they were throwing away.
_	At the time that it occurred, the earthquake was popularly interpreted as an omen of misfortune, or a demonstration of godly wrath.
_	The Astros had 11 games remaining in the season at the time that Altuve broke the record.
_	By the time that the plans were put before the Monitor Board in New York City, Ericsson and Simers had a poor relationship, and Chief of the Bureau of Construction and Repair John Lenthall had little connection to the board.
_	Alarm clocks with visible indicators are sometimes used to indicate to children too young to read the time that the time for sleep has finished; they are sometimes called "training clocks".
_	By his own admission, Mora was so impoverished at the time that he had been forced to use house paint impregnated with insecticide for his paintings, a necessity he turned to his advantage by telling potential buyers that his paintings were "not only art, but they also kill flies".
_	Around the time that the British 1735 Witchcraft Act was repealed in 1951, and it became legal to practice witchcraft in the United Kingdom, Cochrane, who was in his early twenties, founded a coven, and named it the "Clan of Tubal Cain" after the biblical figure Tubal-cain (the first blacksmith), as a reference to his work in that profession.
_	Many members of the staff recalls many highlights of the early movie operations such as the time that Pedro Gonzalez appeared while filming the John Wayne classic, The Alamo.
_	The magazine even mentions at the time that Hopper held a screening of the film at the Playboy Mansion for Hugh Hefner and several Playmates.
_	The University of Texas was one of few schools at the time that encouraged their athletes to participate in more than one sport.
_	In order to comply with an FCC rule in effect at the time that prohibited separately owned radio and television stations in the same market from sharing the same base call letters, as Stauffer was allowed to keep the KGNC call letters for its new radio properties, the station's call letters were changed to KAMR-TV (in reference to its city of license, AMaRillo) on November 5th of that year.
_	Because many in the press saw the suggestion of a "Negro wing" as separate-but-equal and denounced major league baseball for the idea, by the time that Paige's induction came around on August 9, Kuhn convinced the owners and the private trust of the Hall of Fame that there should be no separate wing after all.
_	This was also the time that the Swedish government under diplomatic pressure from Britain, gradually was leaning on the Indian propaganda bureau, while relationship of the Berlin committee with the German foreign office was also strained on apprehensions of German imperial designs and over allocation of funds.
_	Lee was a member of the Fondation Chirac's honour committee, from the time that the foundation was launched in 2008 by the former French President Jacques Chirac to promote world peace.
_	Satan targets our girls from a materialistic way, telling them how to act and how to look, what to eat and not to eat", also commenting that "I try to tell my kids all the time that they are perfect and I know my daughters need to get their confidence in themselves from me.
_	Quadris worked at San Marco from at least 1436, the date given on his Magnificat, to the time that a Vatican document listed him as "deceased", in 1457.
_	At the time that the Railway Act had been passed, the 5000 citizens of Rockhampton objected to having no provision made for the construction of a railway to their hinterland, where copper was being exploited in the Peak Downs area.
_	In a brief November 1996 review of the application, Steve Daly of "Entertainment Weekly" gave the application a grade of C, saying at the time that the overworld map was slow to redraw and it was too easy to click on the wrong option when using the Mickey Mouse head-shaped compass.
_	Although Walker believed at the time that 41-D would be his only flight, he also accompanied the CFES equipment on STS-51-D, and STS-61-B, accumulating 20 days of experience in space and traveling 8.2 million miles.
_	Van Leeuwenhoek took issue with the ideas common at the time that fleas and lice could spontaneously result from putrefaction, and that frogs could likewise arise from slime.
_	They evolved about the time that flowering plants underwent an expansive adaptive radiation in the mid-Cretaceous, and the Gelechioidea that evolved at this time also have great diversity.
_	However, by the time that Sita and Seymour are on land again, it becomes clear that he is beyond even her help.
_	The club was so popular at the time that they often had to abandon their home ground in favour of the stadium in nearby Ludwigshafen in order to accommodate crowds of up to 65,000 spectators.
_	During the time that both Bahá'u'lláh and Subh-i-Azal were in Baghdad, since Subh-i-Azal remained in hiding, Bahá'u'lláh performed much of the daily administration of the Bábí affairs.
_	James Cook named Norfolk Island in honour of the Duchess of Norfolk in 1774, although he did not know at the time that she was already dead.
_	It seems to have been commonly believed at the time that Christians practiced "onolatry" (donkey-worship).
_	There were thus no formal rules for football during the time that William Webb Ellis was at the school (1816–25) and the story of the boy "who with a fine disregard for the rules of football as played in his time, first took the ball in his arms and ran with it" in 1823 is apocryphal.
_	From the time that products - mainly strawberries for the neighbouring town Beverwijk, where the fruits were sold - were brought to the market with donkeys, people from Heemskerk got the name of Donkey as a nickname and symbol.
_	At the time that he set the record, there were only three years of eligibility, and there were not any 3-point shots.
_	By the time that the cease fire was signed, it had reached Grenoble almost unopposed.
_	According to the Canadian Broadcasting Corporation, JTF2 was also in Haiti at the time that Haitian president Jean-Bertrand Aristide was ousted from power in 2004.
_	It is named after the Brazilian botanist Miguel Arrojado Lisboa (1872–1932) who was superintendent of the Brazilian Railways at the time that Britton and Rose described the genus in 1920.
_	Only a few burgage holders were entitled to vote but as most, if not all, of these holdings were held by a single individual for most of the time that Bere Alston was a parliamentary borough elections were seldom contested (see rotten borough).
_	Kramer told the press at the time that whenever a script came in with a role too difficult for most actors in Hollywood, he called Chaney.
_	During the time that Danny Kanell was with the show, from 2015-2017, it was known as "Russillo and Kanell".
_	She enjoyed the time that she spent in China and often rode bicycles with her husband to explore cities and regions that few Americans had visited.
_	"The Observer" reported at the time that Dimmock's backers were "a powerful network of business interests with close links to the fuel and mining lobbies."
_	At the time that he started to work on Mexican floristics very few studies were published in that field, so he became a pioneer in it.
_	The boom stopped in 1920 when unemployment began to increase, by the time that the Liberal-Conservative coalition lost power at the 1922 general election, the unemployment rate had reached 2,500,000.
_	Commentators have had mixed opinions on what the segment is mocking, whether it is the increasing Islamic influence in the US, specifically in Dearborn, or rather those who are thinking that Dearborn is under sharia law in December 2011, the time that the episode aired.
_	Hindko speakers, also referred to as "Khaarian" ("city dwellers" in Pashto), were responsible for the dominant culture for most of the time that Peshawar was under British rule.
_	Eßweiler owes its current shape mainly to the time that followed the Thirty Years' War.
_	At the time that he is encountered by Roland, he is several thousand years old, malfunctioning, slowly dying, and infested with parasites (a reference to Richard Adams's novel "Shardik").
_	Four 0-6-0 locomotives were on order from Brighton works at the time that William Stroudley took over from John Chester Craven as Locomotive Superintendent in 1870.
_	Usually, for a dragon to teleport using its rider's directions, they stay in "between" for the time that it takes to cough three times.
_	Series producer Emma Turner said at the time that "(Abra) made a huge impact in the few episodes that he was involved in" and expressed her delight that Edmondson had agreed to reprise the role.
_	In the Middle Ages, the Emperor of Japan would chant before an image of the fox Dakini-ten during his Enthronement, and both the "shōgun" and the emperor would venerate Dakini-ten whenever they saw it, as it was a common belief at the time that ceasing to pay respects to Dakini-ten would cause the immediate ruin of the regime.
_	McKeon and Girard struggled to release their bonds afterwards, but by the time that they managed to contact the police officers Jack Casey, Jack Bannan and George Mucha were outside the compound waiting for the security measures to be dropped.
_	It appears that the current day is the time that the young birds should be able to fly.
_	It was prepared by John Lampton, Lumley's steward, and is dated 22 May 1590, at the time that Lumley was beginning to negotiate the sale of Nonsuch to Queen Elizabeth.
_	Townshend said at the time that Sue was "very close to the end, and [Rabbit] will be back with us when she's gone".
_	It was recorded by the military media at the time that the drop was recorded between and took approximately 50 seconds for all equipment and men to be on the ground.
_	Much of the work was already mature in Goldsmith's mind by the time that he published the first issues of "The Ecologist" in 1970.
_	SHH PLC said at the time: “We made clear at the time that this was always an issue of safety and therefore the pilot being able to demonstrate that there was acceptable insurance in place."
_	Northwestern's athletic director, Dana Evans, said at the time that he accepted the resignation with reluctance and called Trafton "one of the best line coaches in the conference and a large factor in developing the 1922 Purple eleven."
_	Utilising the carrier was suggested again by RAN officials in March 1966, when the United States Seventh Fleet was having difficulties maintaining anti-submarine patrols around Yankee Station, but "Melbourne" could only remain on station for a single, ten-day period, a third of the time that US carriers were operational for on rotating deployments.
_	Although never entirely happy with this role, it was generally thought at the time that he acquitted himself well.
_	He spent most of the time that year in tag team matches with the other Horsemen as partners.
_	This selection represents the time that Rusenko, Veltri and Fanini began working on Weebly full-time.
_	At the time that the EUS went bankrupt the Bristo Place church building was occupied by the Forest Cafe.
_	Around the time that the "Heliand" was written, there was a revolt of the Saxon "stelinga," or lower social castes.
_	Further, the outside lag between the time of implementation and the time that most of the effects of the stimulus are felt could mean that the stimulus hits an already-recovering economy and exacerbates the ensuing boom rather than stimulating the economy when it needs it.
_	Her unpublished memoir, "The Child", written in India during 1941-42, recounts the family's history during the seventeen years from Harwood's birth up to the time that she left for school in England in 1929.
_	By the time that he graduated, Mills had already been published in the two leading sociology journals in the US: the "American Sociological Review" and the "American Journal of Sociology".
_	He said at the time that he was pained "by the injustice" that transgender people could legally marry in California while gay and lesbian couples could not.
_	During the time that the court was located in Brazil, the Portuguese royal family collectively granted more titles of nobility than it had in its past 300 years of existence in Portugal.
_	In Canberra, a group of Country Party Senators kept Gair occupied in their office, away from the President of the Senate (to whom he needed to give his resignation), drinking beer and eating prawns, until 6pm (the Commonwealth Electoral Act provided that writs would be deemed to have been issued at 6pm irrespective of the time that they were actually issued).
_	By the time that the Philadelphia Exposition opened to the public in 1876, Léon L. Gallet had already established sales offices in both New York City and Chicago, going back over ten years.
_	The song was written by Pete Townshend during the time that "My Generation" was being recorded in 1965.
_	Kushner said at the time that his quotes were "grossly mischaracterized."
_	Video game magazine "Edge" said that "Turok" contradicted the prevailing notion at the time that only Nintendo could create superior games for the console.
_	A collision with a U.S. destroyer escort off the north coast of Panama while submerged caused major damage to the periscope shears and radar, requiring a return to Portsmouth just at the time that Germany surrendered.
_	Despite a witness testimony for the defense who stated that he saw the victim in a Manhattan bagel shop during the time that Bierenbaum took his airplane flight, Bierenbaum was convicted and sentenced to twenty years to life in prison in New York.
_	A distinguished writer said at the time that he liked it, but it was "naively pedantic."
_	It was believed at the time that these ransoms would merit an entry into the Guinness Book of World Records.
_	It is also paradoxical, in the classic way of the novel, that Orr has to crash his plane repeatedly - practising for the time that he will crash his plane.
_	Hitting the ball at the net cuts down on the time that the ball takes to reach other side, making it harder for the pushers to run down the ball.
_	Around the time that Reynolds graduated from high school in 1952, he performed a solo recital in Detroit that consisted of the Johannes Brahms "Sonata in F minor", some "Intermezzi", the Franz Liszt 6th "Rhapsody", as well as works by Claude Debussy, and Chopin.
_	During the time that Greystone was built, the predominant philosophy in psychology was that the mentally ill could be cured or treated, but only if they were in an environment designed to deal with them.
_	This is the time that Sven met Johan Gielen.
_	At the time of its release, "Crysis" was one of the most computationally expensive games on then-current computer hardware, around the time that PCI Express started to become a standard for video cards.
_	It was exlpained at the time that Bellavia's other employer objected to him being on WBEN, so Savage was replacement programming for that slot.
_	The construction of this building reflected the increasingly common opinion of the time that a complete education included physical education.
_	This is because there was animosity between both men at the time that actually led them to splitting up the team for a short while in 1945.
_	At the time that a British protectorate was established in 1891, there were seven Makololo chiefs of which six were recognised by the government.
_	Awarded since 1981, winners were chosen by the Iowa Newspaper Association at the time that annual all-state selections are made until 2017.
_	A story arose at the time that he insisted on his division being assigned to hold the post of honor on the right flank, but historian Thomas J. McGuire disproved this myth.
_	Jacobo is aware that his brother has become more successful since moving away and possibly resents the time that he had to devote to nursing their dying mother, rather than working on his own business.
_	"Back to Reality" was the first script written and it was thought of at the time that this would be the final series as there looked like there would be a cast availability problem.
_	By the time that Charlemagne established his kingdom in the late 8th century, power in France was polarised between south and north: unlike the Mediterranean south, where grapes were easy to cultivate and wine was plentiful, the more viticulturally challenged regions of the north saw wine as a luxury item and a symbol of status.
_	It was indicative of the National Catholicism of the time that one of the biggest scholarly projects was the (1944).
_	TTC officials admitted at the time that the new TR trains cannot move until all doors are fully closed (as with the older trains) and if the doors fail to close thrice consecutively fully, the TR train would require a system reboot, meaning that the train would have to be pulled out of service until it was resolved.
_	As a counter-intelligence officer seeking informants against French and Soviet Communists and former Nazis, he recruited former Gestapo officer Klaus Barbie, the "Butcher of Lyon", later saying that he had not been aware of Barbie's activities during the war at the time that he recruited him.
_	In April 1845, during the time that the colonial forces were gathering in the Bay of Islands, the warriors of Heke and Nene fought many skirmishes on the small hill named Taumata-Karamu that was between the two pās, and on open country between Okaihau and Te Ahuahu.
_	It seemed for the time that the Thuringian opposition to the Philippism of Electoral Saxony was broken; but with the downfall of John Frederick and the accession of his brother John William to power, the tables were turned; the Philippists at Jena were again.
_	The EUMC did not adopt the definition, and in November 2013 its successor agency, the Fundamental Rights Agency (FRA), removed it from its website in "a clear-out of non-official documents"; a spokesperson stated at the time that "We are not aware of any official definition [of anti-Semitism]".
_	About the time that he began his hockey career in 1894, MacDougall began a financial career at the Bank of Montreal.
_	There was much controversy among Cosima fans at the time that mainstream radio refused to play the song.
_	Both Ve and the Cyrillic letter Be (Б б) were derived from the Greek letter Beta (Β β), which already represented in Greek by the time that the Cyrillic alphabet was created.
_	By the time that the "Beagle" set out for the Galápagos Islands on 7 September 1835, Darwin had thought out the essentials of his theory of atoll formation.
_	At the time that Romania signed the alliance with France, the Rhineland region of Germany was demilitarized.
_	About the time that the album reached number one in the United States (and Springsteen's "The River" Tour concluded), Bittan joined as a sideman on a short tour with Nicks along with some of the other top musicians of the day: Benmont Tench on organ, bass guitarist Bob Glaub, Waddy Wachtel on guitar, Russ Kunkel on drums, and Bobbeye Hall on percussion.
_	It was thought at the time that they wanted to try to keep their second position in the team classification, but their directeur sportif said the next day that they simply wanted to try to win the stage.
_	The Buckethead Edition was a reprint under a new cover of an earlier edition, and Dulabone was not aware at the time that it was censored.
_	Furthermore, the time that drugs are approved for use averages seven years out of the twenty years on-patent, meaning a tendency for the market to focus on diseases of developed nations where high prices can be used to recoup research and development costs, and subsidize failed R&D efforts.
_	By the time that design work began on the "Leipzig" class in 1871, Prussia had won the Franco-Prussian War of 1870–1871, forming the German Empire in the process.
_	She said later that they did not know at the time that the murderer was Dan White, and had feared that a gunman was simply targeting gays.
_	He takes "when you lie down" (ובשכבך) to mean the Shema is recited at the time that people lie down to "go" to sleep, and anyone who will be going to sleep for the night has done so by the end of the first watch.
_	From the time that the processor's instruction decoder has figured out that it has encountered a conditional branch instruction to the time that the deciding register value can be read out, the pipeline needs to be stalled for several cycles, or if it's not and the branch is taken, the pipeline needs to be flushed.
_	He thought at the time that the field would offer easy conditions.
_	At the time that the Polaris project went live, submarine navigation systems were and at this time that standard was sufficient enough to sustain effective military efforts given the existing weapons systems in use by the Army, Air Force and Navy.
_	During the time that Steger played for Thistlethwaite, the Oak Park football team went through four consecutive seasons without a loss.
_	Evening in Torpor was a student-project that Natalie Merchant and Rob Buck from the band 10,000 Maniacs were involved with around the time that 10,000 Maniacs was beginning.
_	I have been saying all the time that what I wanted was text rather than subtext – but in end, I think the subtext did actually pay off."
_	All of Frank Walker's investigations, using letters and performance histories of the different people involved in her life, put Strepponi together with only one man at the time that the three children must have been conceived.
_	It was reported at the time that this was the first aerial flight in Australia, and a century later, some major news outlets still credit him with this feat.
_	He forces Susan to undress so he can sexually fondle her, while Susan's mother's body is found in the woodshed by Gerry Henderson, one of the "paying guests", who calls the police just at the time that Shashee learns the truth about Martin and also calls the police from the hospital and races to the house to rescue Susan.
_	Adaś, a little boy, falls ill around the time that martial law is declared.
_	The plant's medical director stated to the press at the time that the employee who died as a result, Oliver Blaber, had succumbed to "complications caused by third-degree burns".
_	During the time that the National Party was in office (1949–1958), 36 people were convicted of murder, and 22 of those were sentenced to death.
_	Duguay began spelling her name Dugay around the age of 12, about the time that she landed the role of a young Maria Montez in "Ali Baba and the Forty Thieves" (1944).
_	The parody was mimicking the popular advertising campaigns that Campari, an Italian liqueur, was running at the time that featured brief contrived interviews with various celebrities that always started with a question about their "first time", a double-entendre intended to give the impression that the celebrities were talking about their first sexual encounters before the reveal at the end that the discussion had actually concerned the celebrities' first time tasting Campari.
_	Najran was an oasis, with a large population of Christian Arabs, and a significant community of Jews, unlike most Ṣayhadic people of that zone, had only come under the authority of the Himyarite kingdom in the early fifth century, more or less around the time that a local merchant, one Hayyān by name, had visited Constantinople and underwent conversion at al-Hīra, near Mecca, during a later journey.
_	At the time that Zhang Zhongwu took over Lulong Circuit, Lulong, along with other circuits on Tang's northern border, facing the threat of Huigu raiders, who had headed south in the aftermaths of the Huigu Khanate's collapse due to Xiajiasi attacks.
_	Atomic's president, Keith Zabalaoui, explained at the time that he hoped to capture the experience of real-world military commanders, who "cannot tell what [their] men are going to do in any given situation until it happens".
_	Rumours abounded at the time that the pilots might be detained in the ROC and charged with negligence.
_	Newport's population had fallen from over 9,000 (according to the census of 1774) to fewer than 4,000 by the time that the war ended (1783).
_	It had been agreed by military commanders at the time that if supplies became any lower, they would surrender the islands (the actual date, deferred as supplies were received, was referred to as the target date).
_	It was decided at the time that it was not appropriate, although the writers had hoped that there would be a time when the viewers would accept such a relationship.
_	Perigo told the press at the time that he planned to obtain a master's degree and pursue a career in teaching or athletic administration.
_	According to historical records, at the time that their daughter Sarah died 10 years later when she was 25, she owned the following: piano, furniture, silverware, jewelry and other items valued at $595, in addition to a dower fund.
_	However, not enough staff were provided to complete that in time, and by the time that the rolls closed, 35,000 forms remained unprocessed.
_	David Engelsma, Professor Emeritus of the Protestant Reformed Seminary writes that "Even though home-schooling of their children might be possible for a few, specially gifted parents whose circumstances provide the time that is needed, home-schooling is still not an option".
_	But, "The Economist" noted at the time that Hirsi Ali's "Wholesale condemnations of existing religions just aren't done in American politics."
_	Hip hop's early evolution into a form distinct from R&B also, not coincidentally, occurred around the time that sampling technology and drum-machines became widely available to the general public at a cost that was affordable to the average consumer—not just professional studios.
_	By the time that the Admiralty received the report, they had already decided to order Warren's successor, Vice-Admiral Sir Alexander Cochrane, to encourage emigration of African-American slaves.
_	At the time that the show originally aired in the early 1950s, "Four Star Revue" was known as the second most expensive hour on television.
_	In "Les paysans de Languedoc", Le Roy Ladurie broke the prevailing Marxist view that dominated French historiography at the time that the history of early modern France from the 15th century to the 18th century was the ever-accelerating accumulation of property and wealthy by capitalists.
_	The theoretical efficiency of the device is limited by the simple potential energy in raising a mass to a specified height, and then dividing by the time that the lamp is desired to stay lit.
_	She told the media at the time that she had wanted to avoid an evacuation order.
_	Consequently, the Mk VIII was obsolete by the time that any significant number of the tanks had been produced, and none ever saw combat.
_	He said at the time that "I believe this wall will speak to you every time you come past it as of honest work earnestly done, it will also look at you (for walls have eyes) and will judge you whether you are doing your part in upholding the ideal for which it stands...it stands in perpetual reminder that work and worship go hand in hand."
_	He announced at the time that he would spend the summer working as a waiter at a hotel in Old Orchard Beach, Maine, before reporting to Illinois.
_	By grouping together characters with the same sound component into a Xiesheng series, one is able to compare words that were perceived to be quite similar in pronunciation at the time that the characters for these words were invented.
_	The scale was developed to combat the assumption at the time that people are either heterosexual or homosexual and that these two types represent antitheses in the sexual world.
_	Orpana believed at the time that the noise may have been coming from a toy gun, and two other students went to investigate the noise.
_	The DGB sites began to appear around the time that a severe drought was occurring in the region, and so the construction makes sense in regards to ritual practices of the Mafa today who inhabit the region.
_	In addition they prepared "jordebøker" (a cadastral survey of the time that provides a comprehensive register of the metes-and-bounds for real property) for all ecclesiastical property in Norway.
_	In the time that followed, when the Kingdom of Bavaria held sway, it lay within the "Bayerischer Rheinkreis" – the part of the Rhineland that the Congress of Vienna had awarded to Bavaria – in the "Landkommissariat" (district), Canton and "Bürgermeisterei" (“Mayoralty”) of Kusel.
_	There were rumours at the time that Stuart-Wortley was under age; to be eligible to vote or to be elected, one had to 21 years of age.
_	It is believed that the series was cancelled despite the high quality of its production because of the glut of westerns on television at the time that it aired.
_	"Rolling Stone" wrote at the time that the Beach Boys have regained their better judgement after the "disaster" of "Smiley Smile", although their use of "pre-existing ideas and idioms" on "Wild Honey" is less satisfactory and original than their earlier work:
_	He was drafted as a "Futures" pick, which was a rule in place at the time that allowed NFL teams to draft underclassmen, and hold their rights until the player had completed his college requirement.
_	A few believed him to be in fact the illegitimate son of Giulio de' Medici (later Pope Clement VII), nephew of Lorenzo the Magnificent, but at the time that was a minority view.
_	Early digital camera backs created more data than could be stored on the relatively small storage devices of the time that could be built into them, and had to be connected (tethered) to a computer during capture.
_	Randall McKee (who was promoted to the position in December 1991, following the departure of predecessor Beverly Poole, who left the Kansas City WFO in April of that year after four years) retained his duties as the office's Meteorologist in Charge with the move to Pleasant Hill, and remained in that position until January 1994; he was eventually succeeded in October of that year by Lynn Maximuk, who oversaw the office's forecasting operations until April 2006; by the time that Maximuk took over, responsibilities for the dissemination of forecasts and weather warnings for the WFO's area of responsibility were transferred to the Pleasant Hill facility.
_	Subsequently, the show was cancelled; a Stephen Sprouse Incorporated representative stated at the time that the show was cancelled due to the company relocating to their new Union Square location.
_	The CIA assessed at the time that "Hizballah's policy of confronting Israel and its surrogates is working" and that Hezbollah held a "qualitative edge" in warfare over the SLA and Amal, while an independent review says that by 1987 Hezbollah's strategic position was deteriorating.
_	At the time that Heist mentioned her to the family, he had not seen her "in ages", he supposed, because she and her crew had to move around a lot to outrun the censors.
_	He also ordered the generals in the region to report to Suiyang to try to save it, but by the time that he arrived in the locale, Suiyang had already fallen, and Zhang Xun was killed by the Yan general Yin Ziqi (尹子奇).
_	At the time that she chose to leave the church, she planned on starting her own ministry.
_	From the time that the possibility of further planetary discoveries had been recalled to the attention of astronomers by the finding of Astræa 8 Dec 1845, Cooper had it in view to extend the star-maps then in progress at Berlin, so as to include stars of the twelfth or thirteenth magnitude.
_	By the time that Anian was elected bishop, Llywelyn ap Gruffudd, the Prince of Wales, entered into agreements regarding territorial disputes over the rights of the sees of St Asaph and Bangor and relied on the bishops as peacekeeping intermediaries with King Edward I of England, but soon asserted control over the church's property and land.
_	It was rumored at the time that Broaca's wife was involved in affairs with a number of his Yankees teammates.
_	By the time that antiquarian John Leland visited in the mid-16th century, it was in "much ruine" and was unsuitable for royal use.
_	By the time that Class B was subdivided into B1, B2, etc. by D. E. Marsh, none of the "Belgravia" class remained in service.
_	The angle of the shutter forms a proportion to the time that each frame of film is exposed:
_	Her parents were theater buffs, and took her to plays from the time that she could stay awake through a matinee.
_	By the time that three further sales of farmland took place in the early 1890s, the newly-emerging market gardeners seized the opportunity to buy an acre or two of land.
_	In regards to a potential romance, Archey insisted that Eli and Lani are "so focused on losing the child" at the time that they can't "think about anything past that."
_	The earliest roots of what Mandelbrot synthesized as the fractal dimension have been traced clearly back to writings about undifferentiable, infinitely self-similar functions, which are important in the mathematical definition of fractals, around the time that calculus was discovered in the mid-1600s.
_	Charles Dreyfus (b. Alsace, 1848 - d. Mentone, France, 11 December 1935) was President of the Manchester Zionist Society, a member of Manchester City Council and a leading figure in the East Manchester Conservative Association during the time that Arthur Balfour was Member of Parliament for the constituency and Prime Minister.
_	She next married an acquaintance named Bruck to postpone her compulsory military service; she had divorced him by the time that she was twenty but kept his surname.
_	By the time that the last section, that between and Invergordon, opened on 25 March 1863, the I&RR had amalgamated with the Inverness and Aberdeen Junction Railway (I&AJR), the authorisation being given on 30 June 1862.
_	"Nageire" was also practiced and around the time that "chabana" and "shoka" were developing.
_	Andrew Hartley also played as a member of the band Lightheavyweight during the time that Waxwing was active.
_	At the time that Villemin filmed the part, he was unaware that it would be used to launch his professional status.
_	I mean, by the time that telegram got here, Alan Hale had already e-mailed us three times with updated coordinates."
_	Glossip's legal team asserts that Justin Sneed was addicted to methamphetamine at the time that he murdered Van Treese, and that he habitually broke into vehicles in the parking lot of the Best Budget Inn while he was employed as a maintenance man.
_	By the time that the post-war government of Clement Attlee merged both Tilling and the railway companies into the British Transport Commission on 1 January 1948, and Crosville was nationalised, the coach operators were a sustainable competitive entity.
_	It was said at the time that while AutoAdmit's reported lack of IP logging might prevent the plaintiffs from learning the defendants' true identities, the case could prove significant within computer and internet law if it came to trial.
_	Adidas executive Sonny Vaccaro commented at the time that Odom possessed a "$2 million smile".
_	The fatigue allowance is intended to cover the time that the worker should be given to overcome fatigue due to work related stress and conditions.
_	Taylor said at the time that he didn't consider the bank to yet be particularly profitable.
_	Some noted at the time that his mysterious death by fire in England evoked the martyrdom at English hands of Joan of Arc five centuries earlier, who had been betrayed by the young duke's ancestor, Georges de la Trémoille, founder of the fortune of the House of La Trémoïlle.
_	By the time that they were done, the windscreens of the car were shattered and the seats were perforated by bullets.
_	By the time that Blalock auditioned in the final group, the crew had seen hundreds of actresses according to Berman.
_	In this sonnet, the poet is urging the 'fair youth' to preserve something of himself and something of the image he sees in the mirror by fathering a child, "Now is the time that face should form another".
_	There were, however, some adaptations resulting from technological improvements of the time that can be seen in the First Congregational building.
_	She is not aware at the time that he is Liam's half-brother.
_	With capital invested by John Ezrin, the result was "Wow Comics" in September 1941 a colour comic which soon switched to the black-and-white format common at the time that became known amongst collectors as "Canadian Whites".
_	This car was remarkably designed and built in 8 months for this prestigious and very fast north African event, which was the time that the rules were changed by the Italian organizers; this was done as an attempt to avoid another dominant victory by German manufacturers Mercedes-Benz and Auto Union and to give Italian manufacturers Alfa Romeo and Maserati a chance at victory.
_	Uhls started working on an early draft of the adapted screenplay, which excluded a voice-over because the industry perceived at the time that the technique was "hackneyed and trite".
_	The play was most likely written to be acted by Lord Strange's Men, the only company of the time that could have mounted such a large and demanding production, at Philip Henslowe's Rose Theatre, which possessed the special staging requirements (large-capacity second-level platform and special enclosure) called for by the play.
_	Ned Baldwin, project architect with John Andrews, wrote at the time that "All of the logic which dictated the design of the lower accommodation has been upset," and that "Under such ludicrous circumstances Canadian National would hardly have chosen this location to build."
_	Owing to the time that it takes to complete a feature-length stop-motion film, the movie wouldn't be released until 1995.
_	He wrote in his review for "The Independent" at the time that the artist's move to New York "away from the petty politics of the music business" had resulted in "a dark, dense album of future-funk and deep dub".
_	Emperor Guangwu declined, stating that his empire was so lacking in strength at the time that he could not expend efforts to protect Xiyu kingdoms.
_	Cricket journalist Mike Coward wrote at the time that "Phillips, who has been the butt of much criticism and ridicule over the past 12 months... who has been severely depressed at times this season, will privately rejoice at Zoehrer's promotion".
_	To make up the full field of 156, additional places are allocated in ranking order from the Official World Golf Ranking at the time that these places are made available by the Championship Committee.
_	The FDA stated at the time that it was not aware of any U.S. reports of any harmful effects from the toothpaste containing diethylene glycol.
_	The racetrack was made popular by the various famous jockeys of the time that participated there.
_	He said it was necessary to make viewers believe at the time that it was live.
_	Through the time that he coached Team Canada, he resided in the United States.
_	Consequently, by the time that he took up the post, the orchestra was already somewhat riven.
_	At the time that the Greek alphabet was adapted to the Slavonic language giving rise to the Cyrillic alphabet, it denoted the close front rounded vowel in educated Greek speech.
_	He indicated at the time that he was "unemployed due to illness."
_	After Sima Rui, then the Prince of Langye, became in charge of the military operations in the area in 307, both Wang Dun and his cousin Wang Dao became key assistants to him, and it was said at the time that the domain was ruled equally by the Simas and the Wangs.
_	John would remain the conductor of the Handel and Haydn for one year and then leave with his family to settle in Missouri for good, leaving around the time that both of his sons died of smallpox.
_	But the time that it took to prepare and fight the battle had cost the British any chance of further advance that year.
_	Despite Pei's high status, little is firmly established about his background or career except for the time that he served as chancellor—as, unusual for a chancellor, he did not have a biography in either the "Old Book of Tang" or the "New Book of Tang".
_	Around the time that the Radeon 8500 and 7500 were announced, rival Nvidia released its GeForce 3 Ti500 and Ti200, the 8500 and Ti500 are direct competitors but the 7500 and Ti200 are not.
_	The Samaritans believe that Mount Gerizim was the original Holy Place of Israel from the time that Joshua conquered Canaan.
_	In 1671, the monks built a wooden chapel to Our Lady next to the gate tower; it was around the time that the painting was covered in expensive silver clothes.
_	During the time that Awataguchi Takamitsu did most of his paintings, Yamatoe-e paintings were also being completed in large numbers.
_	Milan's preparation before the final was in disarray: legendary striker Marco van Basten was still out with a long-term injury, and £13 million young sensation Gianluigi Lentini (then world's most expensive footballer) was also injured; sweeper and captain, Franco Baresi was suspended, as was defender Alessandro Costacurta; and UEFA regulations at the time that limited teams to fielding a maximum of three non-nationals meant that coach Fabio Capello was forced to leave out Florin Răducioiu, Jean-Pierre Papin and Brian Laudrup.
_	Although Ross had been suspended by the BBC over the prank telephone call row that occurred during the time that the special was being filmed, the broadcaster permitted him to appear in it due to the fact that it would be airing after his suspension had been lifted.
_	The bootblack contestants work during the Friday, Saturday, and Sunday of IML during the time that the Leather Market is open, a total of approximately 20 hours over three days.
_	Whilst we now know that the fort was occupied as early as the Early to Middle Iron Age, the archaeologists did note at the time that their evidence for dating was slight; and for structural development was 'largely inferential'.
_	In Tibet the matter was extremely sensitive because at the time that country was close to revolution.
_	At the time that the results were released, the IJM was exploring opportunities to replicate the model in other regions.
_	That was also the time that the series became known for its closely contested, hard fought games.
_	Mór last appears on record in 1293, which seems to have been about the time that Alasdair Óg succeeded him as chief of Clann Domhnaill.
_	Furthermore, the time that a person can be detained in custody is relatively short (in most cases 24 hours in the United Kingdom and France and 24 or 48 hours in the United States) before the detained person must be either charged or released.
_	Historian Tim Pat Coogan remarks of the time that, despite the prevailing conditions, "the Unionist ascendency was so secure that it could blithely go ahead with measures such as cutting unemployment benefits while lavishing expenditure on the new parliament building, which was opened in 1932".
_	During the time that he was a Stoic, he was praised for his modesty, abstinence, and moderation, but afterwards he was described as a person greatly given to sensual pleasures.
_	It was unknown at the time that Husky liver contains extremely high levels of vitamin A.
_	Mennenga thought at the time that the kids and their families were being cheated by unscrupulous promoters (not the aforementioned individuals).
_	For example, if a NURBS describes a path through space over time, the knots control the time that the function proceeds past the control points.
_	It was claimed at the time that, immediately after the dropped catch, Waugh had "sledged" Gibbs with the statement, "You've just dropped the World Cup", but, in his autobiography "Out of My Comfort Zone", Waugh denies this.
_	A number of notable winners either were "boy queens" at the time that they won or have never pursued gender transition—including Chilli Pepper, the first Miss Continental, Michelle Dupree, Miss Continental 1998, Naysha Lopez, Miss Continental, 2013 and Brooke Lynn Hytes, Miss Continental 2014–15—but over time the Continental Pageantry System became renowned for its "titty girls," or pre-/non-operative transsexual contestants.
_	She continued to operate her Los Angeles boutique as of July 2015, with "Architectural Digest" writing at the time that the store "showcases the breadth and daring of her creative output."
_	The way the seeding process was handled led some to claim at the time that UEFA had changed the rules halfway through to favour to the higher profile teams like France and Portugal, preferring them to qualify over "smaller" nations.
_	"The West Australian" newspaper obtained the letter from his mother, and noting that "this letter gives an account of his experiences during a very anxious time" (viz., the time that he was missing), published it on 11 October 1900, without seeking Reid's permission to do so.
_	The governor of Entre Rios, Sergio Urribarri, said at the time that the sales would be carried out by rice farmers themselves, without intermediaries.
_	The apartheid bureaucracy devised complex (and often arbitrary) criteria at the time that the Population Registration Act was implemented to determine who was Coloured.
_	Having the grape vines off the ground “reduces the time that vines remain wet from dew and rain and thus limits the amount of infection”.
_	During the time that I was attending Northwestern, I had learned to know a Presbyterian minister,- C.K.
_	An urban legend circulated at the time that Richard Sanders (who had comparable vocal characteristics to Carlisle) had recorded the song.
_	The applicant should also be prepared to pay any applicable inspection fees at the time that he or she seeks admission.
_	Historically, the Plast fraternity "Lisovi Chorty", as Plast itself, was established on the principles of Scouting, and from its founding to the time that Ukrainian Scouting was banned by the Polish government in 1930 which led to the "underground" Scouting movement, "Lisovi Chorty" were active in political and civil organizations, as well as military service.
_	The Oracle at Delphi was considered so important at the time that people from all over the known world came to Greece to ask advice or favors from the god.
_	The de la Legh family were the largest tenant in Cliviger at the time that it was a possession of Kirkstall Abbey, renting about 40% of the township.
_	The Court carefully noted "that in all of those instances the Security Council was making a determination as regards the concrete situation existing at the time that those declarations of independence were made; the illegality attached to the declarations of independence thus stemmed not from the unilateral character of these declarations as such, but from the fact that they were, or would have been, connected with the unlawful use of force or other egregious violations of norms of general international law, in particular those of a peremptory character (jus cogens).
_	This special station will be operative in the HF bands the time that lasts the entrusted pursuit.
_	So common was the disease at the time that Morton is quoted as saying "I cannot sufficiently admire that anyone, at least after he comes to the flower of his youth, can [sic] dye without a touch of consumption."
_	By the time that the Jaymes family arrives at home, we find out that the bishop's father has died and the bishop will be in a distant community for a few weeks taking care of the funeral and deciding (with the rest of his family) on the disposition of the family farm.
_	About the time that the sap beings to flow in the early spring, suckers will seek small tributaries in which to spawn.
_	By the time that the Italian battleships had been ordered back, the convoy and escorts lacked the ammunition to continue and seven long-range Beaufighters had been lost, depriving Vigorous of air cover while beyond the reach of short-range fighters.
_	"Sports Illustrated" noted at the time that "the tactics Storen says the ABA will employ sound a good deal more like those used by AFL Commissioner Al Davis in the last days of the football war than a plan for peaceful coexistence.
_	Then UW athletic director Barbara Hedges said at the time that she "feared for her life."
_	However, he brought unwanted attention to the NSM when the story of Jacques Pluss, a former professor at Farleigh Dickinson University who was a member of the group, became national news—Pluss claimed at the time that he was pretending to be a Nazi in order to study the group from within (he would later disavow this and confirm he was actually a Nazi, by which time his academic career had ended and he had become a fringe conspiracy theorist and bigot)--and White famously expounded on his views by both denying the Nazi Holocaust and declaring that the NSM wanted what the Nazis had actually done to Jews (outside of mass murder) to become American policy.
_	By the time that Charles II was restored to the throne in 1660, the major palace-fortresses in England that had survived slighting were typically in a poor state.
_	It was reported at the time that April's leaving storyline would revolve around an affair with her sister's husband Alan Jackson.
_	Unlike other film noirs of the time that were filmed in black and white, "Niagara" was filmed in "three-strip" Technicolor (one of the last films to be made at Fox in that format, as a few months later Fox began converting to CinemaScope, which had compatibility problems with "three-strip" but not with Eastmancolor).
_	At the time that the spire was repaired the weather vane was re-gilded.
_	It was the opinion of foreign observers that the Beiyang Army was the largest, best equipped and best trained military force in China at the time that was not Western and/or colonial.
_	The local UUP branch selected David Burnside to contest the seat who declared that he had supported the Good Friday Agreement at the time that it was signed but had since become disillusioned with its implementation.
_	So, to enable these young men to marry, the rabbis, in effect, delayed the time that the amount would be payable, when they would be more likely to have the sum.
_	He has no memory of the time that he was kidnapped by goblins and no idea of Sarah's rescue of him.
_	By the time that the Hwiccan Diocese was established, the Kingdom was subordinate to Mercia.
_	At the time that Coon got in touch, Gerrold had just been employed at CBS as a typist working on scripts such as the pilot of "Hawaii Five-O".
_	She indicated at the time that she intended to stay in politics and hoped to run again in the 2016 London Mayor elections, although she eventually decided not to.
_	She said at the time that "I really like being recognised for having done work that is part of the social discourse.
_	West around the time that bebop changed the prevailing style of jazz.
_	An appeal may only be taken from a decision to which the appealing party objected with reasonable certainty at the time that the decision was made.
_	He also built a set of scales that would measure large loads of hemp accurately, as there were no sure scales at the time that would do this.
_	Philip III was the Duke of Burgundy at the time that Louis came to the throne and he was keen to initiate a Crusade to the Holy Lands.
_	All the time that the queen is fertile and laying eggs she produces a variety of pheromones, which control the behavior of the bees in the hive.
_	Instead, it was well known at the time that the Iroquois finished their hunting expeditions for furs in the spring, and an enterprising Frenchman with military experience, such as Dollard, may have been tempted to test his by risking the voyage up the Ottawa River.
_	Back burning reduces the amount of fuel that's available to the main fire by the time that it reaches the burnt area.
_	Perritt said at the time that he preferred to play for $2,000 a year for the Rebels than $10,000 a year for the Cardinals.
_	It was also the time that people from other places allowed the Department of Indian Affairs into Saugeen Ojibway Territory to set up an elected form of government.
_	In 1896, Barrymore became the first major Broadway star to headline in Vaudeville—a brave foray at the time that he and Georgie speculatively would have later made into motion pictures had they lived.
_	Bronner's research showed that there was no correlation between delinquency and mental disability, undermining the common notion of the time that criminal behaviour was passed down through biological factors.
_	Though it was widely reported in the media at the time that he was an "ex-Jew" or "non-practising Jew", he was in fact a member of a synagogue, and a religious Jew throughout his life.
_	By the time that the song was re-recorded in September 1965, during the recording sessions for The Byrds' second Columbia Records' album, its title had been changed to "It Won't Be Wrong".
_	RTO is a metric that measures the time that it takes for a system to be completely up and running in the event of a disaster.
_	They are automatically rolled over for future medical expenses or may be used to reimburse qualified expenses from prior years as long as the expense was qualified under a health savings account plan at the time that the expense was incurred.
_	Sisamouth graduated from medical school around the time that Cambodia gained independence from France in 1953.
_	"Night Nurse" was one of a trio of Marvel Comics of the time that were aimed at a female audience, alongside "Claws of the Cat" and "Shanna the She-Devil".
_	By the time that the dam and aqueduct were nearing completion, it was clear the oil shale production would not begin for some time.
_	He shared medical opinion at the time that scurvy had multiple causes – notably hard work, bad water, and the consumption of salt meat in a damp atmosphere which inhibited healthful perspiration and normal excretion - and therefore required multiple solutions.
_	At the time that the first production Nimrods were being delivered to the RAF, the MoD decided to conduct a complete review of the AEW programme.
_	Few listeners realised at the time that the recording was by Logsdon; the song was quickly covered by Carl Perkins.
_	At the time that the Great White Store was opened, the store could boast of having one of the first escalators on the West Coast, several restaurants, a drug store, grocery store, bakery, fruit store, meat market, U.S. post office, telegraph office, barber shop, a dentist, a chiropractor, a medical doctor, an auditorium, an electricity and steam power plant in the basement that was large enough to support a city of 50,000 inhabitants, a private volunteer 120 men fire brigade, 13 acres of retail space (482,475 sq.ft., larger than all the department, clothing and dry goods stores in the city), and 1200 employees.
_	He reportedly held the world record for the 100-yard dash, at the time that would have been a hand timed 9.4, made all that more remarkable with Draper standing only 5'5".
_	During the time that they saved with this technique they use to plant more plants especially tobacco which they could sell.
_	Zicree estimated at the time that this number may have been closer to 300, and that around 95% of these worked for free.
_	Attempting to quantify this phenomenon, in the first edition of the book, published in May 1998, Lott wrote that "national surveys" suggested that "98 percent of the time that people use guns defensively, they merely have to brandish a weapon to break off an attack."
_	During the time that Stormfur, Feathertail, and the others are on their journey, not much of RiverClan's territory is destroyed as the Twolegs proceed with their deforestation of the area.
_	After DuMont's demise in 1956, WHBF shared ABC programming with primary NBC affiliate WOC-TV (channel 6, now KWQC-TV) up to the time that the new station WQAD-TV (channel 8) signed on as an ABC affiliate in 1963.
_	Later, during the time that Linghu Tao was the leading chancellor, Linghu recommended Pei Tan to serve as "Zhifang Langzhong" (職方郎中), a supervisory official at the ministry of civil service affairs (吏部, "Libu"), and be put in charge of drafting edicts.
_	Let formula_7 be the time that a
_	At the time that the Bill was introduced in Parliament in 1966, there were radio stations and proposals for television stations outside British licensing jurisdiction with signals aimed at Britain.
_	JJ DOOM was revealed to be the pairing of Jneiro Jarel and Lex label mate DOOM, which drew speculation at the time that the two were working on an album together.
_	The Juniata had moved away by the time that Pennsylvania was colonized by William Penn.
_	The inverse of flow is headway ("h"), which is the time that elapses between the "i"th vehicle passing a reference point in space and the ("i" + 1)th vehicle.
_	Although political opposition prevented him from pushing agrarian reform at the time that he proposed it, Mihail Kogălniceanu is seen as the person responsible for the manner in which it was eventually carried out by Cuza.
_	At the time that ranked him tied for the 34th best performer of all time and #6 for 2015.
_	Strauss gave no public hint at the time that he was referring to fusion reactors, because of the classified nature of Project Sherwood, and the press naturally took his prediction regarding cheap electricity to apply to conventional fission reactors.
_	In general, few small animals became extinct on Madagascar, except for these rodents, two species of "Plesiorycteropus", and the shrew tenrec "Microgale macpheei"; in contrast, large animals such as subfossil lemurs, the carnivore "Cryptoprocta spelea", Malagasy hippopotamuses, "Dipsochelys" tortoises, and "Aepyornis" and "Mullerornis" birds all became extinct around the time that humans arrived.
_	Since that period he has now left mental hospitals and at the time that the book was written was moving into more independent living quarters in Herne Bay.
_	One consequence of the lower salinity of the bay is that the freezing point of the water is higher than in the rest of the world's oceans, thus decreasing the time that the bay remains ice-free.
_	The Festival held exclusive advance screenings of "Mean Girls" and "Supersize Me", celebrated films at the time that are now considered favorite cult classics.
_	By the time that the senior team won the Glamorgan County Silver Ball Trophy for the first time during the 1970/71 season they had won the Mid-District Championship four times in the previous five seasons.
_	Around the time that Charles I of England came to the throne, Spring and Autumn race meetings were introduced to Newmarket and in 1634 the first Gold Cup event was held.
_	There was no further mentioning of her in historical records, and it is not known whether she was still alive at the time that Li Qi was overthrown by his father's cousin Li Shou in 338.
_	Around the time that American football was cut, the school revived its boys' and girls' golf teams.
_	At the time that he entered parliament, the Cape Colony was in the transition stage of representative government.
_	"I felt very much alone [as a woman] at Texas A&M, but it wasn't strange to me," Unterberger said much later (There had been only three women professors in southern California at the time that the Unterbergers came to Texas).
_	Rufus Lollianus was a member of the "gens Hedia Lolliana" which probably originated from the region of Liguria, and which had achieved Patrician status by the time that he began his career.
_	Ltd has its origins in the old state organization called the South African Road Transport Services that offered two services that at the time that were called, Translux and Transtate.
_	A small amount of the episode, as with the following episodes, relies on a flashback to the time that the archaeologists are studying.
_	If a wafer that already contains oxide is placed in an oxidizing ambient, this equation must be modified by adding a corrective term τ, the time that would have been required to grow the pre-existing oxide under current conditions.
_	During the time that Julia Donaldson lived in Bearsden, Gruffalo sculptures were installed around Kilmardinny Loch using natural materials, such as a beech tree trunk for the largest one.
_	Despite following her usual precautions, Linda became pregnant with the Director's son during their time together and was therefore unable to return to the World State by the time that she found her way to Malpais.
_	It would depend on the particular circumstances at the time that the surname was given out or adopted.
_	I find continuity of thought about the pots that I'm making day to day to be the time that is most fruitful.
_	It had grown to 2500 by the time that the Marquis de Lafayette visited in April 1825 during his famous tour of all 24 US states.
_	At the time that this set was released, "Twelve Dreams of Dr. Sardonicus" was the only studio album by the original group still in print.
_	The timeslot and the satirical content of the program were a reaction to FCC rules in effect at the time that required stations to carry some news and information content – although TBS had to broadcast news, the FCC could not dictate "when" it aired or demand that it have a serious tone.
_	However, at the time that Bede wrote, the masculine noun "coliseus" was applied to the statue rather than to what was still known as the Flavian Amphitheatre.
_	By the time that Sotiri was designing the building, he had vast experience that included that of being the architect of the Court of Queen Elisabeth of Wied of Romania.
_	At the time that Lowell published these poems, only Schwartz was still alive, and with the exception of Hart Crane, Lowell knew all of them personally and considered them to be mentors at different stages of his career.
_	There were suspicions at the time that the uprising was an act of provocation orchestrated by factions within the military regime opposed to the process of political normalization and would use the uprising to derail it.)
_	Parameters for determining the social ranking are generally based on actions such as shares, vote, Likes, etc., keeping in mind the time that these activities are carried out once the content is published.
_	By the time that the F-16s approached the border some were almost out of fuel.
_	The letter questioned the accuracy of various statements made by Christie about his client, without providing any specific references, and claimed that there is evidence of Christie being aware of the toll lane closures at the time that they were closed.
_	At the time that Van Gogh painted "Landscape with Snow" he was 35 years old.
_	He explained that prior to this period he had traveled very little in Guyana, and had felt "partially cut off from [his] people and that kind of life" due to the time that he had spent in England.
_	In 2004 Cross, who died in 2007, and Marnell filmed together in Melbourne at the time that the Globe World Cup was held.
_	Ibn Ibad was responsible for breaking off from the wider Kharijite movement roughly around the time that Abd al-Malik ibn Marwan, the fifth Umayyad ruler, took power.
_	In electronics, digital circuits and digital electronics, the propagation delay, or gate delay, is the length of time which starts when the input to a logic gate becomes stable and valid to change, to the time that the output of that logic gate is stable and valid to change.
_	After the crash, the team begins to re-think their own lives and the time that they have now been given.
_	These were installed around the time that the welding plant was constructed, as they are not shown on the Ordnance Survey map of 1962 but are shown on the 1968-1974 map.
_	JUDE development was started by Kenji Hiranabe, CEO of Change Vision, Inc., in 1996; around the time that UML, Java, and some design patterns began appearing.
_	"Washington City Paper" reporter Kelvyn Anderson wrote at the time that the FBI investigation "sends a chilling political message: Groups outside of the political norm operate at their own risk and should expect state-sanctioned surveillance and intrusion into their affairs."
_	It was during the time that JYD in 1982 would be involved in a cross promotional Match for NWA and AWA against the Nick Bockwinkel that would air on NWA Mid South Wrestling on 2 Oct 1982 and AWA programming which he won by Pinfall After losing the Loser Leaves Mid South match to DiBiase & Matt Borne when tagging with Mr. Olympia)
_	He was coaching Dartmouth at the time that he was appointed a National League umpire.
_	A rumour even circulated at the time that Robb, acting under orders from Wright, had been passing on details of the PUP's meetings to Ian Paisley in an attempt to damage UVF cohesion.
_	During the time that Bowman was a fugitive in 1998, it had chapters in more than 30 cities in the United States and some 20 chapters in at least four other countries.
_	By the time that "Paper Scissors Stone" was released, the band were using country music influences in some of their songs according to Fiona Shepherd at "The Scotsman".
_	Cast member Louise Platt credited Ford as saying at the time that Wayne would become the biggest star ever because of his appeal as the archetypal "everyman".
_	In 1816, on the advice of doctors, she and her family returned to Britain; in her autobiography Sherwood relates that she was continually ill in India, and it was believed at the time that neither she nor any of her children could survive in a tropical climate.
_	During the time that he and his brother were in partnership they gave concerts on an extensive scale.
_	Following the sentencing, Andrew Lansley, the South Cambridgeshire MP at the time that the attacks took place, told the BBC "mistakes had been made" adding that he hoped the sentencing would provide some "redress" and acknowledging that "discipline inside the base really fell apart".
_	The actress was also nominated for an Academy Award for Best Actress but lost to Jessica Tandy's performance in "Driving Miss Daisy" (1989), a controversial outcome at the time that disappointed several critics.
_	SANDAG claimed at the time that they would reduce the tolls to attract increased use and decrease traffic on I-805, which would mean that additional lanes would not need to be constructed on that route.
_	He began practice with the team on September 15, 1906, and Atlanta's "The Constitution" reported at the time that "the squad of candidates" that turned out for Hammond's team was "decidedly small," and "the new material in sight right now is nothing to be proud of."
_	This should result in the buildings being in use until the time that Building Schools for the Future (BSF) funding delivers a solution for this area.
_	By the time that Jennifer was 24, Wong had grown weary of trying to pursue a relationship with her.
_	It was widely rumored at the time that Sneha's character has negative shades, which would be her first role of this kind.
_	However, by the time that the battleship action was joined, the Japanese line was very ragged and consisted of only one battleship ("Yamashiro"), one heavy cruiser, and one destroyer, so that the "crossing of the T" was notional and had little effect on the outcome of the battle.
_	It was reported at the time that Astiz mistook Dagmar Hagelin for a Montonero activist to whom she bore some physical resemblance, and who was a mutual acquaintance of fellow-activist Norma Susana Burgos.
_	For example, an English court held that a warrant could not be issued for the arrest of Robert Mugabe on charges of international crimes on the basis that he was serving as head of state at the time that the proceedings were brought.
_	By the time that power has reached the observer, the power is spread over the surface of a sphere with area or about , so its flux density is .
_	He left school, age 12 (1838), about the time that his father, a butcher/provisioner with local shipping interests, was in bankruptcy.
_	However, modern specialists of the period, such as Paul Lemerle, have pointed out that this cannot be the case, since Photius himself clearly states in his preface and postscript to the "Bibliotheca" that after he was chosen to take part in the embassy, he sent his brother a summary of the works he had read "previously" "since the time that I learned how to understand and evaluate literature," i.e. from his youth.
_	In 1837 he left the Guards on being appointed governor of Madras by Lord Melbourne; it was said at the time that his appointment was made in order to dissipate a rumour that the young Queen Victoria had fallen in love with him.
_	As the last remaining example of an early residential college in Brisbane city, dating from the time that the University of Queensland was located in the city, St Andrew's War Memorial Hospital Administration Building demonstrates rare and uncommon aspects of Queensland's cultural heritage.
_	According to a British journal, "The Tablet", it was said at the time that Buckley's consecration was "valid but illicit" but that the Catholic Media Office of the Catholic Bishops' Conference of England and Wales "has now said that it doubts that the bishop's episcopal consecration is valid".
_	At the time that the church was founded, the area around Lower Bridge Street was largely occupied by Scandinavians, and it is thought that this is the reason for the dedication.
_	If one uses these inexpensive types of inverters, all of the power generated during the time that the DC side is turned off is simply lost, and this represents a significant amount of each cycle.
_	In fact, they were so scared to be associated with the radical movements of the time that they rarely said anything specific at all.
_	The developer of "Chicks'n'Vixens" intended the game as a challenge to Rovio Mobile, which stated at the time that a Windows Phone port of "Angry Birds" would not be ready until later in 2011.
_	He threw one officially ratified world record in the javelin, 66.10 meters in Stockholm on 24 August 1919 and several other performances exceeding the official record at the time that were for various reasons not ratified, including his eventual personal best of 68.55 m achieved in Richmond, Virginia, on 27 September 1925.
_	At the time that Ballangeich was thrown open for selection, someone selected this piece of land known as “The Groves” on the bank of the Hopkins River.
_	Several ghost stories surround Meggernie Castle, the best-known dating from the time that the house was occupied by the Menzies's of Culdares.
_	Marc Ratner, who was the executive director of the Nevada State Athletic Commission during the time that Halpern was a referee commented, "There are certain officials in certain sports who are naturals...
_	Despite Ren's high status, little is firmly established about his background or career except for the time that he served as chancellor—as, unusual for a chancellor, he did not have a biography in either the "Old Book of Tang" or the "New Book of Tang".
_	Even though he was by no means old, the people still commented at the time that it was regrettable that he was not chancellor earlier.
_	The LNER renumbered its locomotive stock during the period that these locomotives were being rebuilt, so some were renumbered at the time that they were rebuilt, some before rebuilding, and some after rebuilding.
_	At the time that they were drawn, the maps of the Maldives were deemed of such a high quality that they were inspected personally by Queen Victoria.
_	During the time that Wentworth wrote, the fact that her pieces were published and she was recognized as a public figure of her community is astonishing.
_	Li Deyu had known about Shi, from the time that Shi served under Cui Qun (as at that time, Li Deyu was the military governor of Huainan Circuit (淮南, headquartered in modern Yangzhou, Jiangsu), which neighbored Wuning), and so recommended Shi to be Tian's deputy, to help defend against Huigu raids.
_	Under the terms, New World included CBS affiliate KDFW-TV – along with two of its sister stations, fellow CBS affiliate KTBC in Austin and ABC affiliate KTVI in St. Louis – in the group's affiliation agreement with Fox (NBC affiliate WVTM-TV in Birmingham was exempted as New World chose to transfer that market's ABC affiliate WBRC as well as ABC affiliate WGHP in High Point, North Carolina into a trust company for later sale to Fox Television Stations to comply with FCC restrictions at the time that prohibited broadcasting companies from owning more than twelve television stations nationwide and, in the case of Birmingham, barred television station duopolies).
_	Pius XI famously wrote at the time that "no one can be at the same time a good Catholic and a true socialist", yet had clarified that a Catholic was free to vote for the British Labour Party, the UK affiliate of the Socialist International.
_	Putting Onyango's case in perspective, MSNBC's Domenico Montanaro noted at the time that thousands of people live for years in the US after receiving deportation orders.
_	Lennox said in an interview at the time that the song was inspired by the death of her aunt, as she sings about a woman who has killed herself and now has "gone to meet her maker".
_	Admiral Christie informed the Kimmel family at the time that Manning had gone down with his ship.
_	If a candidate for a list member seat had already been elected locally by the time that list seats were being allocated, that candidate's name would simply be passed over in favour of the next candidate on that party list.
_	At the time that CNR took over operations, the premiere cross-island passenger train was called "The Overland Limited".
_	It was his discontent with America at the time that lead Wainwright to spend some time recording the album in Berlin.
_	Boon claimed in an interview at the time that Motivation sounded like 1976 bands, which indicated the group sounded like pre-punk formations or the first punk bands.
_	Although it was not the reason for this modification, it was noted at the time that the plywood skinning enabled the fuselage to float for some time in the event of a water landing.
_	Alex becomes envious of the time that Aaron and Robert are spending together.
_	Since the time that Wi Man took the Gojoseon throne, relations between Han and Gojoseon had been deteriorating.
_	The Caldwell County, Missouri coroner said at the time that the autopsy concluded that the death was an accident and said Reyes could have been bitten before he arrived at the camp.
_	It was thought in the west at the time that the Russian naval force could have been stronger if newer and larger ships had been sent from Petrograd and that indiscipline in the Navy had prevented this.
_	Li and Zhu clashed in the first two years following Zhu's appointment as vice-Chairman; but, by the time that he suffered a heart attack in 1993, Li had lost influence within the government and was no longer able to block many of Zhu's reforms.
_	Barclay said at the time that he thought there might be a series in the characters, but nothing came of it.
_	It was named after Russian historical icon Alexander Nevsky (1230–1263), making it the seventh warship at the time that had carried his name.
_	(It was indicated in interviews of the time that Evoland was also the name of the island.)
_	Around the time that he was expected to return, it was instead confirmed that he would be out until February 2016 at the earliest.
_	In some Swedish institutions, however, the title has been used to circumvent restrictions on the time that such institutions can hire postdoctoral fellows and thus are not necessarily related to their academic maturity, capability to undertake independent research or show any proof of ability to attract funds to their projects.
_	In 1947, around the time that India gained independence, the Kutch, Kathiawar, Gujarat Kshatriya Sabha (KKGKS) caste association emerged as an umbrella organisation to continue the work begun during the Raj.
_	However, he was not selected; it was suspected at the time that this was capitulation towards the apartheid regime.
_	Williams did not know at the time that the "race market" had become Paramount's prime business and that he was keeping the label afloat.
_	This introduction was so innovative at the time that Poubelle's surname became synonymous with dustbins ("la poubelle") and remains the most common French word for it.
_	Shiba commented at the time that he felt they had gathered a very good voice cast for the game.
_	While it was commonly believed at the time that the female reproductive cycle was controlled by substance in the "corpus luteum", Allen sought the answer in the follicles surrounding the ovum, leading to his discovery of estrogen, though it was identified six years later by Adolf Butenandt in 1929.
_	A common belief held at the time that a college education would harm a woman’s health and result in infertility.
_	It is considered that the time that elapses from reliance, not counted in the Contract with the Italians, until the opening of its site can be significant.
_	The company name originally was Migault S.A. at the time that Migault's cousin Marcel Gourdet joined the firm.
_	Yonezu did not collaborate with other musicians on the album, as he felt at the time that was not a good communicator.
_	At the time that the complaint was filed, city officials said that 10 other hospitals were under investigation for similar issues.
_	Between the time that Yamato joined and the band being signed to Spice Music's Japanese division, Orange Range mainly did covers of already famous singers and bands, like Glay and Mr. Children, for school concerts and for small art houses.
_	See also Swords, Ships and Sugar - The History of Nevis, by Vincent K. Hubbard, p. 73, where a large amount of "Peruvian Bark" had been captured by the pirate Basil Ringrose, also known as "The Gentleman Pirate", noting at the time that "the Spaniards had a monopoly on its production".
_	By the time that Flight 981 arrived at the initial fix, to begin the approach to Rostov-on-Don, two other flights had landed successfully during the previous 20 minutes.
_	Around the time that shooting began on Season 6, Astier announced that there would be no Season 7.
_	Melbourne was considered to have had the better record against the remaining clubs, because Carlton had recorded four draws against those other clubs, but such was Carlton and Melbourne's dominance at the time that the matches against the other clubs had little influence on the premiership.
_	During this period, Jackson co-wrote much of his material with Windsor King, who had worked with Jackson from the time that Jackson was recording with Calla Records.
_	At the time of the merger there was much talk of future political parity between members of the two component parties, but by the time that the Soviet occupation zone was reinvented, formally in October 1949, as the Soviet sponsored German Democratic Republic, leading SPD politicians who had been part of the merged Socialist Unity Party (SED / "Sozialistische Einheitspartei Deutschlands") had in one way or another disappeared from active politics and the new party was in most respects the old Communist Party with a new name.
_	The name Medi Script was used because of an obscure law at the time that allowed the medical establishment to grant credit.
_	"Village Voice" critic Robert Christgau argued at the time that she proves herself to be the era's "most accomplished record-maker" by honing traditional popular music composition, understated vocal emotions, and realistic narratives colored by her native experiences and values:
_	By the time that he retired in 1992, this area of chemistry had become very active.
_	The payment amount is inversely proportional to the time that the child spends with the so-called absent parent.
_	Around the time that Minicon reduced its size, some other conventions sprang up in the area, including CONvergence and MarsCon.
_	Brown stated in an interview at the time that band's three albums were intended to present a thematic progression, with their debut focusing on the state of humankind in the present, the second on the human animal itself and the dichotomy between the body and mind, and "Journey" focused on cosmic and spiritual matters.
_	He founded the Lezioni Caritatevoli school in Bergamo in 1805 for the purpose of providing musical training, including classes in literature, beyond what choirboys ordinarily received up until the time that their voices broke.
_	By the time that he accompanied Huan Wen in his campaign against Yao Xiang (姚襄) in 356, he was a governor of two commanderies and the military commander of seven.
_	Garlett was homeless for much of the time that he was playing for Swans, often sleeping in the back of cars going for days without eating.
_	Although the number of schoolchildren grew quickly in the time that followed, municipal council was at first not ready to build a new schoolhouse or expand the old one.
_	The United State Defense Intelligence Agency and CIA analyst Stephen C. Pelletiere claimed at the time that Iran was responsible for the gassing (a claim that Pelletiere repeated in a 2003 op-ed in "The New York Times"); however, these claims were later discredited.
_	The County of Surrey Electrical Power Distribution Company was formed in 1899; by the time that it supplied its first customers in 1902, it had become the South Metropolitan Electric Tramways & Lighting Company.
_	His first job in Pathology was at the Brompton Hospital at the time that the first clinical trial with a randomised intake between treatment of pulmonary tuberculosis (TB) with streptomycin or with bed rest alone was run.
_	In the time that Wojcicki has been CEO of YouTube, the company announced that it had reached 1.5 billion logged-in users a month and that users were watching one billion hours a day.
_	A misconception circulated at the time that the painting had been inspired by Swinburne's poem.
_	The Ryde's shuttle service eliminates the time that many students spend parking and then walking to the various parts of campus.
_	During the time that Creed was at the end of its career in the early 2000s, Tremonti had intentions to form a speed metal side project called Downshifter (with Hatebreed vocalist Jamey Jasta and Slipknot drummer Joey Jordison), but the project never got off the ground.
_	Rumsfeld recalls his service as President Ronald Reagan's Middle East envoy at the time that U.S. pulled out of Lebanon.
_	Despite the option to board the DHARMA submarine and "go back to the real world", the survivors from 2004 stay on the island together in the hope that they can somehow return to the time that they knew.
_	Ainley was born in Stanmore, Middlesex the son of the actor Henry Ainley on 20 August 1932 although his birth was not registered until January 1938 at around the time that he was admitted to the actors' orphanage.
_	Over that period, the conservative bloc has been in the majority about 62% of the time that the Court has divided along ideological lines, which represents about 44% of all the 5–4 decisions.
_	One local councillor commented that it was quite realistic as the actual parsonage was now surrounded by trees that were not present during the time that the Brontë family were in residence.
_	It was a myth at the time that the "Swiftsure" sailed faster at night.
_	At the time that William II of England, known as William Rufus, came to power, the control of northern Northumbria was still an open question.
_	The Poydras-Magazine line ceased operation in March or April 1836, about the time that a new La Course Street line was opened along that street (now named Race Street).
_	The New York Times said at the time that "her work is charged with tenderness and violence, acceptance and defiance, ambivalence and conviction."
_	He said at the time that he initially voted for the registry because of a poll showing that most of his constituents supported it, and added that he changed his vote when a second poll showed the opposite result.
_	Our body naturally starts to shut down, around the time that the sun starts to take its dip into the horizon.
_	At the time that the “Free education to all from primary level to the university” was introduced by Dr. C.W.W. Knnaggara
_	The Six Bells Inn is reputed to have gained its name in 1620, about the time that St. Bartholomew's acquired its ring of six bells (see above).
_	The emperor's famous "Jewel Voice Broadcast," occurred about the time that the two P-51 pilots were carrying out their final military mission, making their mission, apparently, the final mission of the war.
_	A business law professor commented at the time that this price indicated how worried News Corp. was about the lawsuit and the substantial legal risk the suit presented to News Corp.
_	Huston, who had been in Europe at the time that Ruppert had made the appointment, disliked Huggins and wanted to hire Wilbert Robinson, his drinking buddy.
_	By the time that the plans were put before the Monitor Board in New York City, Ericsson and Simers had a poor relationship, and Chief of the Bureau of Construction and Repair John Lenthall had little connection to the board.
_	Fish and Wildlife officials in Denver stated at the time that Burns had the authority to stop the management transfer.
_	Griffiths told the media at the time that anecdotal evidence suggested there was a wide spectrum of involvement in areas of insider trading in the business community and it was therefore incumbent upon governments to ensure they took whatever steps were available to prevent that sort of business behavior.
_	The village was founded at the time that John Guest built the Plymouth Ironworks in 1763.
_	Thunderbolt is a 1910 film in the genre of "outlaw" films at the time that tended to glorify the life of the outlaw "Bushrangers" that roamed the Australian outback in pre-commonwealth days.
_	Portsmouth Constabulary jumped the gun and arrested one on 3 August, and not all of the 22 were in custody by the time that McKenna made his speech, but the official history regards the incident as a devastating blow to Imperial Germany which deprived them of their entire spy ring, and specifically upset the Kaiser.
_	Meade found the time that Benjamin spent as attorney general to be fruitful, as it allowed him the opportunity to judge Davis's character and to ingratiate himself with the president.
_	This was roughly at the time that the Reformation was introduced in Lippe (1538) and church activity at the site ceased.
_	Using his findings he was able to reject the popular idea at the time that the scarcity in money was due to the exchange rate.
_	By the time that it surfaced in October 1969, however, Leviathan had split up.
_	The American Federation of Labor (AFL) worked to organize a rubber industry labor union for workers between 1933 and 1934, directly surrounding the time that the National Recovery Administration was established by President Franklin D. Roosevelt.
_	By the time that Darwin published his theory, theologians of liberal Christianity were already supporting such ideas, and by the late 19th century, their modernist approach was predominant in theology.
_	In March 2004, Davidson, an outspoken Conservative, publicly left the United Kingdom for the tax-free haven of Dubai in protest at the Labour government, although it was also noted by HMRC at the time that his move coincided with an unpaid tax bill of approximately £700,000.
_	During the time that the Mosers lived with the Seri people, the population of the Seri people reversed its downward trend and the total population began to increase.
_	Austin tells his father how much he cherishes the time that they shared on the ranch together.
_	The House of Lords did not interfere with nationalisations in 1945 or 1946, but it was feared that the proposed nationalisation of the iron and steel industry would be a bridge too far, so a bill was introduced in 1947 to reduce the time that the Lords could delay bills, from three sessions over two years to two sessions over one year.
_	During the time that this group formed, there was a hint of dissatisfied intellectualism of churches.
_	Cable companies converted to digital systems during the 2000s, around the time that television signals were converted to the digital HDTV standard, which was not compatible with earlier analog cable systems.
_	This search would focus on an area adjacent to the previous search area, but believed to contain waste taken to the site around the time that McKeague disappeared.
_	George Harrison began writing "Piggies" in early 1966, around the time that the Beatles were recording their album "Revolver".
_	The original intent for Interstate 64 was to drive it through the Triangle District just west of downtown, an urban blight at the time that was home to high crime rates and was referred to as the "Red Light District."
_	Cummins stated at the time that Whitehead has been put on indefinite leave and will play no further part in the Bulls season.
_	In the time that followed, population figures rose quickly, partly as a result of immigration.
_	To toy with the surface dwellers and instill despair, Ifrit lit a tower on fire that represented the time that the surface realm had to repent and beg for their lives before he would begin his Divine Punishment, and burn everything to ash.
_	It took 32 years to approve, plan, finance, and build the freeway from the time that the state first authorized funding in 1972 to the time of the ribbon-cutting ceremony in 2004 that opened the South Beltline to traffic.
_	At the time that the gate was opened, in 1790, the prince "(pictured at right)" was serving with the military in Gibraltar, as commander of the 7th Regiment of Foot (Royal Fusiliers).
_	Most of the layers are parallel to each other, suggesting they formed by vertical settling, but a few are cross-bedded, indicating that at the time that the layers were deposited the sediment was transported along the ground surface by wind or water.
_	During the time that the largest quantities of turquoise were being extracted from the mine, the company made no organized effort to recover it.
_	The failure of the attitude indicator was caused by the failure of both generators and the crew using an outdated checklist and not adhering to a checklist; the battery was therefore drained of power in less than half the time that it should have been able to supply power for.
_	At the time that UT and Texas Tech entered the Big 12, Texas Tech held a 49–45 lead in the all-time series against Texas.
_	Throughout the time that the He 277 design was being worked on, Ernst Heinkel was facing competition from other developing heavy bomber designs, and large four-engined aircraft proposals that showed promise as heavy bombers, from Focke Wulf (the Fw 300, and later, the Ta 400), Junkers (the Ju 390), from Messerschmitt AG (the Me 264), and from his own firm's He 274 four-engined, high-altitude development of the He 177.
_	This list contains the works on buildings and structures other than churches which was carried out by the practice during the time that E. G. Paley was the only principal in the practice, as identified by Price.
_	During the time that Li Baochen served as military governor, Li Weiyue served as commander of the forces (行軍司馬, "Xingjun Sima") as well as the prefect of Chengde's capital prefecture Heng Prefecture (恆州).
_	As Emperor Dezong favored Cui's talent, both Liu and Qi yielded most of the responsibilities to Cui. Cui, during the time that he was living in the Yangtze River region, had long despised the institution of having various special directors for financial matters, believing the officials given those positions to be generally corrupt, so he advocated abolishing the director positions in charge of tax collection and transportation of food supplies.
_	For which it was suggested at the time that he was the greatest cyclist ever seen.
_	Moran was selected as the Liberal Democrat candidate for Battersea at the 2010 general election, She told BBC News at the time that "I'm just as sick as everyone else is of how politics has been working in this country in recent years.
_	The station was modified substantially in the early 1990s, at the time that electrification of the line was taking place.
_	It was believed at the time that the heart was the seat of intelligence.
_	Costeley's only microtonal composition, "Seigneur Dieu ta pitié", was apparently written at exactly the time that Sandrin was in Paris.
_	Despite media reports at the time that declared the end of the occupation, protesters maintained a continuous presence at the site.
_	When His Royal Highness Prince is mature, at the time that he shall be established as heir to the throne, tradition and a royal tradition Kattii ceremony should be observed, consistent with the citizens and all leaders of the country of all sides.
_	However, by the time that the Middleton and Prestwich campaign started, the British Army was fighting the Germans in Norway; on 9 May, the Germans invaded France through the Low Countries.
_	She discovers this around the time that the Cott'ners are hunting her down as well as her friends.
_	Antony issued a rebuttal to the interview, saying that he had requested at the time that Singh provide a written report regarding the incident and that this had never been submitted.
_	Songwriting on the effort reportedly got off to a slow start because, according to a post from Stefani, she was distracted by her second pregnancy, though she was certain at the time that "this could be the most inspired No Doubt record so far."
_	Publishers believed at the time that a series would sell less if people perceived it as new.
_	Jet 3.0 included many enhancements, including a new index structure that reduced storage size and the time that was taken to create indices that were highly duplicated, the removal of read locks on index pages, a new mechanism for page reuse, a new compacting method for which compacting the database resulted in the indices being stored in a clustered-index format, a new page allocation mechanism to improve Jet's read-ahead capabilities, improved delete operations that speeded processing, multithreading (three threads were used to perform read ahead, write behind, and cache maintenance), implicit transactions (users did not have to instruct the engine to start manually and commit transactions to the database), a new sort engine, long values (such as memos or binary data types) were stored in separate tables, and dynamic buffering (whereby Jet's cache was dynamically allocated at start up and had no limit and which changed from a first in, first out (FIFO) buffer replacement policy to a least recently used (LRU) buffer replacement policy).
_	By the time that the UNRRA took the reins of administration of the camps, the Jewish DPs had already begun to elect their own representatives, and were vocal about their desire for self-governance.
_	Flynn began her association with Cheyenne Frontier Days in the late 1960s as a volunteer during the time that her husband, Lloyd A. Flynn (1928–2002), a native of Bismarck, North Dakota, was a member of the rodeo general committee.
_	(Before the campaign started, Fu Jiān had also started building a mansion for Zhang in Chang'an, and by the time that Zhang surrendered, the mansion was complete.)
_	When interpreting any treaties, they must be given their natural meaning as understood by the Indians at the time that they were signed.
_	Dwight yells at Daryl for jeopardizing his life, but Daryl responds that, like Dwight, he was thinking of someone else at the time that he decided whether or not to obey Negan.
_	Geijtenbeek claims that Dvořák believed at the time that it was impossible to write a quartet in F major (Dvořák was to later write his 12th String Quartet in the same key).
_	For most of the time that Strumwasser worked on Wall Street he concurrently pursued a career as an aspiring novelist and also as the primary songwriter and drummer in the indie rock band Channeling Owen.
_	Edward L. Gaylord, president of the Oklahoma Publishing Company (corporate sister of the station's then-owner, Gaylord Broadcasting Company), had purchased a minority ownership stake in the team around the time that KTVT began airing the Rangers telecasts.
_	Sinclair pioneered the concept of the local marketing agreement (LMA) in American television in 1991, when it sold WPTT to its general manager Eddie Edwards (founder of Glencairn, Ltd., the Sinclair-affiliated licensee that would eventually become Cunningham Broadcasting) in order to purchase fellow Pittsburgh station WPGH-TV to comply with FCC ownership rules of the time that prohibited duopolies, while agreeing to allow Sinclair to retain operational responsibilities for the station.
_	According to Knohl’s calculation the time that elapsed from the beginning of the Hyksos dynasty until the escape of the Apiru was exactly 430 years, which coincides with time of the Israelite sojourn in Egypt according to Exodus 12:41.
_	Tyler told police at the time that she suspected Harris had been unfaithful to her and that the two had been estranged for much of their brief marriage.
_	At the time that Whitney began to study art, women had limited educational opportunities.
_	At the time that Gray decided to push towards a more rock and roll, band-based format, the band consisted of Gray on lead vocals and guitar, guitarist Shane Gilman, bassist Matthew Dobbs, and drummer Scott Francisco.
_	U.S. House Speaker Paul Ryan announced at the time that the $8.1 billion extension would ensure lifetime healthcare for 9/11 survivors.
_	The format for the show even attracted interest from overseas buyers, including investors from England, but RTÉ said at the time that “no agreements [would] be reached until the current series has finished”.
_	By the time that a several volunteer companies in South Arkansas had recruited and organized, the State had already reached its original goal of eight regiments, so the services of these new companies were declined on the thought that war would not last long.
_	However, since there are treatments that rapidly degrade upon soil contact within a day, this effect is limited to the time that it takes for seeds of other species to germinate and establish themselves.
_	An additional potential problem is that the select and the I/O operations are still sufficiently decoupled that select's result may effectively be a lie: if two processes are reading from a single file descriptor (arguably bad design) the select may indicate the availability of read data that has disappeared by the time that the read is issued, thus resulting in blocking; if two processes are writing to a single file descriptor (not that uncommon) the select may indicate immediate writability yet the write may still block, because a buffer has been filled by the other process in the interim, or due to the write being too large for the available buffer or in other ways unsuitable to the recipient.
_	It was generally accepted at the time that the war ended with the armistice of 14 August 1945 (V-J Day), rather than the formal surrender of Japan, which was on 2 September 1945 that officially ended the war in Asia.
_	During the time that the Kurram Militia were cut off, they gave an excellent account of themselves, not only defending the valley, but also occupying vantage points, which later acted as stepping stones for further operations against the Afghans.
_	Corker said at the time that he hoped that as an alternative to administrative regulations by the EPA, Congress would "determine a rational energy policy for the country, broadly advancing our energy security and maintaining existing policies to ensure clean air and water."
_	However, it was also reported at the time that the station did not adhere to such a precise schedule and that it had sometimes been heard later than 2350 GMT/UTC.
_	Wendy's senior vice president for communications, Denny Lynch, stated at the time that "with Clara we accomplished as much in five weeks as we did in 14½ years."
_	These transgenic salmon reach a harvest weight in two-thirds of the time that it takes their unmodified counterparts.
_	Graham testified that he was unaware at the time that the RCMP had passed information to the American authorities.
_	Cornick told young people who had been pupils at the school at the time that he planned to murder Maguire.
_	The phrase was such a part of national culture at the time that, when General Doolittle conducted the bombing of Tokyo in 1942, many newspapers used the phrase "Doolittle Dood It" as a headline.
_	It was reported at the time that her 1939 election for her second term was unopposed by Indian members of the council.
_	This seems to indicate that Wooten has made threats subsequent to the time that Palin became governor.
_	Utilizing a self-taught style of pointillism, Hamon's familiarity with the flora and fauna of the bush grew from the time that he worked splitting posts for sheep pens in the forests of the Urewera area.
_	This writer commented to two US DOJ Anti Trust attorney's at the time that there was "going to be a killing" out there, referring to the loud argument.
_	Rogers joked at the time that "every 20 years I will record a Don Schlitz song".
_	In the Austro-Prussian War between the German Confederation (which included Bavaria), and Prussia and her allies, the town was the headquarters of the Prussian army at the time that the ceasefire between Bavaria and Prussia was declared in 1866.
_	At that time, populations have often greatly increased leading to the southward migration of huge numbers of grasshoppers, often at the time that millet is ripening in the fields.
_	However this was not the case, and they split around the time that she was cast for the role of Margarita in Bendita Mentira.
_	It was known as "Bonnie Doon" at the time that Robert and Alice Blackman purchased it in the early 1950s, and retained that name for at least the twenty years that they owned the house.
_	KID-TV amended its call sign to KIDK on December 18, 1984, when the radio stations were sold due to an FCC rule in place at the time that prohibited TV and radio stations in the same market, but with different ownership from sharing the same call letters.
_	By the time that Rader died on July 2, 2002, just two weeks after being diagnosed with acute pancreatic cancer, the Worldwide Church of God had terminated its former broadcasts and created a separate ministry for its magazine, which had renounced its previous editorial purpose.
_	The next day they arrived at Neuwied at noon, the time that had been revealed to her.
_	However, it was believed at the time that Bulgaria would not have been able to produce the pellet, and it was also believed that the KGB had supplied it.
_	It was reported at the time that inhabitants were bitterly opposed to the railway, the mayor suggesting that "Maidstone will be ruined as a commercial town".
_	At the time that Kinkaid entered Congress, the 1862 Homestead Act allowed settlers to obtain a quarter-section (160 acres, or 65 ha) of government land for a nominal fee; the 1873 Timber Culture Act allowed them to claim an additional quarter-section.
_	By the time that workers were available for the R.II again, in early 1917, Siemens-Schuckert had gained experience with the similar R.VII and attempted to meet the "Idflieg"'s requirements by installing extra sections in the wing to extend it to six bays and thereby offset the extra weight of the new engines.
_	In order to optimize performance and control the range of ambiguities, the PRI must be larger than the time that it takes to collect returns from the entire illuminated swath.
_	It was felt at the time that the name would provide greater grandeur to a shabby street, and to promote trade with the Western Hemisphere.
_	He believed at the time that melodrama was the way to solve the problems of operatic recitative.
_	He grew up in an orphanage and apparently spoke six languages (German, Yiddish, Hungarian, Romanian, Czech and Slovak) by the time he was sixteen; by the time that he graduated from the Prague Higher Technical School, he also spoke English and French.
_	Compared to contemporary tanks of the time that used one or two-man turrets, the three-man turrets proved valuable in freeing the commander from other duties in the tank, allowing him to survey the battlefield with ease from his cupola.
_	They were unaware at the time that Delta Chapter at Marietta still existed as Alpha Sigma Phi.
_	By the time that the meal had started, nine dances for full orchestra had been completed in full score."
_	Armand also shares with David his version of some of the events recounted by Louis de Pointe du Lac in "Interview with the Vampire": the end of the Théâtre des Vampires and the time that Armand and Louis shared together.
_	She didn't know at the time that a shadow had fallen across her face, as she was simply annoyed at being interrupted.
_	Overall, English place-names dominate the Northumbrian landscape, suggesting the prevalence of an Anglo-Saxon elite culture by the time that Bede—one of Anglo-Saxon England’s most prominent historians—was writing in the eighth century.
_	It is recorded in chronicles of the time that Marcin Wadowita (also known as Wadovius or Campius) a Polish priest, theologian and professor drew from his Pławowice estate in 1641 3000 zlotys to present as a bursary towards the Jagiellonian University of which he was Chancellor, until his death in that same year.
_	In the eighteenth century the poet John Langhorne (1735–1779) became the curate at Blagdon around the time that Augustus Montague Toplady (1740–1778) was the priest.
_	Wikis offer a way for news websites to increase their reach, while also increasing the time that users spend on their website, a key factor in attracting advertisers.
_	There were rumors at the time that she had been poisoned by fractions at court determined to prevent any potential pro-Rurikid influence, or by the enemies of the Dolgorukov family.
_	At the time that the cemetery was established it lay about a half mile away from most development, but it is now considered to be in downtown.
_	His publicist Cathy Mouton simply stated at the time that Bernstein had died following a lengthy illness.
_	The tune has remained popular with the "Persona" fan base: Tsuchiya has attributed its popularity to the enduring nature of the "Persona" series as a whole, and compared it to a fashionable item of the time that now requires a "certain courage" to wear in later times.
_	This corresponded with the time that Australian Agricultural Company's 500,000 acre estate was being subdivided.
_	Emperor Yang, who was at the eastern capital Luoyang, sent an imperial messenger to order Yang Yue released, but by the time that the messenger reached Chang'an, the officials in charge of Chang'an had already killed Yang Yue.
_	During the time that Grosvenor was baronet, the estates in London were being developed.
_	"NB: The above property details usually represent the names and addresses that were used at the time that the buildings were listed.
_	Roland then explained: “About a month into it, we realized the reason the Clancy books worked so well was because they were relevant for the time that they were written.
_	Around the time that Cataloochee Ski Area opened to mark the advent of commercial alpine skiing in North Carolina, Blowing Rock Ski Lodge followed suit in the state’s western High Country region.
_	Melton argued for the continuity of short-term and long-term memory, which is consistent with modern theories of memory, rather than the presiding theoretical framework at the time that they were structurally distinct.
_	The opening track "First World Problems" alludes to the time that Eubanks was homeless.
_	A respected historian, John Willard Johnston, who knew Chauncey Thomas personally, visited the bridge and told the owner at the time that Thomas was very inexperienced in bridge construction.
_	It was his belief at the time that the Association responded with enthusiasm and expressed an intention to be helpful.
_	At the time that they were married, Li Zhe's father Emperor Gaozong promoted her father Wei Xuanzhen (韋玄貞) from being the military advisor to the prefect of Pu Prefecture (普州, roughly modern Ziyang, Sichuan) (eighth rank, second class, second division) to be the much more important post of being prefect of Yu Prefecture (豫州, roughly modern Zhumadian, Henan) (fourth rank, first class, second division).
_	This work resulted in Teale and Sulzby assembling a book authored by various leading researchers of the time that proposed reconceptualizing what happens from birth to the time when children reading and write conventionally as a period of emergent literacy.
_	She traced the many descendants of Elizabeth Hemings and their families during the time that they lived at Monticello; she had 75 descendants there.
_	Some people reported the shooting via Twitter or text messaging rather than calling the police; officers were already at the theater by the time that tweets had been sent.
_	In attacking shipping, the problems of inaccuracy were amplified by the fact that the target could be moving, and could change its direction between the time that the bombs were released and the time that they arrived.
_	Around the oval of this former town wall arose residential neighbourhoods, schools and sport facilities, allotments and industrial parks in the time that followed.
_	And I think if you look at the movie now, and you don't know anything about the book, and you get it out of the time that it was released, I think you can see it in a whole different way."
_	On September 11 each year, the shadow touches each inscription at the time that event occurred.
_	Some diplomatic sources in Addis Ababa reported at the time that the fever-stricken Empress was immersed in a large container of frigidly cold holy water to cure her of her illness, but that her body went into shock and she died shortly thereafter.
_	Around the time that Luke joined the Unitas Fratrum, the “seclusionary and narrow views” of the early members of the Unity were being challenged by views that “were not so completely terrified of any involvement in the outside world.
_	With Cliff seemingly putting one over on J.R., Miss Ellie bailed Ewing Oil out of this mess by agreeing to a deal with Clayton that Clayton would pay the price that he would have paid at the time that the oil was stockpiled.
_	By 1970, most, if not all steam locomotives had been relegated to freight work, and by the time that complete dieselisation occurred, the remaining steam locomotives were used for branch line work and shunting duties and later were put out of use completely..
_	It was said at the time that her funeral drew the largest crowd of mourners to Crown Hill Cemetery in Indianapolis since the funeral of President Benjamin Harrison.
_	Brolly proposed at the time that Donegal were capable of swallowing entire teams into a vacuum.
_	The mercantile branch of this business was then sold to Mr EK Ogg during the time that John Mackay Headrick Jnr was working for it.
_	Concerned that at the time that their label was only known in the UK for the "Neighbours" theme tune, Mushroom founded the Discordant label for the sole purpose of launching Garbage.
_	By the time that linguists trained in more modern methods made their way to the Pacific, at least for the major languages, the Bible was already printed according to the orthographic system developed by the missionaries, and the people had learned to read and write without marking vowel length or the glottal stop.
_	By the time that they entered the studio to work on the album, they had amassed 50 demos to work from.
_	Fahlada gets shock therapy treatment until she regains her memories, but she loses her memories about Saichon and everything during the time that she was missing on Min Island.
_	At the time that I was writing that record I think it was very hard to see a way out...
_	The Series I Supercharged engine went through many internal changes and the horsepower changed rapidly between the time it was introduced and the time that the Series II L36 was introduced.
_	At the time that Westbury was working with Cade it was believed that in the surgical treatment of cancer, the more tissue that was removed the better the outcome would be.
_	By the time that court heard the appeal, the reservation land had been allotted and excess land sold.
_	William W. Hunt III, of the Tennessee Board of Professional Responsibility, said at the time that he believed it was the first time a lawyer had been disciplined for Internet advertising practices.
_	At the time that the City of Dartmouth was dissolved, the provincial government altered its status to a separate community to Halifax; however, its status as part of the metropolitan "Halifax" urban core existed prior to municipal reorganization in 1996.
_	In her memoir, Mary E. King wrote that Carmichael was "poking fun at his own attitudes" and that "Casey and I felt, and continue to feel, that Stokely was one of the most responsive men at the time that our anonymous paper appeared in 1964."
_	During the time that Samuel lived on the Isle of Man he rented the house to wealthy tenants.
_	It seemed at the time that the terrain would be more adequate for a simple animal garden, but it was nonetheless the site chosen by the city council in 1927 to build the park.
_	Among its fans included UNIX's co-developer Ken Thompson working at Bell Labs; Dennis Ritchie had joked at the time that "Rogue" was "the biggest waste of CPU cycles in history".
_	For part of the time that Stephens was director of the choir, he held the title of president of the choir and was assisted by two counselors, echoing a system of ecclesiastical leadership used throughout the LDS Church.
_	Though Anu was the supreme God, he was rarely worshipped, and, by the time that written records began, the most important cult was devoted to his son Enlil.
_	The fact that they had decomposed by the time that they were retrieved shows that they had been left in the pits for some time.
_	US officials speculated at the time that Horman was a victim of "Chilean paranoia," but did nothing to intervene.
_	The utilization of a hand mixer makes possible the creation of finer bubbles which increases the time that the foam can last.
_	He was also the Liberal MP for Bodmin, though his political career was on hiatus for much of the time that he managed the Great Globe.
_	Spring of 1972 was also the time that new officers were elected to the Board of Directors of CAP.
_	I thought at the time that Abe was dreaming.
_	According to Papuan legend [get reference<nowiki> </nowiki>: Lawrence 1998], a developing mud island near the mouth of a river to the south of the Fly Delta was first settled by people from Yama [in Kulkalgau Ya/Kalaw Lagaw Ya the name of the island is Dhaaru (Daru)], before the time that the Kiwai conquered the coastal parts of the South-West Fly Delta (perhaps at most around 700 years ago).
_	The interior design was by Darleen Lev, a designer from New York City who was staying at the motel around the time that Miller and Emigh bought the property.
_	Their first release, entitled Television, received positive reviews from Swedish press, around the time that third member Olof Bendt joined the band.
_	In most states, the base period is usually the first four out of the last five completed calendar quarters prior to the time that the claim is filed.
_	On January 2, Cenk Uygur, host of the weekday "Young Turks with Cenk Uygur", stated at the time that the Current TV show would continue for at least three months and that he was open to staying with the new network.
_	According to Jewish law, each prayer must be performed within specific time ranges (zmanim), based on the time that the communal sacrifice the prayer is named after would have been performed in the days of the Temple in Jerusalem.
_	It is apparent from political correspondence of the time that it was never the belief of the government that such powers had ever been transferred.
_	By the time that the "Regina Elena"s had been built in the early 1900s, the British battleship had been completed, a revolutionary design that rendered all previous battleships obsolete.
_	There were various reports at the time that Perrie was set to make a television comeback as an actress, in a six-part drama to be filmed in Spain .
_	At the time that Sontag was writing, the fad in alternative cancer treatment was psychotherapy for the patient's supposed "cancer personality".
_	During the time that segregation was rigidly enforced, Ball actively ignored the social norms, actively fighting for the civil rights of black Bermudians.
_	Although the Safety Board expressed concern at the time that the FAA chose to issue an AC instead of regulations, the number of EMS accidents was decreasing, thus the recommendations were closed.
_	Nonetheless this was not considered terribly important for a tactical fighter-bomber aircraft, and furthermore it was assumed at the time that air combat would be via guided missile exchanges outside visual range.
_	At the time that the massive, still surviving, fortified gatehouse and walls were built in the 13th and 14th centuries the house itself was probably made of timber.
_	In 1954, Dwight Eisenhower was making a paid political speech from Denver, Colorado and went over the time that had been agreed on.
_	By the time that information is revealed, Adriano is already in love with Emirena, though he is engaged to Princess Sabina.
_	Of his French accent, Bing remarked at the time that any complaints should be sent 'to the back door of the United Nations'."
_	It was, however, the commentary of the Abbé Louis Gougenot at the time that captured the four aspects of the painting that would be the main points of all future discussion:
_	His report did not reveal anything new or insightful, but it appeared he concurred with the prevalent view of the time that the best route for survival for indigenous Australians was to assimilation by adopting a "European work ethic".
